Nick & Jay Duet, Book 2. Sine Qua Non by Nenia Campbell.

Prologue

This could be a ticket to a new life if I play our cards right.
Danielle Beaucroft could still see it all now—the whirlwind courtship
of meeting him at the club, thinking he would be the prince to save her—the
dazzling lights of the Vegas Strip that glittered almost as fiercely as the
diamond he placed on her finger—being fucked better than she could ever
remember in her life.
Well, almost, she corrected herself, but that thought brought pain with
it, and she swiftly pushed it aside.
Her ex-husband had bought her steak dinner, paired it with
Champagne. Now, what did she have? With a violent cry, she swept the
remnants of the Thai takeout she couldn’t really afford into the satin-lined
jute trashcan. Cold noodles doused in sauce.
It had all come down like a sack of bricks, thanks to her ungrateful
child.
She had seen a picture of her the other day. It must have been a slow
news day because The Hollybrook Herald had run a puff piece on some
save-the-children benefit gala. Her stepson, Nicholas, was in the
foreground, wearing a suit that looked like it cost as much as the car she’d
been forced to sell, and standing beside him was Justine, who was doing
that tucked-in thing with her shoulders that she’d done whenever she’d been
forced to dress up as a child.
“Relax your arms, Justine, for god’s sake. Do you want to look like a
hunchback?”
She also recognized the necklace nestled into her daughter’s cleavage,
the bracelets as heavy as handcuffs around her wrists. Those diamonds had
used to be hers. But Damon had left his first wife’s jewelry to Nicholas in
his will, and now apparently they were just medals to be awarded to any
Beaucroft whore for her service.
She never could manage herself, Danielle thought uncharitably,
remembering the low-cut Grecian gown with a flicker of envy. All that
money, and she can’t even find a dress that fits her properly. Not that she
was likely to have picked it out herself. Danielle had been around enough
men to recognize that look, to know when a man had decided to take it
upon himself to do the managing. She could see it in Nicholas’s eyes when
he looked at her daughter.
The little hypocrite.
Danielle breathed into the palm of her hand and wrinkled her nose.
Onions. The onions were a mistake. That was what she got, for calling the
first place to hang a sign on her door. With a roll of her eyes, she headed
into her en suite bathroom. It was the only bathroom in her one-bedroom
apartment, but en suite sounded better. Classier. She needed to manage
herself, too.
Unlike Justine, she was good at it. It was why the men at the Beat &
Tease had always asked after her, instead of those trashy nineteen-year-olds
with their ill-fitting heels and ugly brown lipstick who got drunk with
customers and flirted with the bartenders like they were there to party.
They weren’t just dancers. They were selling a fantasy. She understood
what the men were paying for and had played the role as well as any
actress. And like all good actresses, there had been trophies, awards. She’d
gotten Damon—
Until Damon had gotten her.
God, it sucked. How many men had she been forced to blow or screw
to get to where she was now? And how many of those men had hightailed it
just as soon as they found out that there was a kid in the picture? Oh, they
were happy enough to buy her off with a nice dinner or some money to
cover gas, but deep down, every man wanted to believe he was the first and
only.
There was no bigger mood killer to these men than staring at the
reminder of another man’s prowess from across the kitchen table as she
asked you crossly to pass the Fruit Flakes.
She hadn’t asked to be a single mother. She supposed very few people
did ask for that, but most people didn’t have her streak of bad luck. Most
people were stupid.
She saw how they looked at her, as they took in her box-blonde hair
and the boob job that had cost two months’ rent and had her and her kid
eating plain-wrapped mac-n-cheese that tasted like yeast and sawdust. She
didn’t get offered the kinds of jobs where people gave a shit about what was
going on inside her brain, not like her daughter. They all thought she was
some cheap bimbo.
Stop frowning, she told herself, as she savagely brushed her teeth.
You’ll get wrinkles.
She, Danielle, had done the work and made sacrifices to get them out
of that crappy little apartment in the Mission. And all she had asked of
Justine was to return the fucking favor for once. She’d grown up in that
house just like the rest of them, draped in designer labels and gold jewelry,
toting around a real Louis Vuitton purse. And she’d been happy enough to
go to that hoity-toity UC school on their dime, too, attending protests that
she’d allowed herself to be tagged in, paint on her face, holding up signs
protesting the 1%, which had sent Damon into a rage.
“Who does that ungrateful little bitch think she is?”
Danielle had said nothing, because there was really no point. She didn’t
know, either. All her life, she’d been the dutiful little daughter, clinging to
mommy’s hand, never letting her just breathe. Then it was like she’d lost
her little mind, getting involved in scandal after scandal, ruining their name,
their family, their brand. Which she could have fixed by coming back, but
she never had. Not until she, her mother, had been forced to beg Nicholas,
hands out. Little Miss Don’t-Mind-Me was the only one he had ever
heeded. And when she’d spoken to him, he had made it very clear—
obscenely clear—that there would be no money without Jay.
After running away and leaving everyone else to deal with the fallout
of that dreadful party and its aftermath, Danielle felt like coming back and
dealing with her brother was the very least Justine could do. Damon never
would have disinherited her if Justine hadn’t wound him up.
But eventually, her daughter had stopped calling and Danielle was tired
of waiting, of catering to the child who still dared to talk to her like a
disappointment when she was very clearly fucking her own stepbrother.
She picked up her old cracked iPhone with its dangling strawberry
charm and dialed Justine’s number. It rang several times, which made her
realize that she had no plans about what to do if her daughter didn’t pick up,
but then she heard a click.
“Hello? Mom? I’m at work. What do you need?”
That’s a lot of attitude from a girl who’s got her tits out on the society
pages. She snorted delicately. “Put your brother on the phone. I need to talk
to him about the money.”
There was a pause. “I really don’t think I should do that. He doesn’t
want to talk to you.”
“It’s a business number, isn’t it? We have business. He knows it.”
“He doesn’t want your business.” There was a note of coldness in
Justine’s voice now.
“What about the lawsuit?” Her tone rose pleadingly, becoming almost
girlish. She used to talk to her regulars like this. She still did. “Remember,
baby? He said he’d ruin me and you know he will. I need that money to
protect myself.”
“Nick is willing to drop the lawsuit as long as you leave him alone.”
So it’s Nick now that he’s got you posing as his little escort. “Well, you
didn’t tell me that. You aren’t answering any of my calls.”
“I did tell you,” her daughter said grimly. “But you kept asking about
the money.”
“Well, it is my money. If your father had lived long enough for us to
talk things out, he would have changed his mind. I have expenses. I can’t
live out on the street. I mean, for God’s sake, Justine. I’m calling you on an
iPhone 4 with a cracked screen.”
“It’s his money, Mom. He can do what he likes with it, which I told you
before.” She sighed. “I’m sorry about your phone, but you’re not going to
end up on the street because of a cheap phone, are you? I mean, you have
an apartment, right? You told me you did. And rent’s paid?”
Danielle said nothing, too angry to speak as her daughter rambled on.
“If it gets really bad, maybe you can sell some of your jewelry to buy
yourself some more time. Apart from that, I really don’t know what else to
tell you.”
That was rich. The girl was barely into her thirties, with a mansion roof
over her head and a cushy office job where she sat on her ass all day filing
papers, and she was going to tell her how she ought to manage her money?
She forced herself to take a calming breath. “Baby, you’re my daughter.
Don’t you care about me?”
“Yes,” Jay said, in such a wavering tone that she thought she might
have won. “But my hands are tied. Nick isn’t going to budge on this. You
made your choices and the will was settled by all the lawyers involved
years ago. I can’t change that.”
“But he listens to you,” Danielle protested. “You can make him give me
something can’t you? Just ask him nicely.”
“No,” Jay said sharply. “I can’t do that. Not with him.”
“Justine—”
“I have to go. Bye.”
The phone went dead in her hands.
Danielle stared at it incredulously before throwing it against the wall
with a scream.

She calmed down a few moments later. Catching a glimpse of her red
face surrounded by her mussed and unbrushed hair in the vanity mirror was
quite the shock. Who’s that witch? Danielle thought with horror, before
realizing with a sobering jolt that it was her.
Justine had pushed her to this.
But the show had to go on. Despite what her daughter believed, she did
have bills to pay and she was a month behind on rent.
Lucky for her, she could work from home like any tech executive.
Danielle unscrewed a jar of Korean cold cream and began doing
damage control.
After Damon had passed away, Nicholas had wasted no time in kicking
her out. He hadn’t even done it face to face, like a man. He’d waited until
she’d gone out on one of her shopping trips to have the locks changed.
She’d come home from Anthropologie to find all her shit piled out on the
curb, and when she’d slammed on the door, swearing and raising hell, he’d
called the cops on her, and she’d spent the night in jail. Now she had a
fucking criminal record, thanks to him.
Since then, she’d done what she could to get back on her feet. She’d
tried hawking essential oils for a while but then her manager had started
harping at her to buy more product before she’d even sold what she had,
and she was not going to end up in the hole.
Bolstered by the ylang ylang and a box of white zinfandel, she’d
Googled “strip clubs near me” in a fit of desperation, which was when she
had learned about something called “camgirling.” From what she had read,
it wasn’t that much different from stripping. And it was safer, too. When
you were behind a screen, there was no danger of men getting handsy.
Danielle had turned her bedroom into a studio and strung it up with
fairy lights from Target. With her dwindling funds, she purchased a lacy
white duvet and a good-quality camera. For a couple hours a night,
spending a few hours a week doing what she had used to do for dinner and
gas got her a steady stream of panting men.
Her mouth tightened briefly, remembering how Justine had used to
insist upon waiting up for her during those nights at the strip club, like an
aggrieved little saint.
She used to like the idea of being a mother, that was the sad thing.
Back when she thought it would be a package deal arrangement, with a
husband and a nice house. But even after that, when she had looked into the
girl’s dark eyes for that first time, and thought, I made this, she had felt a
surge of pride. All the nurses had said, “Oh, she’s beautiful,” and she had
been filled with an unexpectedly fierce burst of joy. Of course she is, she
had thought. She’s mine.
But now, every time she looked at the girl, she could only see her father
—Anthony: a musician from Trinidad and Tobago with distant Chinese
ancestry. Anthony, who had serenaded her with a reggaeton version of
Black Magic Woman on a beach in San Diego that still made her mistyeyed when she thought of it now. She’d been working on the boardwalk to
save for college but he had been far more interesting than scooping ice
cream for snot-nosed brats.
She had spent an entire golden summer with him and his three
roommates. In that beachside bungalow they were all renting for less than
nothing because one of them knew the owner, they worked odd jobs and
lived hand to mouth. One of them had been red-haired and sunburned, an
ex-surfer from Australia who’d broken his shin and now worked on boats in
the marina. The other guy ran a kiosk for tourists with his common-law
wife, but most of his income seemed to come from weed, of which they had
all smoked plenty.
Danielle had listened to Anthony busk at the boardwalks as he sat
beside a boombox that was almost as big as his guitar, and she had basked
in the glow of his attention as she danced and swayed to his music. They
had gotten more free drinks than they had known what to do with whenever
he performed at bars, and everyone had wanted to know their names.
I could live like this forever, she thought naively. Right here on this
beach.
And then, one day, Anthony disappeared.
When she thought to look him up years later, she had discovered that
he’d had a heart-attack. Only thirty-two. What a fucking waste. You really
couldn’t depend on anyone other than yourself. They’d always leave you,
one way or another. Her mouth twisted bitterly.
Even your own children could turn traitor.
She looked a lot like him in certain lights—the ringlets in her curly
hair, the sharp jut of her slightly crooked nose, and the way her forehead
wrinkled when she frowned. That was all him. But it was in the face, too.
Anthony’s face had been incredibly expressive and she had loved that about
him, but seeing it on her daughter pierced like a fucking knife.
Men had started looking at Justine before she’d even started high
school. Hell, some of her regulars even hollered at her, while Jay ducked
her head, pathetically clinging to her skirt. She’s going to get eaten alive on
the streets, she remembered thinking, looking at her daughter’s beautiful
face and feeling a distant sense of alarm. And they aren’t even going to wait
for her to grow up first.
But bringing Justine had gotten her sympathy from her clients and
better tips, so she had tolerated and, yes, sometimes even encouraged the
drunken teasing. Better she find out now what men were like than to grow
up sheltered and naïve.
Marriage was supposed to fix all her problems. Rather than having to
entertain the appetites of multiple men all at once, only to come home to a
sagging apartment and a sullen child, she could focus her efforts on one
man, in a beautiful house big enough that she could choose to avoid her
daughter—and her stepson—completely, if she so desired. And she did
desire.
She was very, very tired of being both virgin mother and whore.
When Damon Beaucroft had whisked her away to Las Vegas’s hotel
and casino scene and fucked her so hard that she couldn’t walk straight the
next day, she had convinced herself that she was in love. So he was older,
so what? He had a full head of hair and a big dick, and the ice on her finger
was big enough to blot out some of his less favorable qualities, like his
wandering eye and his tendency to threaten or intimidate waitstaff.
She had almost convinced herself that she had finally found the
happiness that she had been chasing since her late teens, wanting to be that
girl dancing in the sun with a boy who chose her.
Until she’d noticed how her new husband looked at her kid.
People thought she was stupid. Damon thought he was stupid, even
after the lid was blown off her ruse. Maybe she didn’t read crusty old books
for pleasure while wistfully languishing away in a tower, but that didn’t
mean she couldn’t see what was right in front of her own damn face.
Since Damon wasn’t around anymore, she got all the blame for it. She
heard the whispers, calling her a whore and a bad mother. But she’d kept
Justine busy and out of the way while playing the role of glamorous society
wife for her ungrateful pervert of a husband. Had he thought she really
wanted to go to all of those awful Historical Society meetings? Only
mimosas and petty gossip had made them even remotely tolerable. It was
about networking.
Damon was too smart to shit where she ate—or so she thought—so she
just dressed a little younger even as her husband continued buying Justine
gifts and calling her “my dear,” like he didn’t break his neck looking at her
ass whenever she left the room. But when she noticed the same look in her
stepson’s eyes, she had wanted to scream until the windows shattered and
every single member of her screwed-up family had blood coming out of
their ears.
She wasn’t sure when Nicholas and Justine had actually started
sleeping together. Her daughter was such a little miss that she hadn’t even
believed Damon when he had first brought up his suspicions. “As if she
would,” Danielle had scoffed. “A nun could make that girl blush.”
But Damon had been insistent and wildly angry—irrationally angry.
Less concerned father, more jealous lover. “She has you fooled, too, then.
Not that it’s hard. Your daughter’s a back-stabbing little whore like you.
She’s let my son fuck her all over his house, and she won’t be getting penny
from me now, even if she comes crawling back to me on her knees.”
“You sound jealous,” Danielle had spat, though the mental picture he’d
painted disturbed her. “Why is that, Damon? Did you ever touch my kid?”
Damon had laughed nastily (but not refused, she couldn’t help
remembering; wouldn’t an innocent man have refused?). “If I had, I would
have done it when she came onto me at the resort.”
“What?”
“Oh, it was shameless. She was hanging around the bar in a flimsy
little sundress, like a lost lamb in a den of wolves. When I attempted to take
her back to her room, she asked me for things I don’t even think she was
sure she really wanted. God only knows how she got to my son. She’s had
him wrapped around her finger since before he could even drive.”
Danielle’s stomach twisted. “Jay didn’t even date until she was
eighteen.”
“And perhaps this is why. Nicholas is still an impressionable young
man. He doesn’t have my fortitude or experience. If a pretty girl told him
what he wanted to hear, and promised to satisfy his passing whims, I think
he’d give her anything.”
That feeling in her gut intensified. “You’re lying. Jay wouldn’t do that.
She’s such a goody two-shoes.”
“Perhaps she used to be.” He gave her a coldly amused look, clocking
her disgust. “But you didn’t exactly help with that, did you, my dear?
Where do you think she learned how to misbehave? While you were out
there fucking every pool boy in sight, she’s been warping my son’s mind
with her little games. She calls him Daddy, as if that makes him any less of
a boy, when what she really needs is a man to take her firmly in hand and
—”
Danielle had slapped him and he, enraged, had reached for one of his
scotch bottles and thrown it at her. It smashed against the wall over her head
and that was when she began to really be afraid. When his eyes studied her,
dark and dissatisfied.
When he said, “You’ve grown old, Danielle. And boring.”
The broken glass had crunched beneath her heels as she walked out that
same evening, with two suitcases and a cab ready to take her to the
Bayview Hotel, where she wouldn’t sleep a wink as it occurred to her that
her husband’s descriptions of their children suggested that he had stayed
and watched them.
That conclusion hadn’t yet reached as she packed, but the sickeningly
awful feelings of the encounter surrounded her like a toxic miasma, and she
could feel tears forming in her eyes.
“How appropriate.” Nicholas stood watching her leave with the same
cold grey eyes as his father, shirtless, arms folded. She shot him a wary
look, trying not to imagine her daughter pinned beneath him.
“What’s appropriate?”
“You, spending the night with all the other cast-off mistresses in town.”
As if sensing her discomfort, he put his hands on his hips, daring her to
look. “They call it the Payview Hotel.”
“You’re one to talk.” The words came out before she could think better
of them.
The glint in his eyes reminded her of the quicksilver flash of a knife
blade sliding violently out of its wooden block. “The fuck is that supposed
to mean?”
“It means, I know why my daughter really left.” Her hand tightened on
the door knob and she moved a little closer to it as his weight shifted like he
was about to spring. “You always thought you were such hot shit. Mr. God’s
Gift to Women. Well, it seems like I’m not the only cast-off.”
His mouth twitched—not into a smile, but an expression utterly alien to
her, cold and terrifying. A predatory grimace.
“Get out.”
But this was the first response he’d ever given her after years of
flouting her authority and she wasn’t about to back down now.
“I’ve seen a lot of men like you. They think that just because they’ve
got money to burn, they’re worthy of everyone’s time. But trust me,
everyone thinks they’re a fucking joke. Or didn’t you think I’d seen you
going through your sister’s things? Sleeping in her bed? You pathetic little
creep. No wonder she left.”
For a moment, she saw real pain there, hot and raw and satisfying.
Then his face became hard and stony—just like his father’s.
“Get out,” Nicholas repeated. “Or I’m going to hurt you.”
It’s not your house, she had nearly said, but something in his face had
stopped her—a cold, collected menace that struck her as being very adult. It
belonged more on a man his father’s age than on a boy in his late teens. He
really would hurt me, she realized. In a heartbeat.
Anyway, her cab was waiting, so she turned her back on him despite
every instinct in her body screaming at her not to and she spent the night in
her hotel shaking from a chill that could not be appeased by the down
comforter as she turned her husband’s words over and over in her mind.
(she calls him Daddy)
That had been the last real conversation she’d had with Nicholas until
the death of his father, when he had kicked her out. It wasn’t until she’d
called him up for money that they’d spoken again.
Danielle had been shocked when she had looked him up, and seen not
the scrawny, punk-eyed little shit that she remembered, but a younger,
handsomer version of his late father. Despite the scandal of Damon’s sexual
misconduct, and the ensuing lawsuit, Nicholas had somehow managed to
walk away from the worst of the rumors mostly untouched. At the funeral,
she had been astounded by the sheer volume of money she wouldn’t be
seeing a cent of: he had given it all to Nicholas, not that he seemed to care.
She supposed he wouldn’t have to, looking like that.
Ten grand, just to talk to her daughter. The last time a john had handed
her that much cash, she’d walked home with a sore ass and sticky cleavage.
She couldn’t even imagine what Justine had done to him to make him that
fucking desperate.
(she’s had him wrapped around her finger)
Damon was probably laughing himself hoarse down there in hell.
But the joke was on all three of them, because she was tired of living in
her daughter’s shadow, forced to beg for scraps of what belonged to her. It
was time to take matters into her own hands.
Someone knocked on the door. Danielle let out a harsh breath and
smoothed her hair back from her face before adjusting her thin lace-edged
tank top, making sure the edges lay flat over her flowy harem pants. Her
eyes landed on her half-melted Thai tea and she moved to throw that away,
but not before fishing out a piece of ice and holding it briefly against each
of her nipples.
She checked through the peephole, and yes, it was exactly who she was
expecting: her slightly tarnished white knight, here to save her.
Pasting on a smile, she threw open the door. The younger man on the
step was holding a cheap bottle of wine, and she saw his weaselly eyes
widen in what appeared to be excitement, if his tented jeans were any
indication. She stood a little taller, making sure to push out her breasts.
You don’t think I’m old and boring, do you, baby?
“Wow,” he said, his voice hoarse as he looked at her tits. “You look—”
“I know, baby. It’s good to see you, too.” Pushing off from the door,
she stood on tiptoe to reach his mouth, making sure she could feel the press
of her body against his skinny torso as she leaned into him. When she
reached down to squeeze his cock through his jeans, he whimpered.
“I just got off work,” he protested, which pleased her.
“Is it the job you told me about? The one you took for me?”
“Yeah. Five grand.”
“You promised me a discount.”
“Down from seven,” he protested. “He wouldn’t go lower.”
It would have to do, she thought.
She felt him shudder and smiled as she took him by the hand and
pulled him into the house, sliding the straps of her top down and stroking
viciously through his jeans, until his pants dampened. “Fuck,” he cried out,
but she silenced him with a kiss.
“I hope you brought your camera. You wouldn’t disappoint me again,
would you?”

Chapter One

“Nicholas? It’s Arthur. I know it’s the weekend but I thought you
should know that our VP of Operations resigned.”
“Eileen did?” Nicholas sat up at his desk. “Why?”
Arthur paused. “She cited creative differences. Off the record, she’s
very Christian.”
Nicholas closed his eyes.
“And with the scandal—”
“I can imagine.” He cut the other man off, not wanting to hear any
further recriminations, real or speculated. “I suppose we’ll just have to grin
and bear it until we can hire somebody else.”
He scrubbed his hand over his face, staring up at the ceiling. Fuck.
“Sorry to be the bearer of bad news.”
“No, thanks for letting me know. I’m about to have a video interview
with a cleaner, so we’ll have to wait until Monday to discuss this further.
We can plan a course of action then.”
Nicholas set his phone down on the desk. His fingers began to tap in
agitation and he growled in annoyance when he realized that he was
unconsciously copying the cadence of the clock mounted on the office wall.
It was his father’s, purchased at auction from some dwindling estate. He
wished he’d thought to remove it before. Too late now.
The video app on his computer flickered into focus and he arranged his
face into a picture of something approaching civility as a disgustingly
earnest-looking girl in her early twenties appeared. She adjusted her tennis
headband like she heard there had been a casting call for a reboot of The
Virgin Suicides and was afraid that she had missed it.
Nicholas didn’t think she looked very much like a maid.
“Mr. Beaucroft,” she said eagerly. “Hi! Thank you so much for this
opportunity to work with you.”
With him? He nodded tersely, bristling. Why was she talking like she’d
already gotten the job? Who was this excited to clean somebody else’s
toilets? Did she think they were going to collaborate over fucking
Fabuloso?
And he was only going to have to go through a higher stakes version of
this with the interviews for the Vice President position. The sales and
marketing team were such fucking parasites.
“Do you have any prior housekeeping experience?”
“Well, I used to work as an au pair for this family in Paris.”
“This is a bit different from watching some French brats paddling
around in the Seine. I own a very large piece of property and I’d expect
every inch of it cleaned. Do you know how to polish granite?” he demanded
abruptly. “Clean hardwood? Can you dust?”
Her smile faltered. He wondered idly who had put her up to this.
“Let me guess,” he said, when she continued to falter. “You don’t have
any maid experience.”
“I’m a fast learner.” She sounded defiant, which suggested she had
done this to herself. They weren’t accepting any interns, so if someone were
conniving and desperate, Nicholas supposed they might seize upon a job for
a cleaner and try to upgrade it a paid entry-level position. “I have a college
degree,” she was saying now, “I could do filing, type up papers—”
“I have a secretary. What I need is a maid.”
“But I—”
Nicholas ended the video call, cutting her off mid-protest. What a
waste of his time. Six applicants so far, and not a single one of them fit the
bill. Competence and discretion, that was all he asked. If only Carmela had
kept her snide comments about his houseguest to herself. Then he wouldn’t
be here, subjected to graspingly ambitious college students.
And now, Eileen had quit.
He stood so abruptly that his chair shot back a few feet, edging around
the sharp corner of the desk to yank the clock bodily from the wall. The nail
it had been hanging on tore through the plaster, shedding bits of drywall on
the bloodred fibers of his late father’s carpet.
Take that, asshole, he thought.
Carrying the clock under his arm like a football, he marched down the
hall, up to the front door, blinking into the harsh sunlight. The air was
redolent with dust and pollen, shimmering in the spring heat, though there
was still a saline nip in the breeze from the nearby ocean.
He continued down the dusty walk to where the trash cans waited at the
bottom of the hill rise for Friday pickup. He slammed the clock into the
gray bin, and when he replaced the lid, the ticking sound was finally
silenced. Only the throbbing of his own pulse remained to taunt him.
As he headed back into the house that he had inherited from his father,
he looked up at the Chihuly sculpture hanging from the ceiling. When the
sun passed through the glass, it glowed a violent neon. Over the years, he
had grown accustomed to its organic and vaguely menacing silhouette
whenever he came in through the main door. Bathed in translucent shadow,
however, visitors often revealed a flicker of unease as they looked up at it,
over his shoulder.
Jay, he knew, didn’t like it. To her, it was a relic of his father. But when
he had talked casually about its replacement, she had given him a
disappointed look. If she were here, she would have stopped him from
throwing out the clock, and probably gotten angry at him for being rude to
the interviewee, but she wasn’t here. She was at the farmers’ market. He
had offered to drive her but she said she wanted to walk.
But he knew the truth. She didn’t want him to take her because she
didn’t want to be seen with him in public. She had turned down ten million
dollars for his sake, but she hadn’t fully accepted him. Part of her was still
closed off, and he could see that remove every time she looked at him with
a caution she didn’t try to hide.
His ambling steps took him to her bedroom. The door was closed, to
keep the cat in. When he opened it, her dark gray cat poked its head out
from beneath the bed, watching with reflective eyes.
It smells like her in here, he thought wistfully, closing the door behind
him.
Apple freesia, coconut, dusty sunshine.
He tilted his head, taking in the mirrored closet, the padded window
seat, the faded sunflower motif on the walls. Most of her belongings were
still boarded up in her San Francisco hovel, which was now leased in his
name, so the room was a strange, frozen blend of the way she had left it in
the late two-thousands and what she had brought back with her from the
city.
His eyes lingered on the nightstand crammed with fantasy novels and
old romances. She’d been reading one; it was face-down on the nightstand
beside her Kindle and a pair of tortoiseshell glasses that he hadn’t known
she owned.
They had been apart for nearly nine years and she was the same in so
many ways that it was always startling to find something that had changed.
Once, he had known her better than anyone. It was disturbing to realize that
this might no longer be the case.
But when she turned down his proposal, she had said, “I’m going to
need some time to think about this.”
He had been taken off guard. She had decided to stay. As far as he was
concerned, that was a tacit declaration that she was ready to be his.
“What’s there to think about?”
“You’re asking me to uproot everything I’ve done on my own to spend
the rest of my life with you and I don’t know if I can do that.” She had
lowered her eyes to the box in her hands, holding it with a care that hurt like
violence. “I need to think about my answer.”
How long? he nearly demanded.
They had been in the car, and he had floored the gas, gripping the
wheel in a stranglehold.
How long are you going to make me wait?
“Nick.” Her voice had been wary—frightened. “You’re going too fast.”
With a glance at the odometer, he hit the brakes with a screech,
bringing the needle back down from the 90-mark.
“Nick?”
(Please don’t hurt me)
“Take all the time you need.” The words tasted like sawdust. He
couldn’t look at her again until they got home, which seemed to fill her with
pity because she had chased him down in the hall, and said, “Wait” in a tone
that had made him think she was about to change her mind, so he turned,
expectant and ready for victory, only to have Jay press her lips against his.
“Why?” he’d asked, stepping back from her in the shadowy dark hall,
and she had responded, rather harshly, “Because I want to.”
Had she slept with him that night because she pitied him? As he surged
between her thighs beneath that ghostly sculpture, with the marble steps
leaving divots in their flesh that became lilac bruises worn beneath their
clothes, had she already been thinking about when she would leave?
“God, I don’t think I can move,” she had said afterwards, her hair a
tangled smudge against the stark white marble. “You haven’t been that
rough with me since that night at the pool.”
“I didn’t realize you paid such close attention to how I fuck.”
Jay rolled on one arm to look at him. “What’s gotten into you?”
You, he thought, but he knew better than to say that, so he said nothing
as he played with her hair, so focused on the rich texture of it that Jay
frowned and pulled his hand away. Her expressive eyes traced his face with
a familiarity that was scalding, sloughing away all but the sorry core of his
being. He looked away with a frown as she touched his face.
“Are you all right?”
She doesn’t want you. The words in his head were his father’s voice,
cold and amused. Drink it in, boy. This is all you’ll ever have. Unwillingly,
his eyes dropped, taking in the moon-bathed contours of her body, her full
breasts. “Yes. Let’s go to bed. I’ll carry you.”
“Okay, but be carefu—oh my god! Nick!”
She grabbed onto his shoulders in alarm as he swept her up easily, and
the sensation of all that warm, bare skin against his own zipped through him
like wildfire, leaving him bereft.
She doesn’t need to love me to give me what I want.
It didn’t matter that she was in his bed. They might as well have been
separated by glass.
As she fell asleep, and and all the stiffness melted from her limbs like
glacial ice, he pulled her against him, burying his face in her hair with a
sigh.
“Don’t leave.” There were still some things he wasn’t ready to say to
her face. Not with the phantom scores of old hurts still blistering on his
heart. But he could say it to her now as he breathed her in, drowning in her
sweetness. “Please, stay for me. Love me. I want you to love me.”
She hadn’t responded, which was fine. He told himself he didn’t need
an answer.
But he did. He needed “yes.”
Shaking his head at his foolishness, Nicholas left her room, making
sure to close the door behind him. His eyes went to the swinging jellyfish
that they had made love under the night he proposed. Here or not, there
were traces of her everywhere, and now that he had freed her from their
bargain, his need for her throbbed like an infected wound.
If she left again, it would destroy him.

Birds chirped to one another as they swooped and swirled over the little
blue tents that had been set up to provide shade to the farmers and small
business owners selling their wares on Main Street. Both sides of the street
had been closed for the day, lined with kiosks and food trucks. The sun was
shining through the haze of pollen in the air.
It’s much too beautiful to feel melancholy, thought Jay.
A man cleared his throat noisily and she realized she had been standing
in front of a table filled with bottles of raw milk and plastic-wrapped
wedges of cheese. “Sorry,” she said, scooting out of the way. An all-toofamiliar flutter of anxiety asserted itself as people bumped up against her
shoulders, making her cardigan stick to her skin.
She had grown up here and yet she had never felt more like a stranger.
She kept seeing faces turning her way. Not quite staring but looking long
enough to make her wonder what, exactly, it was that they thought they
were looking at. Had they read about her stepfather in the Hollybrook
Herald? Pulled up chairs to see if any dust would rise from the fallen
rubble?
How many of them were living off of Nicholas’s largesse, like serfs
paying fealty to a fickle young lord, each thinking that they were getting the
better of him, not knowing that he would let them all burn in a heartbeat?
(You’re the only one in this fucking town worth more than the air you
breathe)
Troubled, she walked over to a less crowded stall advertising itself as
vegan and dairy-free. There were plates of macarons made with aquafaba
and filled with coconut cream, applesauce banana bread, and big wheels of
cake glossed with shiny layers of glaze. The woman behind the counter
watched her closely. “See anything you like? Prices are on the board.”
Jay followed her manicured nail and was nearly shocked, until she
remembered that she could afford this now. “The vegan chocolate cake is
forty dollars?”
“We also sell it by the slice if you can’t afford the whole cake.”
That wasn’t what she’d meant, and color rose in her cheeks. Resisting
the urge to look down and check her outfit, she kept her smile pasted on as
she fished for her credit card in her purse. Nicholas would like it. The
candied raspberries were basically fruit sprinkles, and in all her life, she’d
never seen that man turn down anything that had sugar on it.
“I’ll take a whole one.”
Maybe a peace offering would lift him out of the sour mood she’d left
him in.
Children were playing on the grassy field across the road and Jay
tracked them as the cashier rang up her purchase and began wrapping up the
cake. She envied their carefree joy, the ease of their small bodies. It made
her ache to protect them, too, because nobody had protected her, and look
where her naivete had gotten her.
She found herself facing a camera lens and blinked rapidly, her breath
coming in a startled rush. The man had iron-grey hair and was wearing a
chambray shirt that had gone dark with sweat beneath his arms. He’s just
taking pictures of the event, she told herself, over the ringing in her ears.
That’s all. But then she heard another man’s voice whisper, That’s the look.
(I don’t want to fuck an angel)
“Jay? Oh my god, Jay? Is that you?”
She tore her eyes away from the photographer who had moved away to
examine the booths. With her heart pounding the way it was, she didn’t
notice how badly her hand was shaking when she accepted her credit card
from the cake seller as she turned to see who had said her name.
“It is you.” The female voice was resonant and a little smug, and when
Jay craned her neck, she found herself looking at a glamorous-looking
woman with long dark hair frosted with chestnut highlights.
“Hi?” Jay said, slightly panicked.
“Don’t tell me you’ve forgotten us already, Jay. It’s me. Angie. Angela
Diamante. Well—” she gave a practiced-sounding laugh “—it’s Angela
Valdez now.”
That name hit her like a sledgehammer. “Valdez,” she repeated. “As in
—”
“Michael, that’s right. You couldn’t possibly forget him.” She spoke the
words like a challenge, and maybe they were. You used to make out with my
husband, Jay. Remember?
“Wow, that was so long ago,” she babbled noncommittally. Something
nudged her back—the cake, oh thank god. She took the box awkwardly,
aware that the vendor was listening in eagerly, which was all the more
reason for her to get the hell out of here. She tried to shuffle away but
Angie, anticipating escape, hedged her off with an aggressive sidestep.
“Come over here, it’s way less crowded. It’s been an age, hasn’t it?
Michael and I just had our firstborn. I would have invited you to the baby
shower—and the wedding—but nobody knew where you were. It was like
you had dropped off the face of the earth!”
Jay said nothing.
“Well.” Angie pretended to cough, glancing at the box at Jay’s arms.
“What have you been up to after all this time? It looks like you’ve got
something to celebrate.”
“Nope. Impulse buy.”
“This place is dangerous that way.” Jay nodded silently, looking
desperately for an opening in the crowd that she could disappear into. “I
saw you on the cover of the Hollybrook Herald. That looked like Oscar de
la Renta. It was, wasn’t it? And just look at your nails.”
It took all of her effort not to yank her hand back when Angie grabbed
her by the wrist. She’d hit a sore spot. As soon as she had agreed to go to
the children’s cancer benefit gala—because it was for sick children, how
could she say no?—he’d surprised her with an appointment at a salon and
told her it was nonrefundable when she tried to insist that she could do her
own makeup.
The building was completely empty when she arrived, except for the
staff, and she thought there had been a mistake—until said staff greeted her
with champagne and gold-leaf covered pastries that looked more expensive
than her purse. Then she realized: it wasn’t that they were lacking in
customers; Nicholas had bought out the place. The whole time she was
there, Jay had been terrified that they were judging her for her Target blouse
and chewed-on cuticles, but whatever ungodly sum he’d paid them had
made them compliment her within an inch of her life.
She had been so angry that night, it had been all she could do to keep it
together in his arms when he dragged her out from behind one of the
massive centerpieces and onto the dancefloor. You knew what I wanted, she
thought, feeling self-conscious and betrayed. And you did this anyway.
“I’ve had six people pull me aside to ask me who you are, Jay. You
have to dance with me. I just donated fifty thousand dollars to this event
and my plus-one isn’t allowed to hide behind a fern. I don’t see what the
problem is,” he added callously. “I told them you’re my sister.”
Jay didn’t bother telling him that two of those people he was referring
to had found her already and asked for the name of her “agency.” That with
the expensive jewelry and lack of wedding ring, there was only one
assumption people would make about a woman in a dress like hers and it
involved getting paid by the hour by men who would absolutely lie about
her being their sister.
A twinge of guilt went through her as she remembered how the smile
had died from his face at her continued silence.
“What’s wrong?” he demanded.
And she had turned away. “I want to leave.”
(You don't know the thoughts that go through a man's mind when they
see a girl who looks like you)
“Where did you get them done?”
“I’m sorry?” Jay blinked into Angie’s looming face.
“Your nails.”
“Oh, La Vie, I think.”
“Aren’t they by appointment only? You must be doing better than
everyone thought if you’re going to places like that.” She smiled, like she
hadn’t just insinuated that all of their old friends thought she was a loser.
“Oh, I see Michael. He’ll want to say hello you, too. Michael! Come over
here, honey. You’ll never guess who I just found. It’s Jay. High school Jay.”
Shit. Jay looked over at the man Angie had singled out. It wasn’t hard
to spot him: his hair had receded a little and his middle had thickened, but
otherwise, Michael Valdez looked almost exactly the same as she
remembered him. Light brown skin, curly hair, and a slightly perplexed
expression that had always reminded her of a well-trained dog awaiting
approval.
“Wow, Jay,” he said, looking her over in a way that had her stepping
back, and folding her arms. “You look amazing. I mean, uh, wow. Amazing
that it’s been so long. It’s great to see you.”
Angie shot him a sidelong look that he didn’t notice. “It is good to see
you. I think you were just about to tell me where you’ve been hiding
yourself away this whole time.”
“San Francisco. But I’m back for now. Anyway, it’s been so good to
run into you both and, um, congratulations.” Jay realized she was twisting a
strand of hair around her finger and hastily lowered the offending hand. “I
should really go—”
“I heard you moved back home. Are you living with Nicholas?”
You’re really doing this here, Angie? Jay clenched her teeth behind her
smile. “Why not? It’s a big house. He offered and I said yes.”
Not to what he wanted you to.
“Well, I’m glad you two could make up after all of that horrible
business with your dad.” Angie gave Michael an expression of exaggerated
sympathy. “It took the whole town by shock.”
“Stepfather,” Jay said. “He wasn’t my father.”
“Michael felt so guilty.” Angie put her hand on his shoulder and while
he didn’t shrug her off, Jay saw him visibly tense. “He always talks about
how close we all used to be, and how he wished there was something he
could have done.”
“I don’t know why he felt guilty,” Jay said, which made his eyes slide
away from hers. “We only went out for about a year. Our parents just did
business together. It had no reflection on him.”
“How is Nicky, by the way?” Angie asked sweetly. “Is he seeing
anyone? I heard you were his plus-one for the gala.”
Damn you, Nicholas. “We don’t really talk about his relationships.”
“Our housekeeper sees him at the supermarket. He’s always alone.
Even at parties, he never brought an escort. I always thought that was so
sad. It seemed like nobody was good enough to meet his standards. But at
least now he has you.”
Jay swallowed. “I suppose.”
“You two should come by for a visit sometime.” She plucked a
business card from her pants pocket, sliding it into Jay’s hand. Diamante
Dining Group. “I own some of the businesses downtown—two restaurants,
a bakery, and a bar. Michael built them, if you can believe it. I can’t, even
though it’s how we got together. Though not much is getting built now.”
“There’s no land.” Michael still seemed to have trouble looking at her,
but Jay didn’t think she imagined the tightness in his voice. Sore spot,
maybe?
“And weren’t we lucky we seized upon what we had when we had the
chance, babe?” Angie arched her eyebrows at Jay as she plucked her phone
out of her purse. “Looks like the babysitter needs to leave, and so do we.
I’ll bring the car around. And seriously, stop by the bar for a chat sometime,
Jay. We can catch up on everything we missed over drinks while the boys
have beers.”
“Yeah, that sounds great.” That sounds horrible.
“I just can’t wait to hear all your secrets.” Angie patted Jay on the arm.
She flinched.
With a smile that felt more like a baring of teeth, Angie flounced off to
the gravel parking lot. She paused halfway, her shoulders tightening when
she noticed that her husband hadn’t followed.
Because he was still standing right there.
“Sorry about her.” Michael scratched at his neck. “She’s always been a
little competitive.”
“You should go after her.” Jay watched Angie swivel around, with an
expression of hurt anger on her face that was painful to look at. “She looks
upset.”
“That’s all you have to say, after disappearing for nine years?” He
rocked back on his heels, staring at her like she was a ghost of herself.
Maybe to him, she was. High school Jay had never talked back or
criticized. “You could have asked how I’m doing.”
“Okay, it’s nice to see you. Congratulations on your kid. How are you
and your wife doing?”
He sighed. “So it’s going to be like that, is it?”
“I’m not really sure what you want from me.”
A stone scratched against the pavement as Michael toed the loose rocks
with his tasseled loafer. Nicholas made fun of shoes like that. He said
loafers were for men who bought boats but were terrified of water, which
really shouldn’t have been as funny as it was.
“She doesn’t own me, you know. We were all friends before any of us
started dating.”
You were friends. I was just the outsider you let hang around because
my stepfather’s last name looked good on business agreements. “People
grow up. They drift apart. That’s normal.”
“It isn’t normal. You left without a single word to anyone. Not even
your mom knew where you went—and believe me, people asked.” Michael
shook his head, making Jay wonder if he’d been one of them. The thought
of what her mother might have said about that night made all the warmth
drain out of her. “You missed the ten-year reunion. You abandoned this
place.”
“Because there was nothing left for me here!”
“Wow, thanks, Jay. I’m so glad you thought we were all nothing.”
Michael glanced over his shoulder to check the lot, but Angie had already
left—to get the car, Jay imagined. If there wasn’t a fight on the drive home,
she’d be very surprised. “Was it me?”
“It didn’t have anything to do with you.”
“Well, then can you tell me what happened? Because I’ve been trying
to understand.” He moved towards her hesitantly, lowering his outstretched
hand when she just stared at it. “I want to understand. At least let me take
you out for coffee. Maybe I can help.”
Jay stepped back. “I really don’t think that’s a good idea.”
“My wife’s bar, then. She invited you. You can come by when she’s
working, and I’ll buy you a drink. It’s the twenty-first century, Jay. Men and
women can go out as friends and have a drink or two. I thought you were a
feminist.”
I’m a feminist, you know, one of those men at the gala said as he stared
at her in a way that made her want to crawl out of her skin. I’ll treat you the
way a man should treat a woman.
She couldn’t quite manage to hide her distaste. “Jesus, Michael.”
“What? I wasn’t making a move.” He laughed nervously, his eyes
shifting. “I just hate that things between us ended the way they did. I really
liked you.”
“I’m sorry,” Jay said automatically.
“Yeah, I know you didn’t feel the same way. But that’s fine. You look
great. You always did. I’m glad that things worked out so well for you and
Nicholas. His mother’s jewelry suits you.”
The bitterness in his voice was sharp enough to sting—as if he thought
she were some grasping trophy wife. He strode towards his wife’s waiting
black Solara. The windows were rolled down, so she saw her smack his
shoulder when he got in, too roughly to be entirely playful. Their heads
bowed together briefly and Jay could only imagine what Angie was saying.
You look amazing. She ordered an Uber one-handed, not wanting to
walk back with the cake. Who said that to another woman in front of his
own wife? Did he think she would agree?
Jay slipped gratefully into the weathered Honda Civic that pulled up to
the curb. “Justine?” the driver asked, and Jay nodded, not bothering to
correct her. She also pretended not to notice the woman goggling at the
mansion when they pulled up at Nicholas’s house. With all those
ostentatious white columns, and the paned glass windows, it was an
imposing sight, even from the street, when viewed from behind a barren
driveway and row of crooked trash cans.
Frowning, she shifted the cake box to one arm and began to straighten
the lids. One kept popping back up. Something beneath wouldn’t let it seal.
When she peeked under the lid, she saw a rather elaborately carved wooden
something. Was that a clock? The one from Nick’s office? It was still
working—she could hear the ticking sounds. Why had he tossed it out?
Why does Nick do anything?
She continued up the porch, leaving the discarded clock ticking sadly
away in the bin. The lazy spring breeze carried the scents of chlorine and
jasmine, and a little shiver arced down her spine as she used the spare key
to open the door and found herself stepping into that familiar haze of blue
light that was the first thing to beckon her into this house that was not quite
a home.
“I’m back!” she called out redundantly, setting the cake out on the
counter. There were traces of Nick, but he wasn’t in the living room, and
the door to what had been his father’s office was wide open and obviously
empty. “Nick? Are you home?”
“I’m home.” She looked away as he walked barefoot into the kitchen,
busying herself with the dishes in the sink. “How was the farmers’ market?”
He leaned an elbow on the counter, tilting his head to lean into her
periphery. His biceps made the sleeves of his old T-shirt strain dangerously.
“Did the yokels turn out in droves?”
She scrubbed harder. “You’ve never even seen a yokel. And yes, it was
basically a schmaltzy who’s-who-in-Hollybrook event playacting as a
country jamboree. You would have hated it. How was the interview?”
“She wasn’t a good fit.”
He sounded irritated. She couldn’t tell if it was at her. Maybe she
should have let him come along, like he’d offered, but having him run into
Michael and Angela would have been a disaster. Nicholas was dangerous
when bored, and liked to sow chaos for his own amusement.
Setting her shoulders, she went on, “I actually ran into Michael and
Angie there.”
Nicholas moved closer. Her skin prickled. “Michael, as in your ex?”
“Yes. He’s married now. They have a kid.”
He rested a hand on the counter. She could feel the warmth of his chest
through the back of her thin sweater. “You sound disappointed.”
“I hadn’t really thought about it.”
“Then why did you bring it up?”
Some dark note in his voice made her turn over her shoulder. He had a
thumb through the belt loops of his designer jeans, his gaze laser-focused
on hers.
“Was I supposed to hide it?” She kept her voice light.
The chill on the back of her neck increased; it was his breath, stirring
the fine hairs at her nape. “Interesting that you would come to that
conclusion. Do you still carry a torch for your ex? I’ve seen him negotiate.
It’s pathetic. If you asked him to tie you up, he’d run to his father for help.”
“Don’t.” She leaned forward, bracing her palms against the granite top
as if she could absorb strength from the stone. “I’m not going to talk to you
if you’re going to be like this.”
“Like what?”
“You know what you’re doing.” Jay spun around again. “I don’t belong
to you, Nicholas. You don’t own me just because I happen to live under
your roof, and you certainly don’t get to hound me about who I’m talking
to, like some kind of jealous hus—” She broke off.
“No, go on, finish that sentence. I want to hear what you were going to
say.”
Jay bit her lip.
“I agreed to give you time. All the time you need.” His eyes went
pointedly to her throat, where she was wearing the ring around her neck on
a slender silver chain. “But you don’t get to throw my proposal in my face
like it’s a fucking glass of water.”
“You’re right,” she said, looking away. “I’m sorry. I didn’t mean it like
that.”
“You never do, little bird.” He plucked at the strap of her tank top. “So
who did old limp-dick marry? Someone useful to daddy’s business, I’m
assuming.”
“Angie.”
“Well, well. Not even subtle on the rebound.”
Jay jerked her shoulders away and picked up a dish.
Nicholas sighed. Then she felt his hands on her waist, crushing the
fabric against her skin. His palms seared her through her clothes but she
pretended to ignore him, loading dishes into the expensive, new-fangled
dishwasher that she barely knew how to use.
“Jay.” The bubbles in the sink blurred as his hands moved. “Put down
that plate and look at me.”
“Why?” she asked, holding herself very stiffly. “Is the outcome of
whatever this is going to change if it happens face to face?”
He ran two fingers over the band of midriff where her top had ridden
up. She jerked again, and with the hand not still wrapped around her, he
reached forward to shut the water off. She was pressed flush against the
counter now, her pelvis cutting into the granite. She could feel the gouge of
his hips against the rounded curves of her ass.
“I’m talking to you.”
A shiver went down her spine at that familiar dark tone. She reached
for another plate anyway, but her hand was unsteady and he caught her by
the wrist, turning her around slowly without moving back an inch, so she
felt every inch of his body as he hauled her up against him.
“Why are you breathing like that?” The words were rough against her
ear. “Is this turning you on?”
“Screw you.”
With a grunt, he bent down and slid his hand beneath her ass, dropping
her onto the counter so roughly that her breasts bounced. He put his hands
over hers, caging them loosely against the stone as his face hovered in front
of hers. She tried to look away, but he freed up one hand to tilt her chin up,
his fingers gently impressing the hollow of her jaw.
“What is this?”
“Nothing.” Her eyes flicked away. “Do whatever you’re going to do.”
His eyes narrowed speculatively. But before she could speak again, he
got to his knees and tugged down her pants so roughly that she nearly slid
off the counter. “Nick—”
He slid his fingers inside her, spreading her wide as he knelt between
her legs and used one of his shoulders, and his braced forearm to keep her
thighs open.
“Whatever I’m going to do?”
The kiss of his fingers moving inside her made her look away in
shame, though she couldn’t deny the slow burning heat licking its way from
her belly any more than she could hide the soft sounds of her pleasure. It
made her desperate, how much she wanted this.
It made her afraid.
(You must be doing better than everyone thought)
She twisted like a hooked fish, and Nicholas’s hands tightened, intent
on bringing this scenario to its one natural conclusion.
(his mother’s jewelry suits you)
“Michael asked me out,” she gasped.
“What?” It came out as a snarl, hitting a register that sent a chill down
her spine.
“His wife was right there. He asked me right in front of her and it made
me feel like I was—oh, god—Nicholas—”
With a feral growl, he yanked her forward, burying his face between
her thighs and kissing her swollen clit so hard she bit her lip from the shock
of it. Her hips lifted, rising to meet the insistent pressure of his tongue,
prompting him to slide his hand beneath her ass to keep her at an even tilt.
It felt so good, it was like punishment. It probably was. Jay gripped the
counter, trying to shift her hips, but he wouldn’t let her move.
“Nick, please.”
“What’s wrong? Does it hurt?”
Jay tried to respond and a moan came out instead.
“Oh, I see. You’re just embarrassed that you like fucking Daddy’s
face.”
His cruelty made her ache in places too deep and dark to reach. She
grabbed for the cabinet with one hand, her free one still tangled in his hair
as she slid precariously closer to the edge.
“Fuck, oh my god—”
“This is what you do to me, Jay.” She felt the cool enamel of his teeth
and then suction that, combined with the soft pressure of his tongue, tipped
her over and made her come for the second time with a raw sob. His low
sound of approval rocked her like an aftershock. “Doesn’t it feel good to
fall apart?”
She surged forward with a cry, her fingers flattening against his scalp
as she held onto the cabinet’s rough underside until her fingernails were
throbbing. Her clit was a white-hot star under the unhurried strokes of his
tongue, everything burning away to raw, trembling nerves.
“Again. Show me how my beautiful little whore likes to come.”
“I can’t—please—”
He kissed her again, a little harder, a little crueler, and she unraveled
with another sob. This time, he ran his fingers down her back, his forehead
resting just below her navel, his breathing fast and light. God. Her fingers
tightened around the fistful of hair she still held. Nick—
“Please.” She squeezed her eyes shut. “Please.”
“This is mine.”
“Oh god.”
“You are mine.”
“Nick—”
“I could kill him.”
The words, as clear and bright as winter ice, were impossible to
misunderstand. But Jay did, blinking rapidly as the hazy fog of her orgasm
rapidly dispersed.
“W-what?”
“Your fucking ex.”
Every bead of sweat went cold against her skin. “No,” she said, edging
back from him, knowing even as she did that it was only because he was
letting her. “Don’t say things like that. Not even as a joke. It isn’t funny.”
“No, what’s funny is that he thinks he can talk to you like you’re a
high-priced escort.” He looked up at her thunderously. “Is that what
happened? Did he touch you?”
“No! It wasn’t like that.” She grabbed for her jeans, hitching them up
her hips. “Nick, it’s not just him. It’s this whole town. Everywhere I go, it
feels like people are looking at me. Judging me. Judging us. At the gala—”
She hesitated, the sharpness of his words—I could kill him—making her
change direction. “People see a man like you with a woman like me and
they—”
“What?” His voice was low, dangerous. He was still on his knees but
his eyes—oh, god, his eyes. She goaded him into being cruel, taunted him
into punishing her, and now she was no longer certain if he was playing or
if it would even be her blood on the line. Not with eyes like that.
“They don’t think you’re letting me stay here for free,” she finished
warily.
The dark gleam in his eyes winked out. He got up, dusting off his pants
as she tugged her clothes back into place. Now that he was no longer
touching her, she was more keenly aware of how well he weaponized his
size and stature, and how easily he wielded both against her.
It bothered her how much she sometimes liked it when she did.
She did not want to be just another possession. Even if it was a prized
one, put in a place of honor. Possessions could be thrown out like old
clocks. Just because she liked surrendering control during sex, that didn’t
mean she wanted to be a submissive wife.
“Do you understand?” she pressed, when he didn’t speak.
“Perfectly.” He licked his fingers in a way that made her falter as he
tilted his head towards the hall. “My room. Now.”
“Tell me you’re not going to do anything stupid to Michael.”
His eyes narrowed. When he lunged, she didn’t even have time to
dodge. He swung all five feet, ten inches of her up in his arms before she
even had time to react or scream. That came in a belated burst as he carried
her down the hall and up the stairs like a brute, kicking the door to the
master bedroom open in blind haste, before tossing her down on the
mattress roughly enough that she felt the memory foam kick up against her
back.
He crossed his arms and tugged his shirt over his head, balling it off to
the side. Catching her glance, he undid the button of his fly and dragged
down the zipper.
“Take your clothes off. All of them. I don’t want to hear his name
again.”
Jay stared at him as he waited, then glanced at the door. They had
played out this game before—if she ran, he would chase her; if she fought
him, he would hold her down. The line of consent ran so thinly between
them that sometimes, Jay couldn’t see where it was at all.
Still on the bed, she squirmed out of her pants and underwear, heat
suffusing her face when he didn’t look away. “I didn’t even sleep with
him,” she said, gripping the hem of her star-printed tank top before pulling
that off, too.
“I know.”
She unhooked her bra, folding her arms. A cold shiver snaked down her
naked back as he walked closer. Her heart rate kicked up another notch
when he reached beneath the bed and took out the handcuffs. When he
pulled her hands away from her chest and nudged her backwards with the
heel of his hand against her ribs, she felt like her stomach had gone into a
heated freefall.
She stared at the ceiling as he shackled her to the wooden posts with
their detailed bevels and scrolls. This part was always gentle, even if what
came after it wasn’t. After fastening her left hand, he pressed a kiss to the
back of it, as he had done so many other times before while restraining her.
“Why do you do that?” she asked suddenly.
“This?” He leaned over to kiss the back of her hand again, this time
letting his teeth catch on her skin before pulling away. “Because I think
you’re sweet.”
Sweet. The word felt like a thorn in her throat. People had called her
that in high school, but it felt like a status that could be revoked at any time.
Every time Michael had asked—pleaded, really—for her to sleep with him,
she had said no, terrified that if word got out, she wouldn’t be the sweet
girl. She’d be the girl who did those things. The sort of girl whose name got
carved into bathroom stalls and blew boys beneath the bleachers.
You’re just like your mother, part of her brain had always whispered.
When she let her stepbrother fuck her while wearing his dead mother’s
diamonds, that voice had been deafening. It had screamed, Good girls don’t
take off their clothes for men.
“I’m not sweet,” said Jay.
“You are.” She jumped when Nicholas swung over her hips. The coarse
hair on his chest and thighs prickled against her sensitive skin as he leaned
down, using his weight to push her into the bed. He bent to one of her
nipples, biting gently. “You’re the sweetest girl I know.”
“No,” said Jay.
He glanced at her before turning to her other breast. “I bet he thinks so,
too. Probably while jerking off to the pure little angel he secretly hopes you
still are.”
Jay clenched her hands, forcing herself to take a deep breath. To not
arch into that kiss that stung like a bruise. “Why are you so jealous?”
“Why shouldn’t I be?” Nicholas swirled his tongue over the skin he’d
bitten, now tight with gooseflesh. Jay heard the tear of a condom wrapper,
followed by a sound of low, masculine pleasure as he entered her on an
agonizingly slow thrust. “He had you when I didn’t.” His hand slid down to
grip her hip, biting into the girdle of bone. “You were his.”
“I didn’t sleep with him.”
Her voice came out harsher than she’d intended, and his eyes lifted. His
expression scared her and she pulled nervously at her restraints. When he
was naked, she could sense the untrammeled power that hummed beneath
his skin; the tension he carried in those powerful shoulders and those long,
strong legs. Some men looked smaller without their clothes.
Nicholas looked bigger.
Jay shut her eyes, breathing harder as his hand shifted to her hair,
pushing the loose strands out of her face before caressing her cheek, her
chin.
It’s what you’re here for.
“You’re shaking.” His thumb trailed over her lip. “You don’t want to
look at me?”
Of all the things he could have said to her, this was what broke her
wide open.
The sound she made gave him pause. And then he sighed. “Shhh.
Relax, little bird. I’m very close. You don’t have to do anything.”
Adrenaline shot through her veins, and she was still heady from that
potent rush of fear when his lips crushed against hers, making her gasp into
his mouth at the next hard stroke.
“That’s it—” He traced her jaw possessively. “You’re so beautiful.”
No, thought Jay. I don’t want to be. Eyes still shut, she turned her head,
this time tilting it back in invitation, and only someone who was very
familiar with his body would have noticed the brief pause before he
collared her throat with his fingers.
“No,” she said, shuddering. “Daddy, no—”
He groaned, and pressed his mouth to her temple. The heavy weight of
him was smothering, and Jay gasped as he finished inside her, his body
covering hers completely. She could feel the thrum of his heartbeat against
her breast.
There was nothing to hide now, not like this. Not with that familiar
ache blooming in her belly as he took what he wanted from her, the most
satisfying lover she’d ever had. And the cruelest.
The cruelest thing he’d ever done, though, was telling her that he loved
her.
She opened her eyes and saw him watching her. His pupils were large
and dark, nearly eclipsing the grey. He was still inside her, and she was
struck, suddenly, by his closeness, and how neatly his body aligned with her
own from chest to hip. She could feel his heart pounding.
His mouth tilted into something too somber and severe for a smile, and
he nipped gently at her earlobe before kissing her ear. “Who do you belong
to?”
Jay parted her lips and felt him reverently trace their shape. His fingers
still tasted like her.
“You, Daddy.”

Chapter Two

“You seem distracted.”
Jay pushed her hair out of her eyes and looked away from the far-toomany tabs she had open. “Hi, Arthur. No, I’m fine. I’m just—” burned out
from playing society darling? Sore from fucking my stepbrother? Her eyes
skated over the jar of candies on her desk, the mug that said ‘World’s Best
Cat Aunt.’ “—busy,” she finished lamely. “Did you need something?”
His smile was horribly sympathetic. “You missed our two o’ clock.”
But that meeting isn’t until two, she thought nonsensically. She swerved
to look at her open calendar and there it was, highlighted in red. Arthur &
Jay: 2PM.
“Oh god,” she said. “It’s two-thirty. I’m so, so sorry—”
“It’s all right, Jay.” He glanced at Annica, who was pretending she
wasn’t listening. “There wasn’t really anything we needed to go over
anyway, and I was thinking about canceling it.”
Jay didn’t believe that for a minute. “It won’t happen again.”
“Even the best workers deserve a day off.”
“You’re right. I’ll be sure to do that as soon as I have the time.” A time
when I haven’t just royally screwed up. “Thank you for letting me know.”
His smile turned slightly wry. “You sound like Nicholas. No wonder
you got along so well. You’re cut from the same cloth. The two of you
would both work yourselves right into the grave, given the proper
incentive.”
Jay stared at the back of his suit as he strolled back towards his corner
office on the second floor. Cut from the same cloth? she wondered, stunned.
Nicholas?
She could see him on the phone with a client, elbows splayed on his
desk. As she watched, he reached one-handed for his coffee cup, only to set
it down in a way that suggested he’d forgotten it was empty.
I guess Annica still doesn’t ‘do’ coffee, she thought, smiling
unconsciously.
Just as quickly as it surfaced, her smile faded.
It had been forty-eight days since he’d shown up at her job in San
Francisco to blackmail her into coming back. Two weeks since he’d
proposed to her in that empty mall.
Three days since their fight.
Cut from the same cloth was a funny choice of words, since even
though they shared no blood, they’d been raised together like brother and
sister.
When she shot down his first attempt to complicate their relationship
further, he had taken the rejection personally. He had become obsessive,
dangerous.
Her own personal tormentor.
For a whole summer, she’d been at his mercy—which was unfortunate,
because he had none. He had taken her innocence and then, later, her soul.
Now, he was after her heart, as well.
When he had shown up in her life again, she had been terrified that he
was going to humiliate her as revenge for her leaving all those years ago.
His little blackmail mistress, take two. But, confusingly, he had given her a
job. And rather than chase her around the desk like she feared, he had been
a consummate professional about it.
Professional, but not nice, no. As his assistant, he’d kept her running
around the office, getting his coffee, but also handling client files and
sourcing out new clientele. She’d never had that much responsibility at her
previous job and even now, working under Arthur, she often found her pace
of work to be rather slow. With Nicholas, he had forced her to rise to the
challenge. To prove to him—and herself—that she wouldn’t just roll over in
defeat.
It had never been enough for him to have her on her back, after all.
Her face heated and she looked down at her lap.
She’d slept with him every night this week.
They didn’t exactly advertise their relationship but people talked. Just
the other day, a group of women had been in the breakroom gossiping about
how Nicholas went through assistants as if they were disposable.
“He’s had three secretaries this year! Can you believe it?”
“Maybe he’s screwing them and paying them off.”
“Madison!” The third woman’s eyes darted in Jay’s direction.
They had laughed the nervous laughs of people who knew they’d gone
too far when they realized she was in the room.
“Good morning, Jay,” the third one had said, too brightly, while the
others stared into their coffee, and Jay had said, “Hello,” in what she hoped
sounded like the voice of someone who would never screw her employer.
Despite what he thought, he would resent her if she ended up costing
him his job or turning him into a joke. Maybe he didn’t think he would now,
while the bloom was still on the rose, but she knew better than anyone how
quickly love could turn to resentment or even outright loathing as soon as
you were no longer what the other person wanted.
She was going to have to give him an answer at some point. She just
didn’t know what to do. He saw her in a way that nobody else did, with a
clarity that often felt obscene. She didn’t have to pretend with him but that
sort of honesty came with strings that tied you down, and after years of
seeing her mother wither under the control of his father, she was reluctant to
give Nicholas the same power over her if it meant a tragic ending.
He said he’d wait for me. So why do I feel like I’m running out of time?
Across the room, she saw Nicholas get up from his desk and jog down
the stairs. She sat up. Her panic mounted as he headed in her direction, but
instead of speaking to her dead on, he circled around behind her. A sudden
pressure on the back of her chair suggested that he was casually resting one
or both arms there. If she leaned even slightly back, her head would touch
his chest.
“What—” she began, only to fall short as he spoke past her, to Annica.
“Did you get the files I sent you?”
Annica lifted off her headphones while Jay stared very hard at her
screen. “Yeah.” The other woman glanced in her direction and did a slow
double-take. “I haven’t looked at them yet. Can I review them by the end of
the day?”
“I’d prefer it be done as soon as possible.” The nape of her neck
prickled as Nicholas began to toy with a curl of her hair. “I need it for the
investors I’m meeting with at four.”
The screen blurred in front of her eyes. Oh my god.
He caught himself before she could bring herself to say something,
clothing rustling as he straightened. The chair resettled with a squeak that
seemed too loud. “Can you take care of it?”
Annica stared over Jay’s shoulder. “I’ll do it now.”
“Good.”
Not trusting herself to speak, Jay got up from her chair abruptly,
drawing both their eyes as she headed for the bathroom. One look in a
mirror revealed that her cheeks were flushed and she cursed, quickly
locking herself away in one of the stalls as she tried to calm down.
Shit, shit, shit, shit.
Two women entered while Jay deleted the text message she had started
to type out to Nicholas, that began, You promised you wouldn’t touch me in
the office.
She knew what he would say. It’s not like I bent you over the desk in
front of Accounting.
The exterior doors swung open with a bang. Jay let her hand fall back
from the stall door as a group of women walked in, talking so loudly that
their voices echoed off the tile.
“What time are we meeting for drinks tonight?”
“Five on the dot. Stacey’s been after me all day for not meeting quota
last week. At this rate, I’m going to be double-fisting before seven.”
“Stacey’s not so bad. Steve Jensen’s a lot worse and I heard Mr.
Beaucroft actually made someone scream. Security had to escort her out.”
“I wouldn’t mind if he made me scream. He’s fine as hell. I can’t
believe he isn’t married.” The women got into adjoining stalls, several rows
down. “Speaking of, who’s the woman he comes in with every morning?”
Jay froze.
“What woman? I’ve only ever seen him come in alone.”
“They drive in together. He waits in the car for like five minutes and
comes in after her. It’s weird. They leave together, too. One night I forgot
my purse and security had to let me in after hours. When I passed by the
window, I saw him leaving—with her.”
“Ohhh, I know who you’re talking about. Tall? Curly hair? That’s his
sister—Kay.”
“The secretary?” The first woman scoffed. “They don’t look related.”
“Not his real sister. His stepsister. Their whole family is super weird.
Supposedly the mom was some kind of porn star and the dad was in a sex
scandal.”
“And how would you know that? You didn’t even move here until like
a year ago.”
“There’s this guy who comes into the bar where my sister works at.
Some creep they went to school with who won’t shut up about the glory
days.” Her scoff echoed like a reprimand. “When he’s not busy hitting on
older women, he says that Mr. Beaucroft was always super possessive of his
sister. In, like, a really weird way.”
“Well, I wouldn’t go around telling people that.” The stall door
slammed closed. Jay heard the sound of running water. “I heard he just got
out of a lawsuit. You could be next.”
“Yeah? Good luck with that. I can barely afford rent.” Their heels
echoed off the floor. “I hope they actually remember to charge us happy
hour prices this time,” the other woman said, her voice fading. “Make sure
Mary-Beth pays up this time. I can’t drop twenty dollars apiece on drinks
again. Maybe the dives have it right—even if they are full of sad creeps
with mommy issues.”
The door swung shut with a bang and Jay was alone.
She washed her hands and went back to her desk, blinking under the
too-bright lights. Someone said hello to her and all she could manage was a
wave and a tight smile. “In, like, a really weird way.” She couldn’t get the
woman’s snide, knowing tone out of her mind.
The rest of the day passed in a sort of fugue. She found herself
listening in on conversations, wondering how many other employees had
suspicions about the real nature of her and Nicholas’s relationship. When
Arthur told her to have a good evening, briefcase in hand, she jumped.
Annica had already quietly slipped away and now, except for Nicholas—
and Arthur—she was all alone.
“Don’t work too late,” Arthur said. “Remember what I said, Jay. Even
the brightest stars only work half the day.”
Actually, stars never stop burning until they die.
Jay waved goodbye, glancing up at Nicholas’s office. He’d turned his
light off but she could see him in silhouette doing something on his
computer in the dark. She wondered how that meeting with his investors
had gone. HR had been keeping a tight rein on him after his misconduct.
I should ask him. She dug for her phone in her purse, wondering if
there had been a text since she’d last checked. He usually told her how late
he was going to be. Jay didn’t mind waiting, though. The later he was, the
fewer people there were around to see them leave.
She did have a new message, but it wasn’t from Nicholas. It was from
her mother.
How can you treat your own mother like this? You used to be such a
good girl.
You selfish, ungrateful little brat.
Nicholas had threatened to bankrupt her mother, who didn’t have the
funds to fight him in court. Her mother had pleaded with her to intercede on
her behalf, which made Jay wonder how much she really knew about what
had really gone on between her and her stepbrother.
Had she known what he’d had done to her and sold her out, regardless?
It was a terrible thought, but one she kept coming back to, over and over
again. No, ‘hi, how are you, how did it go?’ It was as if she didn’t want to
know the details.
Or, Jay thought, with a little twist in her heart, as if she knows them
already.
Nicholas had offered her ten million dollars to stay with him forever.
She bitterly wondered what her mother would do if she found out that she
refused the money.
“Jay?”
She jumped guilty, hand tightening as she unconsciously tilted the
screen towards her chest. Nicholas was holding his briefcase in one hand
and his car keys in the other, standing just a little too close. She backed
away in her wheeled chair so his hips weren’t quite so level with her face.
“H-hey.”
“Hey.” He looked a little tired around the eyes. As a concession to the
lateness of the hour, his tie was gone and he had a bit of five o’ clock
shadow. “Ready to go?”
“Yes.” She began to gather her things, the words super possessive
volleying through her mind as he loomed over her. “Just let me lock my
computer.”
Nicholas pulled out his phone while he waited. “Who were you
texting?”
“It’s my mother. She’s been after me all week. I haven’t responded.”
“Good.” He tapped something on his phone. “Don’t.”
“I think she’s still fixated on the money.”
“Of course she is. You’re such a good little investment opportunity.”
“Don’t talk about me like that, like I’m tradable. I know you hate her
but don’t diminish me like that to do it.”
The ice in his eyes thawed a little, although his mouth remained a solid
line. She wondered if he was thinking about his proposal. If so, he wouldn’t
bring it up here. He was far too proud to let any of his peons be privy to
even the slightest chance of rejection.
“It was a slight against your mother,” he said, a little coolly. “Not you.”
“I know what you meant. You think I’m a pushover just because I don’t
announce my anger to the room the way you do. I can handle my mother.”
By avoiding all her calls.
Nicholas slid his phone back into his pocket. She couldn’t read his
expression at all now. When he wanted to, he could make himself
unreachable.
“If you’re finished, we can go,” he said.
“Fine,” she said tautly.
She started walking, hitching her purse up her shoulder as they passed
the silent rows of dark monitors. The sharpness of his gestures suggested he
was irritated. That made two of them.
Nicholas punched the alarm code for the door. “I thought we’d grab
dinner on the way home. I didn’t have time to eat today and I don’t believe
you did, either.”
Still annoyed, she said, struggling to keep her voice civil, “Where did
you have in mind?”
He closed the door. The parking lot was frosted in orange from the
streetlights. Crickets chirped in the bushes and she could hear the distant
roar of the freeway. His Tesla was the only car in the lot. She edged a little
closer as they approached his car in the darkness.
“Accia,” he said.
The most expensive and visible restaurant in town? Jay nearly
protested, then thought better of it. In his current mood, he’d only take it as
the start of another fight.
He might even be trying to start one now.
For a man who had over ten million dollars, a $100 dinner was just
0.001% of his total assets. A far more comfortable indulgence than someone
like her—who had perhaps $30,000 to her name, including her 401k—
could fathom, when a $6 burrito was 0.02% of her total net worth.
She worried that Nicholas had done a similar calculation in his mind.
That some of these latest efforts of his weren’t just courtship attempts, they
were a buy-out.
“Accia’s fine,” she said, suspecting this would annoy him.
“They have a new vegan carpaccio.” He started the engine without
looking at her, but there was tension in the tanned skin of his face. “It’s
made with watermelon radishes and beetroot, with an almond butter and
soy yogurt sauce.”
She felt herself falling into the silence that followed and gripped her
battered old purse as if it were a lifeline. He was looking at her, as if for her
approval.
Let him take care of you. The voice sounded like her mother’s. It would
be easy, and he wants to. Would it really be so bad?
“Did they pay you to write their ad copy, too?”
“No, blue jay.” He sounded amused, even though her attempt at lightheartedness came out sounding flat and hostile. “I just know you too well.”
The car hit a divot and his ring bounced off her collarbone, striking her
sharply on the chin.
“Great,” she said again. “I can’t wait.”
Of course it will be easy. And as soon as it becomes hard to love me,
he’ll stop.
Nicholas parked the car. They were downtown and he’d parked on one
of the less busy streets. They were far from the glowing street lamps
throwing Main Street in a constant blaze and the neon sign from a closed
sushi bar was the only source of light, the red neon gleaming off his profile.
“What’s gotten into you?”
“I’m fine.”
He leaned over the center console—as if he were going to check, she
thought, hysterically. His palm slid up her leg, calluses catching on the thin
silk. He snapped the strap of her stockings against her inner thigh. “Stop
saying ‘fine.’You’re not fine. Is this about your mother?”
She tugged her skirt down. Over his hand, because he didn’t move it.
Her stomach felt like it was going into freefall. “No. I missed a meeting
with Arthur, that’s all.”
Nicholas didn’t look convinced. “An unimportant one?”
“That’s not the point. I’ve been distracted, making mistakes. I don’t
want—”
Her voice broke off when she felt him touch her through her
underwear.
He doesn’t care about your problems. He just wants to fuck his
mistress.
“Come here,” he said.
She leaned reluctantly into the wavering band of neon separating them.
In the shadows, his mouth curved before he closed the rest of the distance.
Oh god, thought Jay, gripping him tightly by the back of his neck as he
tugged her bra down through her blouse. Cool watery silk rubbed against
her bare skin, sending a pleasurable frisson of sensation to her nipples.
“Tell me what’s wrong, little bird.” Nicholas spoke against her mouth,
squeezing her breast and kissing her so deeply that responding became
impossible. She felt him begin to undo the small buttons of her blouse.
“Why are you distracted?”
Because of you. She thought of those women, and the way that Angie
had looked at her with such dry, knowing amusement.
They were probably envisioning something exactly like this.
“I feel like such a failure,” she sobbed.
“You’re not a failure.”
“Then why do I feel so awful?”
“I don’t know.” Her skirt had ridden up again, exposing her garters. He
put his hand on her upper thigh. The pressure of the seat on her swollen clit
made her shift her hips as he bent to her again, pushing her shirt open as his
lips grazed her bare throat. “Maybe I can kiss it better.”
An unsteady breath left her just as a shadow floated over the car and
she realized, with a cold wash of horror, how shameful she looked with her
legs splayed, skirt pulled up to her hips, blouse undone. What if someone
was out there watching, while she was offering herself up to him like a—
her brain short-circuited as she felt his breath stir against her exposed left
breast.
(slutty girl)
She sat up, their heads nearly colliding as she tugged her bra back into
place. Undeterred, his mouth brushed over her jawline, down the side of her
neck. She felt the soft pressure of a bite as his fingers slipped into the leg of
her panties. And then, a harder one as he slid inside her.
“Don’t!” She gripped his chin, lifted it. He had her necklace between
his teeth. The sight sent an arrow of desire shooting through her belly.
“Don’t do that. Not here.”
The ring thudded against her chest, still damp. “It might relax you a
little.”
“I’m plenty relaxed!”
“Sure you are, blue jay.”
“This isn’t a game.” She wished she didn’t sound so breathless.
“People talk about us. I’ve heard them discussing us living together and
how we get out of the same car every morning.”
His amused smile disappeared. “Who the fuck is talking about that?”
“I don’t know all their names.” She was afraid to mention the women
she’d seen at work earlier. His face was starting to shift into an anger she
recognized all too well. The potential for violence ran through him like a
dark river. “People.”
“People like your old friends?”
“What? No.” She’d denied it too quickly. He looked predatory now.
“Nicholas, it wasn’t Michael and Angie.”
“Jay,” he said warningly.
“I don’t want to discuss this. Let’s just go have a nice dinner and forget
we ever did.” She reached for her shirt buttons, her fingers fumbling. “We
can still salvage the evening.”
“Someone said something that upset you and I want to know who it
was.”
You know what he really wants. That voice was back, shrill and
mocking. Distract him.
“Nicholas,” she said, too loudly, a warning as much for herself as him.
“Drop it.”
“Was it someone at work?”
“No.”
“I don’t believe you.”
“Then it doesn’t matter.” She saw his chest hitch slightly as she pulled
her hair back and out of the way, fastening it with a clip from her purse. “I
shouldn’t have brought it up.”
“Jay,” he said, a growl in it this time. But he was getting distracted,
watching her hands. “I am trying to talk to you.”
“What if we didn’t talk at all?”
She wrapped her fingers around the sizable bulge in his wool trousers.
He was big enough that she knew to pull back on the zipper, as well as
down, so she wouldn’t catch skin.
“What if I did this instead?”
“Jay,” he said again, in a thick, tight voice.
They were close enough that she felt his breath stutter when she grazed
the veiny shaft of his cock. He filled her hand when she wrapped her fingers
around him and traced the entire length, from the wrinkled, velvety base, all
the way up to the slick, blunt head. She saw his teeth clench as a shiver
rolled through his massive shoulders.
“For fuck’s sake—”
“Yes, Daddy?” She leaned closer and he stared at her helplessly. “Do
you want me?”
His hips jerked. A strange, almost glazed look descended over his face
as she used her wrist to further part his fly. She managed to get his pants
half-open and had only just begun to lower her head to his lap, before he
yanked her hand away, fingers biting into the underside of her wrist.
It hurt, but when she tried to pull away, his hand tightened until it felt
like a shackle.
“What the fuck are you doing?” he demanded harshly.
Jay licked her lips and saw his eyes register the movement. “I was
going to suck your cock,” she said, the words hard and unfamiliar in her
mouth.
“You were—Jesus fucking Christ.” A bead of pre-come rolled from the
head of his cock to his frenulum, sliding down his shaft, only to soak into
his fly. “Fuck,” he hissed. “Goddamn it.”
“Nick—”
He shook his head viciously. She saw his chest rise and fall in quick
succession. With a grimace, he adjusted himself in a way that was
fascinatingly vulgar before zipping his pants back up. The way he released
her felt like a reprimand. “Get out of the car, Justine. Now.”
Her full name hit like a slap falling off his lips.
Look what you did. You pissed him off.
But another part of her whispered, He’s even better when he’s forceful,
isn’t he?
Jay slid out of the Tesla, shivering a little at the bite of the cold. She
pressed her lips together, determined to endure the chill, but Nicholas
noticed. He noticed everything.
With a face like stone, he shrugged out of his suit jacket and draped the
warm wool around her shoulders. “Thank you,” Jay said, in a small voice,
and something sharp lodged in her throat when he didn’t respond, turning to
lock the car. Without a word, he closed his fingers around her bicep and
steered her firmly towards the sidewalk.
“Nicholas—”
“Don’t.” The word fell into the silence like ice in a glass.
She glanced at the bulge tenting his slacks and said nothing, hating that
she felt so guilty now when, once, none of this had felt like it was her fault
at all. By the time they had gotten to the restaurant, he was calmer, and even
managed to dredge up a smile for the hostess that didn’t reach his eyes. But
Jay could feel the tension in his body and knew this was far from over.

He was finally nearing the end of his fucking company-mandated
“sensitivity training.” For several hours a week, they locked him in a room
with a bunch of sad old men who had gotten caught playing grab-ass with
their secretaries where they watched PSA videos featuring third-rate
Hollywood actors and sat through apology tour seminars with guest
speakers who talked about “microaggressions” and “accountability” while
he discreetly checked his phone whenever the proctor turned away to adjust
the tracking on the VHS player or hand out quizzes.
He had been furious when one of Meghana’s flunkies had floated the
idea of him taking on a consulting position. The man even had the balls to
bring up his father, as if what he had done was on the same scale. He had
gotten up and left the room, because he knew that if he stayed, something—
or someone—was getting tossed from the second-story window.
The meeting with today’s investors had been the first time in weeks
that he’d been allowed out of his cage. He’d been surprised by how much it
exhausted him. As he listened to their various pitches, while Annica took
notes for him to review for later, he could barely bring himself to pay
attention. Why should he? He’d heard it all before. Everyone thought their
mission statement was the most important. They all believed that they were
entitled to his money.
Nicholas cast a sullen eye towards Jay, who was sipping her blueberry
mimosa. Her hair was mussed from his fingers. Even now, just thinking
about her stockinged thighs was getting him hot.
Yes, Daddy?
His jaw clenched so hard that pain rocketed down the side of his face.
“It’s not too crowded for dinner,” she said, lips parting into wavering
little smile, like she hadn’t just offered to blow him with that mouth.
He stared at her. The smile flickered and she squirmed in her seat,
looking so guilty that he would have been amused if she weren’t the reason
for the throbbing ache in his pants.
“I, um, meant to ask earlier. How did your meeting go?”
“Probably as well as you think it did.” He leaned back in his chair,
spreading his thighs to relieve some of the godawful pressure.
She licked some sugar from the rim of the glass and another ache
speared through his belly as he thought once more of the blowjob he’d
denied himself. “Was it really that bad?”
“You remember what my meetings were like. Wealthy men,
approaching hands-out, wanting to trade money for money. Then we all try
to brutally fuck each other until someone yields.” He shifted in his seat
impatiently. “The negotiation process never changes. Just the stakes.”
A veiled look settled over her eyes. “That’s crude. I thought you were
good at it.”
“I am.” He scrubbed his unshaven face with his hand. “But I think I’m
losing my taste for it.”
The waiter arrived with their appetizers. Jay had gotten a mustard
greens salad with a vegan coconut cream dressing and he had ordered
braised scallops.
“I’m sorry to hear that,” she said, and he found himself watching the
way her lips folded over each bite. “I thought you liked your work. I
admired that about you, actually. Seeing how you turned yourself around to
manage your father’s company—it was impressive.”
The scallop on his tongue felt as heavy as lead. He forced himself to
swallow and took a long, bracing drink of wine. “I’m sorry to have
disappointed you again, then.”
“Oh, Nick, no. That wasn’t what I meant.”
Wasn’t it? He set down his fork and knife, leaning back to let the waiter
refill his wine. He had to strongarm her into being seen with him in public.
She wouldn’t touch him unless they were both alone, in the dark. What was
that, if not shame?
His eyes went to the ring that she had started wearing around her
slender neck. The little rhinestones twinkled in the dim lights so fetchingly
that he found himself longing to see it on her finger. But he knew her
silence on the matter meant he wouldn’t like what was going on in her head.
It had been weeks since he had proposed. Fucking weeks.
How long did she plan on making him wait?
“So what I’m hearing is that your meeting was bad and you had to deal
with some people you didn’t like.” She tilted her head. “Did anything else
happen today?”
“Your landlord called. He’s giving you thirty days’ notice before he
sells the place.”
“My landlord? For my apartment in San Francisco?”
“Yeah, seems like there was a rent hike and he wants to cut and run.”
He picked up his wine, watching her over the rim. “Looks like you’ll be
needing somewhere more permanent to stay.”
“Why did he call you? How does he have your number?”
“Because I bought out your lease. I told you I would.”
“Yes, but I didn’t think you’d actually gone through with it. You never
mentioned it again.” Her face became troubled. “When were you going to
tell me you owned my apartment?”
Anger flickered through him. “I didn’t want you to worry about it while
you were here.”
“Did you forget why I’m here in the first place?”
There was an ugly silence. He watched her chest rise and fall beneath
that prim little blouse, and it shouldn’t have turned him on, seeing her so
pissed at him. But it did.
Whatever she’d been trying to do in the car, this was all her. The real
her.
It made him want to push her further.
“I was going to pay ten million dollars just to fuck you, Jay. That
should give you an idea of how ‘forgettable’ I think you are.”
She went rigid and he was immediately sorry.
“Ma’am? Your plate?” The waiter took in the alarm on her pretty face,
and quickly became ingratiating. “I didn’t mean to startle you. Are you
finished? Can I take this away?”
Jay nodded tightly. The waiter hovered, asking if she wanted another
drink, if the meal was to her liking. Jay said yes, with an edge of defiance
that he knew was intended for him.
“You’re being very cruel,” she said, when the waiter finally left. It was
all she said, but he felt the sting of it like a lash, all the momentary
satisfaction he’d felt flaking away like factory paint on fake leather. It made
him feel worse—and that made him angry.
“You started this in the car.”
Their main courses came before she could reply. Her vegan carpaccio
looked like a Jackson Pollock painting, with bright circles of root
vegetables drizzled in sauce. His own plate of sea bass looked rather staid
and dull by comparison, even with its overabundance of herb garnishes.
“You’re right.” She spoke stiffly. “I don’t know what I was thinking.”
“I think we both know what you were thinking.”
She looked away, color suffusing her face. “Is there a point to this
conversation? Or did you take me out to dinner just to fight?”
“Marry me,” he said.
“I’m sorry, what?”
“Marry me. I’m so fucking tired of this. I’m tired of waiting. I’m tired
of having to sneak around. Say yes to me. I want you to be my wife.”
“I told you I needed to think about my answer.”
“It’s a yes or no question.”
“Marriage is a lifetime commitment,” she said. “And it’s supposed to
be a partnership between two equals. Equals, Nick. I’m not so sure you see
me that way. Not when you treat me the way you do, like I’m an object you
can just move around as you please.”
“I don’t see you as an object. I can afford to take care of you. There’s a
difference.”
“But I don’t expect you to take care of me. I don’t want to be a kept
woman and spend the whole day at the historical society or the salon. I’m
not my mother.”
He laughed humorlessly. “Finally, we agree on something.”
Jay set her jaw. “See? That right there. You have so much disrespect for
other women. I don’t like it. I don’t want you talking about me like that.”
“You could dance topless on every stage from here to Vegas, little bird,
and you’d still have more class in your little finger than that dried up old c
—” Catching the dark expression on her face, he cut himself off. “The
bottom line is, I’m not looking for an armpiece I can shut away in a drawer.
I’m not my father. I want someone who can keep up with me, challenge me.
Someone who cries for dying planets she’ll never see. I want you.” I always
have.
She looked down at her lap. “It’s not that simple.”
“Yes, it is.” Even though he’d lost his taste for it, he dipped a piece of
fish in its pool of lemon butter. “How’s the carpaccio? Do you like it?”
“It’s very good.” She sighed. “But you don’t have to give me things to
make me like you.”
He flinched and despised himself for it, because it felt like she’d won.
“So we’re going to argue about the nail salon again, now?”
“It wasn’t just a nail salon. You got me a $20,000 dollar makeover that
I didn’t want and then you paraded me around in front of all your rich
friends as if I were a brand-new car.”
“And did you hate it?” he pressed. “When I clasped that necklace
around your throat and you walked into that party on my arm, can you
honestly tell me that part of you didn’t take to it as easily as breathing
because you belong here just as much as I do?”
Jay didn’t respond.
But she didn’t need to, because he remembered that night perfectly.
Until she’d decided to hide, she had been graceful and stunning. And when
they had danced together—completely respectably—while the other guests
looked on none the wiser, he had studied her in that shimmering dress that
poured over her curves like tropical water and thought, this, forever.
He reclined in the chair, slinging an arm over the back. “What is it
that’s really bothering you, Jay? Do you think I’m trying to mold you into a
trophy wife? Do you think I’m not going to let you work? If you want to
continue to be Arthur’s assistant while you’re with me, that’s entirely up to
you. It really makes no difference to me.”
“You didn’t used to believe that.”
“I’ve changed. I can enjoy fucking you and buying you things—”
“Nicholas—”
“—and still see you as my equal,” he finished. “I know you’re not after
my money. You’ve proven it time and again. But that doesn’t mean that
you’re not free to enjoy it. I like seeing you happy. And,” he paused, “you
deserve to be.”
Her face softened and he felt that tightness in his chest ease.
But then she said, “So if a woman marries a man for his money, she’s
not his equal?”
“Oh, for fuck’s sake.” He slammed down his wineglass, splashing a
few drops on the white tablecloth. “We’ll get a pre-nup if it bothers you that
much, though I don’t see why it should even be relevant. I’ll give you
whatever you want.”
“It’s relevant because my being equal to you is apparently contingent
on this completely arbitrary pedestal of virtue you’ve put me on.”
“There is no pedestal. You won’t even wear my fucking ring. Not
properly.” He let out a heavy breath. “Maybe we shouldn’t even be having
this discussion. It hardly matters what we do or don’t do if your answer is
going to be no.”
“I haven’t said no. I just need time to think. Surely, after everything
you’ve put me through, you can give me that?” She glanced at him, her face
hot and flushed. He sipped his wine and decided not to answer. Jay, looking
sorry herself now, said, “How was training?”
“Wonderful,” he said flatly. “They lectured us about microaggressions
and then handed us all little dollies and told us about personal bubbles like
we were all in fucking kindergarten.”
“Sensitivity training isn’t a joke, Nicholas.”
“Could have fooled me.” He topped off his wineglass, deciding he
wasn’t drunk enough for this conversation. “They suggested I step down.”
Her face fell. “God, I’m so sorry. You really are good at your job—
even if you are a callous toad.” She toyed with her necklace absently, which
had him remembering how her breasts looked bathed in neon as the silver
flared with red sparks. Her eyes flicked up to his. “Is that why you’re in
such a weird mood? Are you angry at the board and taking it out on me?”
Nicholas pushed his plate away. “Our VP of Operations resigned.
Arthur and I are picking up the slack for now. It was only just announced to
the other executives. Officially, it’s because she wanted to ‘change her
career path,’ but really, she has an issue with how I handle my business.”
Jay pressed her lips together. “She doesn’t like your fuck or get-fucked
approach?”
“Something like that. But the board liked her. They like that new
marketing director who’s driving me crazy, too. The first thing that dick-forbrains did was march into my office and demand to see all of our OKRs
from the last ten years. I had Annica make him copies of the files and leave
them in his office. I’m waiting to see how long it takes before he comes
crawling back to me and admits he can’t make heads or tails of them
without context.”
Jay gave him an exasperated look but the corners of her mouth were
twitching. I saw that, he thought, and the tightness of his lungs finally
abated. “You’re such a bastard.”
“We can’t all be sweetness and light like you.”
“Instead of fighting with people below your paygrade, why don’t you
at least pretend like you’ve learned something from your training? Humble
yourself a little. Pilot a company initiative to put the spotlight on some of
your diverse staff or implement some culture workshops. Then tell HR that
you got the idea because of them. They’ll fall over backwards with joy.”
Nicholas paused. “That’s brilliant.”
“You don’t have to sound so surprised.”
“I’m not surprised that it’s brilliant. I’m surprised that you can be so
calculating.”
“I guess I’ve changed, too.”
Nicholas watched her swirl her mimosa glass, catching one of the little
blueberries in a vortex. You have, he thought. And every fucking day, you
make me more and more in love with you.
“What are you going to do about your apartment?”
“I don’t know. Hire a mover? It’s just something else to deal with. I’ll
figure it out.”
A prickle of irritation crept down his neck as he wondered if he was
one of the things she felt like she had to “deal with.” “Take some days off to
handle it, then.”
“I can’t miss work.”
“You have PTO. Arthur can manage on his own—he has before. I’ll
arrange the U-Haul and book your flight. You can put your things here
when you get back.”
“You’d let me go?” she asked warily.
The look in her eyes left him chilled. It looked desperate. “You’re not
my prisoner. I thought I made that clear.”
“You keep changing the rules. I don’t know what your expectations
are.”
She chose me, he reminded himself. She chose to stay.
“Will you be coming back?”
“Yes, Nick,.” There was a slightly bitter note in her voice. “Of course I
will.”

Chapter Three

After that emotionally charged argument they’d had at the restaurant,
the two of them circled around each other like wary cats in that big house.
Nicholas seemed to know he was in the wrong; he’d arranged for a grocery
delivery of some of her favorite things the next day. She would have rather
had an apology but he’d always been bad at that. Even when he was a boy,
he’d been overly solicitous, nearly transactional. Something else he must
have learned from his father.
She suspected it was less that he was sorry for what he’d done and
more that he was sorry she was mad at him. And that should have made her
angry—god, it had made her so angry when she was younger—but now it
just made her sad, because it meant that nobody in his life had ever loved
him enough to show him that forgiveness didn’t need to come with strings
attached.
You’re one to talk.
Jay rubbed at the back of her neck, futzing with Arthur’s schedule for
the twentieth time. After her last screw up, she was taking no chances,
double-checking all her work. Which meant that she was often completely
drained by the end of the day, but it was worth it to remain in good
standing.
She wouldn’t have felt so awful if there hadn’t been another text
message from her mother waiting for her that morning. Don’t bother
responding to this message, Justine. I can see you’re doing just fine without
me.
It hadn’t occurred to her that her mother would be reading The
Hollybrook Herald, though of course, it should have. Her mother would
have recognized those diamonds instantly.
Maybe she was more like her mother than she’d thought. After all the
times she had accused Nicholas of trying to buy her, she had sunk to the
same manipulative depths by turning his desire against him. It had been
easy. And it had hurt him—that was what surprised her most.
The betrayal in his eyes. The anger.
As they had driven to work that morning, she had gotten the sense that
he was still angry with her. She had worn a keyhole blouse and a short skirt,
and all he had done was glance briefly at her legs at a red light until she had
made a show of tugging down the hem in the parking lot.
Then he made a low sound in his throat, which could have been
approval or rebuke.
Before she could escape the car, he reached over and snapped one of
her stockings against the back of her thigh right in the middle of the lot.
Hard.
Jay yelped and glanced over her shoulder accusingly. He had one arm
draped over the steering wheel. The other was resting on the center console,
flexed like he might just grab her again.
“Don’t think you can get out of this by flashing your garters at me.”
Jay was pretty sure she had stopped breathing. “I don’t know what
you’re talking about.”
“Is that how you’re playing it?” He gave her a slow once-over that
made her think of all the times he’d yanked her into dark rooms and shoved
her up against the wall. “Or maybe you’re tired of discretion and want
Daddy to throw up your skirt where everyone see.”
It felt like he’d doused her in cold water.
(You used to be such a good girl)
When she slammed the door on his laughter—damn him, she thought
angrily—her face was flaming, and when he came in a few minutes later,
she couldn’t bring herself to look at him.
Coward.
She was relieved when the time came for her morning 1:1 with Arthur,
if only for the reassurance of hearing one person tell her that she wasn’t a
total fuck up today.
“I’m glad to hear that,” she told him, with a light laugh to cover just
how relieved she really was. “And there’s no other opportunities that I
could work on? I know you’re handling a lot of international clients right
now. I could handle some of their portfolios if you want.”
“Everything’s fine, Jay. It’s all done and dusted. Was there anything
else?”
“Um, yes, actually. Is it okay if I use about a week of PTO?”
“Of course. Have you taken my advice to heart and finally booked
yourself a relaxing vacation?”
“I don’t know how relaxing it will be.” She fiddled with her notepad.
“I’m going back to San Francisco for a few days. My old landlord wants my
things out so he can sell the place and strike while the iron is hot.”
“That’s too bad. Where do you live?”
“South of Cesar Chavez, by Bernal Hill.” She blinked and caught
herself. “I mean, Mission. It’s where all those murals are, if you’ve been.”
“Yes, a long time ago. I had friends who lived in the Haight. I’ve heard
the city’s gotten quite expensive.”
“It has. There’s too many people and not enough affordable housing.”
Jay thought wistfully of the anonymity of the city, and how refreshing it had
been to walk through crowds unnoticed. Her only regret was that there had
never been enough time and money to stop moving and enjoy it. She sighed.
“It’s really too bad. I liked it there.”
“Good luck on the move. I hope you manage to enjoy yourself at least
a little bit while you’re away. There’s certainly plenty to do.”
And I can afford it now, she thought guiltily. Even without Nicholas
constantly spending money on her, living with him rent-free was saving her
a ton. She’d never had this much in her accounts in her life. Damon had
been as controlling with her allowance as he had been with everything else.
“You can go ahead and put your PTO in when this meeting is over,”
Arthur said, cutting into her thoughts. “I’ll approve it by the end of the day.
Oh, and since you’ll be leaving us for a little while, I’m adding something
to your schedule. It was supposed to be for next week, but you can just
move it up, timeline-wise, if you want to participate.”
Her phone buzzed. “The Administrative Lunch?” she asked, glancing at
the notification.
“Yes, it’s part of the quarterly offsite budget. All you have to do is save
your lunch receipts and send them to accounts receivable. Since you and
Annica are the only C-suite administrative assistants, you’ve been placed on
the same ‘team.’ It’s thirty dollars per person.”
“Wow,” said Jay. “That’s generous.”
“It was Nicholas’s idea.” Arthur leaned back in his chair, closing his
laptop. “It’s a slow day and I don’t have much on the schedule. You might
consider going today.”
“Thanks, Arthur.” Jay tried to sound upbeat as she walked out,
privately wishing that she could have postponed the lunch until after she’d
gotten back.
So you could sit and stew at your desk?
She had always wondered if she should have asked Annica out for
coffee to thank her after her orientation, but her demeanor didn’t exactly
invite confidence, and any overtures of friendliness that she had tried to
extend that went beyond bland corporate professionalism had been rejected,
so eventually, she had stopped trying because it was making her feel
pathetic.
Nicholas referred to Annica as “the automaton” at home, which was
just another example of the way he demeaned the women around him.
When she’d told him that was cruel and that if he did it too often, he might
call her that to her face, he’d said “beep beep” in a dead monotone.
Don’t think about that, she thought, shoving that thought from her head
before a nervous laugh could escape her.
She scooted her chair over an inch, tilting her head so she was hovering
in Annica’s periphery. Her eyes flicked in her direction and she reluctantly
removed her headphones. “What?”
“Do you want to do lunch today?”
Her eyebrows came together and her mouth pursed. For a moment, it
almost looked like a sneer, but it disappeared so quickly that Jay wondered
if she had imagined it. She typed out something on her screen and asked,
without looking at Jay, “Why?”
Oh my god, she’s going to say no. How humiliating. She straightened
her mug and candy dish, trying to speak around the nervous lump in her
throat. “For the offsite? It’s supposed to be next week, but I’ll be on PTO.
Arthur suggested we move it up,” she added, embarrassed at this feeble
attempt to inject authority into her request.
That seemed to sell Annica on the idea. She minimized the window on
her screen that she had been typing into. “Okay. We can get sushi.”
Jay wasn’t really in the mood for the inevitable oshinko or avocado
rolls, but since Annica seemed to know what she wanted, she wasn’t going
to argue. She was mostly just relieved that she hadn’t refused point-blank to
go. “Do you want to go now?”
“Give me an hour. I’m working on something for Mr. Beaucroft. We
can go at noon.”
“Okay,” Jay said. “An hour it is. I can’t wait.”
Annica put her headphones back on.
She kept them on until 11:59, when she abruptly grabbed her purse off
the floor and stood up without any pretense. Jay, who was going through a
document, looked up, startled. She barely had time to lock her computer
and bolt down the hall as Annica headed for the door.
As they went through the main work area, she threw a glance towards
Nicholas’s office, noting with surprise that his desk was empty. He must be
at another meeting. She was relieved. That was a good sign. Maybe they
were starting to see him as less of a liability. The news that the board had
been considering replacing him had been a terrible shock.
She turned back to Annica cautiously. “I don’t think we’ve ever gotten
lunch before.”
“You haven’t been here very long.”
“No, I guess not.” Jay started to fold her arms, then caught herself and
lowered them to her sides. What does that have to do with getting lunch? “I
grew up here, though.”
“You look like you grew up here.” Making a face, she stepped around a
spill on the sidewalk, bumping against Jay. She didn’t apologize. “I grew up
in Ridgeview. It’s different.”
“Oh, my favorite vegan restaurant is there. Ridgeview’s really nice.”
“Not the part I lived in. It was a real dump. I hated my apartment. One
of my friends referred me to this job. She works in Acquisitions, under
Stacey. Her name’s Samantha.”
Jay shook her head, though the name sounded familiar “So you live in
Hollybrook now? Do you like it?”
“I mean, it’s a job. The pay is competitive enough and the benefits are
good. But nobody wants to be a secretary forever. My goal is to be in
management.”
She stopped walking. They had arrived at Dragon Sushi. Jay looked at
the sign and then at Annica, smiling uncertainly as the bell clanged over
their heads to announce their arrival.
Did she . . . just insult me?
Maybe she hadn’t meant it the way it sounded, she told herself, not
really believing it. Standing behind Annica in line while she ordered
something called “the dragon roll” and observing her posture, Jay thought
she seemed almost angry. It reminded her of how her mother would come
home in a bad mood when the tips were bad, as if her problems had to be
everyone else’s.
As she and the cashier hashed out toppings, Jay tried to remember if
Annica had ever told her about anything about her personal life at all.
“What can I get you today?”
She smiled quickly. “Just a plain avocado roll for me, thanks.”
The man arched his eyebrows. “Just an avocado roll? Your friend got
the dragon roll. Are you sure I can’t persuade you to try something more
adventurous?”
“I don’t know.” She saw Annica’s shoulders stiffen at the word ‘friend.’
“We make all of our sauces in house,” he wheedled.
Annica was scrolling on her phone while the guy behind the counter
made her rolls. Jay had the sneaking suspicion that she wouldn’t be happy
about waiting, but when she tried to catch Annica’s eye, she refused to look
up.
“I’m vegan,” she said hesitantly. “That’s going to be difficult.”
“We’ve got vegan mayo and sriracha in the back. I can make you a
customized red dragon for the same price, as long as you like it hot.”
“As long as it won’t be too much trouble . . .”
“It won’t be,” he assured her eagerly.
“Okay.” Jay dropped her change in the tip jar after he rang her up,
embarrassed by his enthusiasm. “Thank you.”
“That was nice.” Annica’s voice was flat as Jay joined her by the fish
tank. “Is he a friend of yours?”
“No.” Jay tugged at her skirt. “I really didn’t expect him to go through
all that trouble.”
“I don’t think he sees it as trouble.”
They locked eyes briefly before Annica turned away to study a fake
Chinese scroll mounted on the wall. The hostility of her unspoken
accusation crackled like electricity against her skin.
Jay glanced back at the counter, her discomfort ballooning when she
caught the cashier looking at the two of them. “I can’t believe I haven’t
heard of this place.”
“Mhm.”
“The décor is certainly a choice, though.”
“I think it’s fine. They’re a sushi restaurant.”
Wow. Okay, then.
“Orders thirty-eight and thirty-nine!”
They walked up together to get their boxes. Oh no, she thought,
looking down at her receipt. He put his phone number on it. She crumpled it
up discreetly as they walked out, hoping Annica hadn’t seen, but then she
remembered she needed it to get her refund back.
“Where do you want to eat?” She flattened the receipt out again,
folding it into a square. “Outside? Inside? If we sit near the window, we can
people-watch.”
“Actually, I’d rather just eat at my desk.”
“Oh,” said Jay. “Okay. No problem.”
“Thanks.”
She hates you.
Arthur looked up as the two of them came in. Jay thought he seemed a
little surprised to see them back so early. Annica immediately slid her
headphones back on and Jay gloomily noticed the pictures tacked up around
her monitor—she was into sports.
Nicholas came out of his meeting while she was picking at the fillings
of her last roll. She ate the last tasteless bite and dropped her empty package
into the wastebasket beneath her desk.
His eyes slid in her direction like he’d sensed her attention and Jay
shifted uncomfortably in the too-hard seat, crossing her legs as she recalled
his earlier threat. That was a mistake; his smile sharpened. If a wolf could
smile, Jay thought, it would look a lot like Nicholas.
Then someone called his name and he turned away and she could
breathe again.
A message popped up on her screen from Arthur. How was lunch?
Great! she lied. Thanks again for letting me move the date up.
Annica got up and Jay watched her go before reaching absently for her
bottle of mineral water. It slipped from her fingers and spilled—all over her
desk and keyboard. Because of course it did.
“Shit.” Jay lifted the keyboard out of the creeping path of liquid before
it could short out. There was a roll of paper towels they kept between their
desks, next to the tissues and the sanitizing wipes, and she tore off a
generous wad as she began mopping, much to the amusement of her nearby
neighbors, and probably Nicholas, too, since he saw and noticed everything.
I’d better make sure I didn’t get any water on Annica’s desk.
Annica hadn’t bothered to lock her computer before leaving and as Jay
leaned over to clean the dividing line, she could see that she had a group
chat open. That was a surprising rebellion for a woman who acted like a
buzzing phone was an unforgivable noise violation.
I shouldn’t read that, she thought, but her eyes had already focused on
the window.
The weather in Palm Springs is AMAZING. Bride is being a total B,
though. How’s work on your end? Still caught up in the grind?
Wow, Annica had friends. Looks like she passes the Turing test, after
all, Nicholas.
Her amusement quickly faded when her eyes caught on the next line.
Ugh, don’t ask. Was almost forced to eat with LMS today.
I’m sorry, her friend wrote back. Fake-ass bitches are the woooorst.
You should see her with our boss. So disgusting. “Yes, Mr. Beaucroft?”
while wearing the shortest skirts you can imagine. He was actually playing
with her hair the other day.
The friend had sent a frowny face. Maybe little miss slutshine will get
her slutty ass fired.
I have a whole week free of her, Annica had written, less than five
minutes ago. She just put her PTO on the work calendar today. Thank
GOD.
Down the hall, Jay heard the telltale bang of the bathroom door. Annica
was coming back.
Jay tore off another sheet of paper towels and got on her hands and
knees to catch the spills that had started dripping from the edge—and then
remembered the throwaway comment about her short skirt. She scrambled
upright just as a man from sales, hovering near the copier, swiftly began
walking away like he hadn’t just been looking at her ass.
Annica paused, looking down at her with a frown. Gauging the
distance between her and the computer screen, and clearly wondering what
she’d seen.
All of it, Jay thought, sliding the graying paper towel along the edge of
her desk. I saw all of it.
“Do you need help?” Annica quickly leaned over to minimize the chat
window.
“No.” Jay barely recognized the sound of her own voice. “I’ve got it.”
Her eyes flicked to the raised mezzanine. Nicholas had an elbow
propped on his desk, and was leaning over to watch her. When she glared at
him, he picked up his phone.
Hers buzzed. The wet T-shirt contest was yesterday.
I’m not in the mood, Nicholas.
She set her phone face-down firmly where he could see it. She felt
miserable, sick, and hot.
Little Miss Slutshine—was that really what they were calling her?
She dropped the wad of paper towels in the trash and plopped back into
her chair, opening up the spreadsheet of international clients that Arthur had
insisted were fine not to check.
Little Miss Slutshine, she thought again, miserably. It was so awful, it
was almost funny.

Whoever had upset Jay was clearly someone whose opinions she
valued. Otherwise, she wouldn’t have gotten nearly so upset. Which meant
that whoever was spreading rumors was either his charming stepmother or
someone at work, or else she’d lied to protect her friends.
Ex-friends.
His anger at the stunt she’d pulled in the car shifted into irritation that
she felt the need to hide things from him. To manipulate him. Maybe his
sweet little bird wasn’t quite as sweet as he’d thought. But then, he’d
always gotten a different side of her than everybody else. Nicholas
suspected that very few people had gotten a glimpse of the bitter Jay
revealed by her journal.
He did a few laps in the pool to clear his head, sharpening his focus. He
could see her moving beyond the clear glass windows, heading for the
kitchen. She’d taken off her stockings and now her legs were bare beneath
that slinky little skirt.
The air became colder and soon, his muscles began to burn. As he
sliced through the water, he imagined her bound on one of the recliners,
water beading on her cold, wet skin. Those long, beautiful legs wrapped
around his waist as he—
Dammit. He stopped with a grimace and stepped out of the pool,
toweling himself off on the deck as the cold air deflated his erection. He
dropped the towel on the floor of the sunroom while latching the door,
rounding the two corners that led to the kitchen. Jay had moved to one of
the bar stools. There was a sweet, yeasty smell coming from the oven. She
glanced up at him before glaring down at the pages of her book.
“It smells good in here.”
“It’s pumpkin manicotti.”
“Mm. Sounds good.”
“Who says you’re getting any?”
“Don’t be cross with me, blue jay.” He bent over her, running his hand
down her thigh as she pushed the book aside to keep it from getting wet. “I
said I was sorry.”
Jay snapped the book closed. “You didn’t, actually. You tried to bribe
me with a grocery order and then you took your shirt off. Now you’re
getting water all over the floor.”
Nicholas spun her stool around. Her eyes widened as she took in his
bare chest and tight, damp trunks. Those seemed to be of particular offense,
from the way her color heightened.
Apparently, the cold hadn’t been as effective as he’d thought.
“I’m sorry.” He brushed his lips over hers before kissing her full on the
mouth. When she relaxed into the kiss just a little, he gave her bare leg a
light smack before shoving his hand up her skirt and grabbing a full handful
of ass and thigh, growling into her ear, “You little tease.”
Jay yelped when he pushed his hand beneath her underwear, tugging at
his wrist. He let her push him away, watching her chest heave as she shot
him a furious, thwarted look.
“I am not a tease. I was crossing my legs.”
“You know what you were doing.” Nicholas went to the fridge and
took out a cold water. “Don’t tease me at work again or I’ll do things that
will make you blush.”
It had been intended as a playful warning but only seemed to rile her up
further. She was standoffish all throughout dinner, sipping at the very
expensive wine he’d brought up from the cellar in a nervous, dissatisfied
way, evading all of his attempts at real conversation.
And whatever satisfaction that had sparked in him at finally seeing his
stepsister look at him like a man was occluded by the knowledge that every
time he had her, he was driving her further and further away.
Fuck it, Nicholas thought.
(What if we didn’t talk at all?)
He caught her on the way to her room that night, wrapping his fingers
around her slender wrist and tugging until she was forced to turn around. “If
you don’t want to talk to me, there’s other things we can do.” Her eyes
flickered up to his, wide with blown-out pupils and she made a sound like
she might protest. “You don’t even have to look at me.”
Jay shivered. He hadn’t wanted to manhandle her, so his grip on her
wrist was loose enough that she could have pulled away if she wanted, but
she didn’t. She let him drag her into his bedroom and push her on the bed,
her unresisting body belied by the defiance on her face.
“Are you just going to lie there?” He mocked her gently as he pushed
up her shirt and kissed along the underside of her ribs. “You’re only here
because you want to be. Making me do all the work doesn’t make change
how much you love being Daddy’s little slut.”
That seemed to throw a switch; her eyes flashed in the gloom, and she
really looked at him for the first time since they’d started. Acquiescence
suddenly became violent, active participation. She bucked beneath him so
forcefully that it had taken some effort to pin her down, and she fought him
on every thrust, making it impossible to be gentle.
On some level, he knew that this behavior was concerning. He should
have stopped. A good man would have stopped. But he was not a good man,
so he fucked her the way she seemed to want him to and then held her body
against his in a crushing embrace when it was over and she let out a raw,
heartbreaking sob.
“Shh,” he whispered. He ran his fingers through her hair as she
trembled, face buried in his shoulder. His other hand smoothed up and
down her spine in small, soothing circles. “Shhh. It’s all right. Poor little
blue jay. I’m sorry. Daddy didn’t mean to be so rough.”
“That’s how I want it.”
Nicholas stilled, uncertain if he’d heard her correctly. He could feel her
heart fluttering against his chest, like the wings of a small desperate
creature. As his fingers traced back up her vertebrae, he felt her flinch, as if
his tenderness was worse than his brutality. “You cried.”
“Yes.” Her voice was muffled. She still wouldn’t look at him. “Isn’t
that so screwed up?”
“Not if that’s what you want.” He cupped the back of her head, stirring
the warm roots of her hair. Her breath exploded against his prickling skin in
a harsh burst as he resumed his gentle caresses. “Do you need something,
little bird? Or do you just want this?”
“This.” The word was effortful, like it had to be dragged from her.
“All right.” He rested his chin on her head, rubbing the silky skin of her
back. “I’ll just hold you.” She shuddered and he felt her nipples pebble
against his chest. “Just relax,” he said, letting his fingers drift up to the back
of her neck. “I’ll be right here.”
He wasn’t sure which of them had fallen asleep first. But when he was
spurred awake in the middle of the night by the urge to take a leak, she had
already slipped away and she would barely look at him at all in the car ride
to work, and he did not know what he had done to cause it.
But he knew one thing he could do to fix it.
Nicholas removed his sunglasses as he strolled up to Accia, tucking
them into his open shirt collar. The bougainvillea flowering along the sides
of the building were in full bloom, perfuming the air with a heavy, familiar
fragrance. Unlike when he’d come here for dinner with Jay, many of the
outdoor tables were empty, and those who were here appeared to be having
business brunch.
He was running ten minutes late: late enough to make someone wonder
if he wouldn’t show up at all, while still leaving himself enough deniability
to blame the whole thing on parking.
Tilting his head, he peered through the glass windows shrouded in their
natural curtains of ivy and thought he could just make out the silhouette of
his intended victim. It looked like he’d already ordered a drink, which
probably meant he was nervous and wanted something to do with his hands.
This is going to be fun, thought Nicholas.
“Two for Beaucroft,” he told the host. It was the same girl from the
other night and she eagerly showed him to his table. The relief on Michael’s
face was palpable as he sat down.
“Hey, man. The parking on this street is terrible, isn’t it? Thanks for
setting up this meeting. I thought maybe you wouldn’t remember me. You
were just a kid the last time I saw you.”
Flipping through the menu, Nicholas said, “Oh, I remember you.”
He lifted his eyes to study the other man and was pleased when he saw
a brief flicker of unease on Michael’s face. “Oh,” he said. “Well, good.”
Not for you.
Nicholas flagged down a waiter and ordered himself a glass of wine.
Michael demurred, sticking with what appeared to be iced tea. Either he’s
cheap or he’s watching his health.
“What are you having?” he asked, not really caring.
“Iced tea. The wife thinks I drink too much.”
“You’re married?”
“Yeah. Do you remember Angie?”
“No,” he lied, taking a sip of wine.
“I’m surprised to hear that. She was really popular in our grade.”
Michael picked up his glass of tea, pulling a slight grimace. “Angie was
friends with Jay. We started dating after college.”
Nicholas repressed a sneer. Friends, my ass. “After Jay.”
“Uh, yeah. After Jay. I guess you’d call it a whirlwind courtship.”
He wondered how many blowjobs Jay’s old ‘friend’ had had to give out
before enough blood left Michael’s brain for proposing to sound like a good
idea.
Michael had been slim and athletic in high school, with a whole head
of hair that was now slowly receding. A small paunch strained the buttons
of his Hugo Boss dress shirt. Only someone petty-minded and shallow
would call him unattractive and Jay, unfortunately, was neither of those
things.
“Are you married?” Michael asked.
“No. I haven’t had time to tie the knot.”
“Enjoy bachelorhood while you can, then.”
“I’ve been too busy to enjoy it.” Nicholas stared into the depths of his
wine, displeased, and not quite sure why. “Running my company consumes
most of my time.”
“Yeah, I’ve heard your business has been doing very well.” Michael
took another compulsive sip of tea. “Quentin mentioned that you kept his
hotel from going under during the housing crisis.”
Nicholas shrugged, though it was true that he had—after slapping the
man with interest rates so high that they bordered on cruel. He owned
Quentin’s ass. And knowing the men who had once courted his beautiful
stepsister through the glossy centerfolds of their perfect lives were now
completely at his mercy brought him no end of pleasure.
“I also heard from Amanda Strife that you’re the one who’s been
buying up all that open land. Apparently, her old company sold its lot to
you.” There was a question burrowed in there like a tick. Nicholas set down
his wine glass firmly.
“As fun as it’s been wandering down memory lane, what did you really
want to meet with me about? You mentioned you had a business proposition
for me. Spit it out. Go big or go home.”
Michael paused, and then moved his own glass carefully out of the
way, too. It was called mirroring, which was appropriate, because its effects
were just as revealing.
In a beautiful display of timing, the waiter chose that moment to come
over and Nicholas was treated to the sight of seeing Michael stammer his
way through his order while trying to mentally prepare his hard sell.
“I’ll have the carrot hummus and the Belgian endives,” he said easily,
when the waiter looked at him. He’d carefully studied the menu beforehand.
“You were saying?”
“Uh, well, as you know, our fathers did business together. They had a
contract, which lapsed a few years ago. Just before your father’s death,
actually.” Nicholas kept his face blank. “He funded a lot of our
development projects in Hollybrook, which was great when the economy
was booming. It really delivered on the returns. But now things are tight
and there’s less to build. We’ve had to make significant cuts and you own a
lot of the prime real estate in the area that’s currently zoned for business. I
checked the property records.”
“Did you.”
“It’s my business to know,” he said, a little defensively. “This town
may have become a bedroom community but there’s a lot of people who
would be very interested in taking advantage of some of those light
commercial zones.”
“Nobody goes to the mall anymore?”
“Exactly.” Michael nodded, like he hadn’t just been slighted. “I was
hoping you’d honor your father’s business deal with us and front the money
in exchange for a generous return on your investment and an offer for one
of those empty lots. We could probably add some stock options, too.”
“I thought you said nobody wanted to build. Are you sure this project
of yours wouldn’t just be bringing coal to Newcastle?”
“There’s an LA tech firm that would like to make use of that open
space. Quentin’s cousin is married to their CEO. They want to turn it into an
administrative hub. They’re thinking it might incentivize some of their
executives to remain on as consultants when they’re put out to pasture.”
“Assuming I sell it to you.” He took another sip of wine. “At a steep
discount, it sounds like, given your significant cuts.”
Michael had the grace to blush. “I would consider it a personal favor,
from one friend to another.”
“I’m surprised you didn’t ask Jay to come to me when you saw her at
the farmers’ market since you two were such good friends.”
Their lunches arrived. The distraction was not enough to prevent the
look of surprise, and then wariness, that flashed across the other man’s face.
“She mentioned that? We didn’t talk for very long. The babysitter needed to
leave, so my wife and I were in a bit of a rush.”
“Too busy for a personal favor, from one friend to another?”
“She was never all that interested in discussing business. I always
thought that was strange, because our dads were so close. Most of the other
kids in school were friends because of who their parents were. I thought
that was why she went out with me, because of her stepfather. We made
sense. But she always got upset whenever I tried to bring it up.”
You goddamn fool. “Jay isn’t that type of woman.”
“Look, I don’t know what she told you about what happened, but Jay
isn’t exactly an open book. She left here without telling anyone.” He
paused, glancing warily at Nicholas, who said nothing. “She must have
gone through some shit. Her face—it’s not the same. When we talked, it
looked like she could use a friend.”
“And you thought you could be that friend?” Nicholas speared an
endive viciously with his fork. “Comfort her while she cries? I wonder what
your wife would think about that.”
Some of the color leached out of Michael’s face. “I really think you
have the wrong idea about me. I love my wife. Jay and I are over.”
“I’ve seen a lot of men like you in the industry. You love your little
development projects until you decide the upkeep is too much trouble and it
becomes cheaper just to scrap the whole lot and start over. That’s why I
own so many empty lots, Valdez. Because men like you get bored.”
He leaned forward, steepling his fingers together.
“I’ll sell you your lot, but on one condition—stay the fuck away from
my sister.”
“What?”
“Jay.” The word fell like a rock in the silence. “Keep her name out of
your mouth. If you see her coming, head the other way. Your wife, too.
She’s never liked Jay, despite what you think.”
“No, no, that’s not right. Angie and Jay were friends.”
“No, they weren’t,” Nicholas said coldly. “And neither are we.”
Michael blinked rapidly, looking around—as if the waiter would save
him, Nicholas thought, allowing himself the privilege of a smile.
“Did I do something to piss you off?”
“I thought my offer was generous.”
“It’s insane.” Much to his amusement, Michael was holding his steak
knife like it was a sword. “Did she put you up to this, or was this your
idea?”
“The fact that you have to ask just shows how little you really know
her.”
“Because nobody knows her as well as you?” Michael shook his head,
full of self-righteous disgust. “We always thought it was weird, how
possessive you were of her. It went beyond obnoxious tagalong younger
brother. You looked at her like—”
Like you used to? He smiled cynically at the other man. Like she’s the
only one that matters?
“My god.” Michael raked a hand through his thinning hair. Damp
patches were beginning to form underneath his arms. “When I asked her
why she left, she said it was because there was nothing left for her here.
That people changed and moved on.” Michael looked at him sharply and he
kept his face composed, even as he felt some dark piece of his soul fracture.
“Was it you?”
“Was what me?”
“Were you the one who made her leave? She was wearing your
mother’s jewelry, Nicholas.”
“So?”
“So some people think that means that she’s also sharing your bed.”
He lunged forward and Michael leaped from his chair with a yelp. But
his goal was not the other man’s throat; it was his own wineglass. He swept
it from the table with a single, well-placed knock and it shattered rather
beautifully on the tasteful tiled floors with a sound that seemed to take at
least a couple of years off Michael Valdez’s pointless existence.
A waitress immediately bounded over with a dustpan. “Are you all
right, sir?”
“I’m fine. We’re both fine,” he said, flashing a disarming smile at the
woman while his eyes flicked to his pale companion. “I can pay for the
glass.”
“Oh no, there’s no need,” she said. “It happens all the time. I’ll go get
you another.”
Nicholas maintained his smile until she brought him the second glass,
topped off with a more than generous pouring of wine. Only when she was
gone did he allow it to fall like the vast curtains of a stage, along with the
last of his restraint.
“That was a very stupid thing to say to me.”
Michael looked away. “I didn’t mean it.”
“I believe you did, actually—because you’re still not over her. After all
these years. How pathetic.” Nicholas studied Michael over the rim of his
new glass. “I might not be my father, but I am my father’s son. And I will
shatter your fucking face if you speak to me—or her—like that again.”
“I . . .” His mouth worked silently. “I understand.”
“I don’t think you do.” Nicholas took a long, slow drink of wine. “Not
if you’re asking me questions like that. In the future, I suggest you keep
your suspicions to yourself. Otherwise, you and your family won’t be able
to show your faces within fifty miles of here by the time I’m through with
you, unless it’s in a hobo camp under some freeway overpass.”
Michael pursed his lips. “You know you can’t buy everyone. Your
father found that out.”
“I don’t need to buy everyone. Just you. Now, take the deal. Don’t be
stupid.”
The other man looked as if he wanted desperately to say something but
couldn’t bring himself to do it. “Fine. I’ll get the contracts drafted up. My
lawyer can have them ready to go by Monday morning. He’ll think it’s
strange but . . . I’ll make sure he doesn’t talk.”
“And?”
Michael grimaced. “I’ll speak with Angie and stay away from Jay.”
“Good. It’s been a pleasure doing business with you. I’m sure your
father would be so proud.” He dropped his napkin on top of his plate,
slapping down a sizable stack of twenties beside it. As he passed, he
clapped Michael on his shoulder, digging his thumb right into that tender
axillary nerve. “I’ll be waiting for that phone call with bated breath.”

Chapter Four

When he asked how Jay day was, she said, “Fine,” with a subdued
caginess that reminded him of those first few days following her return,
when every one of her responses had felt forced. It seemed engineered to
provoke him and it very nearly did, but his triumph over Michael made him
feel generous.
Today had been a pyrrhic victory. He was not going to lose it all now
by fighting in the car.
As soon as they were over the threshold and the front door was closed,
he walked her down the hall, tossing his keys into one of the decorative
bowls on the credenza before taking her face in his hands. “Tell me what’s
wrong. I know something is.”
She gave him a weary look. “You can’t fix everything.”
I can, actually, he thought, but he knew she wouldn’t want to hear that.
Jay tensed when he kissed her and then her shoulders dropped into
complacency when he fished out the condom he now always kept in his
wallet. The kissing became purposeful as he began undoing her blouse,
fumbling the small buttons until she took his hands away and did it herself
with an efficiency he found both seductive and beguiling.
“Nick—”
But he didn’t let her finish. He hitched her up over his knee and yanked
aside everything in his way, spearing her against the side of the rightmost
staircase and fucking her rhythmically against the wall. There would be
marks. He was being careless, kissing her too hard.
(That’s how I want it)
“Oh,” she breathed out, head back, eyes closed. “Oh god.”
“That’s it.” He slid a hand behind her head, to cushion it from the wall.
“Fuck me. Give me everything.”
You can’t imagine . . . all the different ways I’ve fucked you in my head.
Jay cried out softly, reaching between them to massage her clit as he
covered her mouth again with his own. The urgency of it reminded him of
when they were younger, and they’d had to be quick to avoid being caught.
Jeans could be pulled down, and sweaters pulled up, both of them so close
that he wouldn’t have to hold back his own pleasure when she submitted to
him so beautifully the way she always did, as if they were fighting a war
that she knew she’d already lost.
If you only knew the things I’d do for you.
The papers from Michael’s lawyer came the next morning. Express
delivery, which amused him. The little fuck must have been really running
scared.
That was one problem fixed but the troubled look hadn’t left her face,
and he’d seen the wary looks she cast about the workplace and suspected he
knew the cause for it. But if he’d told her what he’d done, she would be
angry. If he pressed her, she’d be angrier still.
So he kept his silence, but he watched and wondered. And he planned.
Meanwhile, the days continued to drop away like dead flies until
finally it was the night before she’d leave for the city. He had ordered
dinner but the conversation was stilted, broken up harshly by the clink of
silverware on china. Every time their words petered out, her eyes would
drift towards something in the distance that he couldn’t see, and she’d toy
with the necklace around her throat, worrying the ring that should have
made her his.
(She said there was nothing left for her here)
A cold chill gripped him. He pushed back his mostly-uneaten plate and
the scrape of the plate on the wood seemed to jolt her from wherever she
was as she looked at him the way he imagined someone might look at a
wild beast in the woods.
It made his voice harder than he wanted when he said, “I want you in
my room tonight.”
Her eyebrows scrunched together. “Wow, okay. Should I bother getting
dressed? Or would clothes be too inconvenient for you when you push me
up against the wall?”
“I just want to see you before you leave. It’s hardly the rape of the
fucking Sabines.” The look on her face became pained and a hot lump
wedged itself into his throat. Fuck. “It’s up to you,” he said, angry with
himself now. “Come or don’t.”
She stared at him. Several expressions flashed over her face in
sequence, too quick to read. Then she nodded, and the silence between them
swelled until she’d gotten up from the table and disappeared. Packing, he
assumed, as he went to bed with his laptop. Telling himself he was going to
work but really, he was straining for the sounds of her footsteps.
When he heard the stealthy creak outside his door, he closed his
computer and set it down on the floor beside the nightstand, tugging off his
T-shirt in anticipation. He’d been waiting for her but his breath still caught
at the first swish of her skirt before the rest of her followed.
“I want to kiss for a little while.” She wouldn’t meet his eyes. “Can we
do that?”
“Yes,” he said hoarsely.
He’d kiss the air from both their lungs if it meant that she’d belong to
him and him alone.
The sharp edges of the little jeweled bird pricked at his fingers as he
turned the small ring over to study it in the waxing light while Jay slept. He
could just make out the engraving inside and wondered if she’d seen it yet.
With a sigh, he let the ring drop back onto her breasts.
She had belonged to him long before the rest of their town had staked
its claim on her. Before her smiles for him had slowly last their warmth, he
had truly believed that she could do no wrong.
His father? Yes, his father had been more than capable of hurting him,
but the fact that Jay could had been a knife that slipped right through his
defenses.
She had gutted him. Unable to eat or sleep, he had mulled over her
rejection for days as it festered in his heart. Then he remembered the
exchange he’d had with his father on the way back from Vegas—he had
called her willful, ungrateful—and he had thought that yes, maybe Jay
needed to be humbled a little, after all. He’d thought that if she lost that
angelic shine, she would come crawling to him willingly when he dragged
her down into the gutters.
But then he’d seen the way she looked at him afterwards.
There was no love in that look.
He thought he might die when she looked at him like that. For a while,
after she’d gone, it felt like part of him had. And when he’d found her
again, and seen the terror in her eyes in that dinky little soap shop, it was
like she’d killed him all over again.
I’ve ruined this, he remembered thinking. I’ve ruined her.
Maybe it was a mistake to let her leave. There was the possibility that
she might not come back. Putting on his favorite dress and fucking him
goodbye was exactly the sort of thing that a woman like her might her
might do before she left for good.
Fuck.
He held her tighter, squeezing her body to his until she made a small
squeak of protest from her reddened lips. “Don’t run away.” His words
buzzed in the silence, stinging like angry wasps. “Please.”
I’ll let you do anything to me but leave.
He kissed her neck, filling his arms with her warmth and softness. Jay
was not a tiny woman and he loved how she felt when she was flush against
his larger frame and all those soft, sweet curves molded to the hard planes
of his body, hopelessly intertwined with hundreds of memories where he
had felt cared for and loved.
“I wish it had always been this way between us. From the very
beginning. This is how it should have been.” He gave one of her breasts a
squeeze. “You should have been mine.”
You will be soon.
“Nick?” she murmured sleepily.
“Yes. I’m right here.”
“I thought you said something.” She snuggled against him in a way he
felt everywhere as her fingers smoothed absently over the hair furring his
forearms. His cock stiffened in his pants at the sound of her throaty sigh.
“Mm. Warm.”
He let his hand glide down her front, over her jutting hip until lace
yielded to skin. He let his hand settle in the crease of her thigh exposed by
the slit in her dress and had to fight back a shudder at her heat. “You up for
some fun?”
“No,” Jay whined sleepily. “I don’t want to run.”
He laughed involuntarily, which made his balls throb. Goddamn it. “I
didn’t say run. Daddy wants to roll your lazy little ass over and fuck it.”
“Sore,” Jay said.
“I hope that’s a request,” he whispered in her ear. “As in, ‘Leave me.’”
“Sleep.”
“Are you even awake, Jay?”
There was a long pause. Then she let out a quiet snore.
Nicholas leaned back, contemplating the rather dire state of his semi
before sliding out of bed and getting dressed to the light of his bedside table
lamp. Jay slept on, her body dipping into the space he’d left. Seeing her
look so peaceful twisted his gut.
There was a Vietnamese place that opened early and did vegan spring
rolls and coconut cream ca phe nau. He placed an order, then fed Jay’s cat,
shooing it out of the way with his foot as he bent to grab its kibble bag. The
annoying thing followed him around the room, tail up, rubbing against his
bare ankle as he filled the bowl that still looked full enough, to him.
He had already arranged for her U-Haul and the plane ticket, ignoring
her protests when he upgraded her to first class. She still thought this was
about past debts, but he had never given a fuck about money beyond using
it as a tool to get what he wanted.
This time, he thought, things would be different.
He checked on her again: she was hugging the pillow, the embroidered
flowers of her nightgown glistening like ice where the fibers caught the
light, sharply contrasting with the deep brown of her skin. He ached to
photograph it, to trap the moment like a butterfly in amber, part of him
fearing that this was the last time he’d see her waking up in his bed.
With a ragged sigh, he closed the door.
She began stirring right around the time that he answered the door for
the food delivery. As he set out the various cartons on the counter, he heard
the creak of the beams, then the pad of her footsteps coming down one of
the staircases.
“What’s all this?” Jay blinked as she walked in on him plating, folding
her arms over her robe.
“I wanted to see you off properly.”
“Wow.” A little bit of color tinted her cheekbones as she slid onto one
of the barstools. “That’s so sweet, Nick. You really didn’t have to go
through all this effort.”
Sweet was for candy and children. He glanced at her sideways. “I
wanted to.”
“Well, thank you.” She rolled up her sleeve to reach for a roll, dragging
his eyes to the deep V where the fabric gaped along the neckline. “This
looks amazing. And you remembered—no fish sauce.” She took a slow bite
and his dick twitched. “Oh my god, it tastes amazing, too.”
“I enjoy taking care of you.” He brushed her shoulder as he reached
over to steal a wayward piece of carrot from her plate. “We got pretty good
at taking care of each other before.”
She swallowed hard. “Yes. But that was a long time ago. We’re not
children anymore.”
“No. Now I can do things for you that I couldn’t then. And you, my
sweet, beautiful bird, don’t have to carry the weight of everyone’s
expectations.”
“Just yours.”
He leaned forward on the counter, his arms straining against the tight
sleeves of the old t-shirt as he reached over to flick her necklace. “Just
mine.”
She nudged her plate away and sipped some of the Vietnamese coffee,
her eyes drifting towards the fridge. “Aren’t you eating anything? I can
share if there’s not enough. There’s plenty.”
“I’ll have something after I swim later. I’m not hungry right now.”
“You’re just making me a little nervous, the way you’re staring at me.”
“Good.” He gave the belt of her robe a yank. “You should be.”
Jay yelped, covering herself with a modesty he found very amusing as
the terrycloth slipped down her bare shoulders. “Give it to me,” she said,
when he pulled the cord taut between his hands and snapped it with playful
menace.
“Give it to you?”
“You—” She made another one of those little yips when he grabbed at
her, trying to back away and push off from the counter bar at the same time.
The stool wobbled dangerously and hit the tiled floor with a clatter, while
Jay fell right on her luscious little ass. “Shit—”
He walked over and extended his hand, grinning.
“You ass.” She gripped his palm a little too tightly as he pulled her up.
“I don’t know why you’re such a—” He casually reached for her other hand
and jerked both up behind her back, cutting her off mid-phrase as he looped
the cord around both wrists. “Nick, what the fuck?”
He cinched the terrycloth cord around her bound wrists with a flourish.
“You can’t see it, but that’s called a bowline,” he said innocently. “I used to
spend my summers sailing.”
“Fascinating. Untie it.”
“If only you’d gotten up earlier. Maybe I’d be less distracted.” Without
the cord, her robe had fallen open. When he looped his arm around her, he
could feel her heart pounding rapidly and the soft weight of her breasts. He
rubbed his forearm back and forth and felt her nipples harden through the
thin lace. “Tell me more about what you’re going to do in San Francisco.”
Jay threw an unamused look over her shoulder. “Murder you.”
“And after I booked you into first class.”
“It’s a one-hour flight.”
“You can do a lot in an hour.” Nicholas let his other hand drift to the
slit in her nightgown. Her bound hands convulsed as he moved up to her
inner thigh. She hadn’t put on underwear. “Are you going to see your old
roommates?”
“No.” Her breathing became unsteady. “We don’t talk anymore.”
“Does that include your ex?”
“Yes—fuck—including him. Oh my god.” She jerked again as he slid
two fingers inside her. “Are you jealous?”
“Of some waiter who couldn’t even get you off?”
“His name was Dante, not ‘some waiter.’And he didn’t—”
She broke off into a sharp cry that made his dick rock hard. Still
thumbing her clit, he sucked hard on her throat. “What didn’t he do, Jay?
Make you come so hard you couldn’t talk?” He crooked his fingers until
she was sinking back against him. “Did he let you call him Daddy?”
Jay flinched. “I can’t believe you’re giving me such a hard time about
this when you have way more experience in that department than I do.”
He breathed out against her throat, displeased. “Not with anyone who
mattered.”
“That’s terrible.”
“Why? It was just sex. The drinks I had in the hotel lobby made me
feel more than any of them did. It wasn’t anything like what I have with
you.”
“Oh, god, Nicholas.” Her voice broke on the second syllable of his
name and he pressed harder with his fingers, until the third syllable died
into a hiss. Panting, she whispered, “I can’t listen to this.”
“You brought up my past flings.” Bored with the game now, he untied
her wrists, snapping the cord loosely against her arm before handing it
back. “Do you want a head count? Or do you want to know that you’re the
only one who ever got to call me Daddy?”
Jay folded her arms. “Was that really all you expected from women?
Sex and a drink or two before you just tossed them out of your house like
tissue paper?”
His house. “I never brought any of them home. I was too fucking
obsessed with you.”
Defiance flared in her face and something in him surged in response.
Before the conversation could spiral out of control further, he covered her
mouth with his. She tasted like cilantro and sweet herbs, and something that
was just . . . her.
“Just you.” A harsh breath sailed past his lips. “I don’t want anyone
else. I never did.”
“No matter who else gets hurt.”
“You’re the only woman I ever cared about enough to hurt me. That’s
what love is, isn’t it? Handing someone your emotional knife and trusting
them not to draw blood with it? But you do, Jay. You take that fucking knife
and you plunge it into me again and again—”
He drew her hand to his chest, spreading her fist out flat against his
heart.
“You hurt me,” he finished, just barely above a whisper.
“I don’t want to hurt you, Nicholas,” she said desperately.
“No?” He leaned in and felt her fingers claw through his shirt, as if she
would gouge at him even as he spoke against her trembling mouth. “Then
why are you so good at it?”
Why did you leave on the night I promised you everything?
She stared, as if reluctantly fascinated, as he dragged her fingers down
his abdomen, all the way down to the waistband of his sweatpants. When he
wrapped their fingers around him, she looked away—as if she weren’t the
same woman who had said, I was going to suck your cock.
“God,” he said hoarsely, remembering. “You’re so fucking good at it.”
“Sometimes you’re still such a selfish boy.”
“I think it scares you, how much you want this.” He gave her hand a
squeeze for emphasis. “It doesn’t exactly fit into your precious rulebook,
does it? The strait-laced good girl isn’t supposed want to fuck her brother.
Even if they’re not actually related, and there’s no blood shared between
them. Even if he makes her come harder than anyone’s ever made her come
in her life.”
“Stop it,” said Jay.
“It’s a real fucking shame, watching you deny yourself just to win
good-person points in this imaginary little game you’re playing alone.
Because I could make you very, very happy, Jay. If you let me, I could fuck
you so well. But what do I know?” He released her hand. “I’m just a boy.”
“Nick.” Jay retied the sash around her waist—covering herself up to
her throat, he couldn’t help but notice. “Please. It’s so hard to talk to you
when you’re like this.”
“It’s Nicholas. You only call me Nick when you’re trying to push me
away.” He ran his fingers through his hair in agitation after a glance at his
watch. “I suggest you get ready. Your car’s coming in an hour and I know
you’ll want to do your hair before you leave.”
“I don’t want to fight with you.” She put her hand on his arm—and yes,
she had that look in her hazel eyes, the one that tugged at his insides like a
fishhook and made him feel like a monster. “But what you said—it isn’t
true.”
“You think it is.”
Jay blinked, and part of him softened unwillingly when a tear slid
down her cheek. “You have no idea how hard it is for me to do what you’re
asking me to do.”
“To, what? Fuck me? Love me?”
She shook her head and started to turn away, but he stepped into her
path.
“I didn’t mean to make you cry. But if you want a future with me, you
need to understand: I’m not a boy anymore—I play to win.”
“You did win,” she said hollowly.
“I didn’t win shit, Jay. You fuck me in the dark. You have to come to
me in the light where I can see you. Where everyone can see you. I want
people to know you’re mine. You’ve owned me for years—body and soul.
I’ve been a slave to your fucking ghost.”
She stepped back from him, gripping her throat. And then she turned
and fled, her skirt kicking up in a swirling cloud as she took the steps to her
room two at a time.
The door slammed behind her, echoing hollowly in his chest. Nicholas
drew in a deep breath, rolled his shoulders, and began putting away the
mostly-untouched food. His eyes kept flicking to the staircase, involuntarily
tracing the path she’d taken as she’d fled from him once more.
It felt like she’d taken his heart with her.

You have to come to me in the light.
Jay hefted her suitcase off the baggage carousel with more force than
necessary ignoring the pain that flared along her shoulders. A man in a
business suit gave her a look she ignored.
The moment she stepped off the plane, she had felt the blast of the cold
bay breeze through the gaps of the jetway. It whipped through her curls,
filling her nose with the familiar briny scent of the cold Pacific ocean,
detectable even over the caustic burn of jet fuel.
Just like that, her brain was inundated with thousands of half-forgotten
memories. Lying about why she couldn’t have her friends over so they
wouldn’t see the pole in the living room. Constant feelings of envy when
they would go over to each other’s houses, attended to by their very normal
parents, and feeling infuriated that she would never, ever be able to
reciprocate.
Waking up in the cold apartment alone, hoping her mother would
remember to bring home dinner and terrified that she wouldn’t come all.
The way the men at the Beat and Tease stared.
The predatory eyes of those men in the strip club had followed her
throughout childhood, threatening a violence she could never properly put
to words until her stepfather had laid it out for her in very stark terms just
five years later. Then, she understood far too clearly.
I’ve been a slave to your fucking ghost.
She gripped her wrist, feeling the phantom weight of a bracelet that had
doubled as a manacle. Nicholas’s mother’s diamonds had been that heavy,
too, when he’d fucked her in them.
Her heart began to pound as she walked fast down the terminal,
dodging the slow-moving people around her as she wheeled her suitcase.
She was wearing jeans and a hoodie, and yet she kept catching people
staring. Looking at her—almost as if they remembered her.
But the city didn’t remember anyone. It paved right over you with all
of that concrete anonymity. That had been its appeal when she came here
almost ten years ago. She had wanted to lose herself in the hustle and bustle
of the crowds, to find a place where she could forget the bad things that had
happened to her and just fucking move on with her life.
But instead, the path she had been running on had dead-ended to
Nicholas, and he had brought her back to the same beautifully gilded hell
from which she’d been trying to escape.
I’m home, she thought, staring at a mural of the familiar cityscape
painted on the wall. The Transamerica building, Russ, St. Regis, and Jasper.
She knew their shapes and silhouettes by how they pierced the sky, but
looking at it no longer felt like home. It no longer felt like anything.
There was a French word, jamais vu, for when the familiar began to
feel alien. Jay, as she turned from the mural and made her way back out to
the street, thought of how many times she had spent breathing this very air,
and wondered why it tasted so strange on her tongue now.
I grew up, she thought sadly, and it grew on.
In the past, she would have simply taken BART home from the airport
—their station was right there—but Nicholas had given her cash for a cab,
and heading down the dark, concrete enclave of the taxi stand, she was glad
for the extravagance. Remembering the purse snatcher who had attacked
her on her way to work, Jay held her bag and suitcase tighter.
One of the taxi drivers had his lights on and the ID prominently
displayed. Jay leaned into the open window and asked if he’d take her to the
address of her old apartment.
“Sure thing,” he said, popping the locks on the door.
She looked at her phone while the driver loaded her suitcase into the
back. Nicholas had already sent her a message. It says your plane landed.
Are you through customs yet?
He was tracking her flight? Oh, who was she kidding? Of course he
was.
I’m flagging down a taxi now.
Good. Send me a picture when you get home.
What kind of picture?
The kind where you have your clothes on.
Heat crawled up her throat. As she began her response, she must have
been making a face, because the taxi driver was watching her in the
rearview mirror when she looked up again.
“Who are you messaging?” he asked casually. “Your boyfriend?”
It felt like fishing to find out if she was alone. Some of the men at the
strip club had done that to her mother—How does your husband feel about
you doing this? He’s a lucky man, having someone like you at home. Jay
gripped her phone tighter, tilting the screen towards herself. “My husband,”
she lied. The words felt a little too comfortable rolling off her tongue and
she wouldn’t let herself think about why. “My flight was late. He wants to
know where I am.”
The driver made a sound of amusement and she saw his eyes flash
briefly towards the mirror again, filling her with the urge to check her
hoodie and make sure it was still zipped. “Lucky man,” he remarked. “I’m
sure he’ll be thrilled to have you back.”
(someone like you)
“Um,” said Jay, keeping her eyes on her phone. Are you still there?
Yes.
My driver is making me uncomfortable. He just asked if I was texting
my boyfriend and I don’t like the way he’s looking at me. Will you talk to me
until I get home?
Send me a photograph of his license. I can get him fired.
I don’t want you to do that. I just want you to talk to me so I don’t have
to talk to him.
The text bubbles hovered and then disappeared.
Fine. Text me whatever you want and let me know when you’re home.
It sounded like a brush-off and after the way they had parted, it
probably was. She swallowed back the raw feeling swelling in her throat,
wondering why she felt like crying.
She stayed glued to her phone, playing her favorite cat game as the
driver, who was apparently feeling chatty, continued to make conversation.
She answered his questions about what she was doing in the city and how
long she’d been married with clipped, monosyllabic answers, though that
didn’t seem to slow him down at all and she was too afraid not to respond.
She wished she hadn’t given him her address. At least the complex was
large, and on a fairly busy street. You couldn’t even access it from the
outside without a key unless someone else let you in. For a girl on the run,
that had been a major appeal.
The driver put her suitcase out on the curb with an unnecessarily loud
grunt. Jay tipped him 20% even though she knew Nicholas wouldn’t have
wanted her to. But it was worth the please-don’t-axe-murder-me money just
for the peace of mind.
Which reminded her.
I’m home, she texted Nicholas, shifting her suitcase to one hand so she
could juggle her phone and the key with the other. The smell—oh god, it
was exactly the same, wasn’t it? Cheap lemon carpet cleaner and the musty
backwater smell every building in this area got during rainy season when all
the pipes backed up.
She climbed the steps to her apartment, grumbling a little as she tried to
juggle all her things. She dropped her phone twice, swearing before looking
around guiltily. The walk had never seemed this length before. And the
stairway was so . . . small and narrow. Nearly claustrophobic.
When she finally got to her door, she threw herself into it with relief—
and then she stopped, and stared, feeling the open space at her back like a
great, sucking void.
Her room looked smaller than she remembered.
She did up the latch, chain, and deadbolt, leaving her suitcase by the
door to take in her old space. The answering machine was blinking angrily
(“I can’t believe you have one of those,” Lily had said, the first time she
had seen it. “Who uses a landline in this day and age?”).
Over by the window was her favorite blue chair, positioned in front of a
statement wall she had carefully assembled by thrifting at the nicer shops in
the Haight. Her rock collection was on the window sill, so the crystals
would glitter in the pale sunlight, and over in the corner, folded up, was the
little card table that doubled as a dining table because she ate all of her
meals alone.
Jay fell back into the chair, letting herself be absorbed by the plush
suede. She was vaguely aware that her hands were shaking, that a cold spot
had formed on the very tip of her nose. She unzipped her hoodie and balled
the yellow fabric up as she kicked off her old Converse, before bringing her
knees up to her chest. As if that could fill the emptiness.
She had tried running away but glaring reminders of the past were
everywhere she looked, standing out like colorful bricks in an otherwise
white wall. Whether it was the gypsum rose that Nicholas had bought for
her or the CD he had fucked her to during that very first time, he had cast
his net wide and thoroughly trapped her in it.
What did it say about him that he chose to remain in the house where
both of them had suffered so much? How could he stand it? Even after
purging his father’s belongings in a gratuitous display of violence, he still
slept in what had once been his father’s bed.
If he were a very different type of man, Jay might have called it
martyrdom, but Nicholas’s particular brand of destruction had always
radiated outward, not inward.
Staring out the window, past her rocks and into the alleyway, Jay
thought, I don’t know if I’m strong enough not to be consumed by him this
time.
Her pocket buzzed, right on cue. Where’s my picture? he demanded.
Jay shook out her hair a little and snapped a blurry selfie. Creep.
I’m your creep, he responded easily. You look hot. Is that what you
were wearing in the taxi?
A lick of shame went through her as she adjusted her old Adidas tank
top, belatedly realizing that her bra straps were showing. Not that it makes
any difference, but no. I had a sweatshirt on.
You still should have sent me his license.
No, Nicholas. What are you doing? She glanced at the clock. You’re up
late.
Just signing some documents in bed. Is that your apartment? It looks
small.
It’s one small CORNER of my apartment, yes.
Nicholas sent a picture of his master bedroom. She fought back an
eyeroll when she saw that he’d purposefully included the sitting area and en
suite bathroom. It looked like he’d been drinking alone. There was an open
wine bottle on the low table and beside it, a dirty glass.
You live in a mansion. We are not the same. Now wash that glass and
pick your pants up off the floor. You’re a grown man.
Funny, I thought I was a selfish boy.
Ugh. Jay set down her phone and went to the bathroom to wash the
airport germs off her hands. Then she unzipped her suitcase and changed
into a pair of comfy shorts, but she didn’t bother packing. She wouldn’t be
here very long. While she was deleting messages off the answering machine
she thought she might actually get rid of, her phone buzzed again.
How many square feet is your emotional support shack?
God, could he be any more annoying? It’s not about the size. Location
is the most important thing here. I live in a very good spot in the Mission.
Everything in the city is small.
That explains so much about your ex.
I don’t know what you expect me to say to that.
Tell Daddy how much you’re going to miss him tonight when you’re
sleeping all alone.
Jay set the phone down. This time, her hand trembled. She brushed her
teeth savagely, noticing with some moroseness that the mildew problem in
the bathroom had returned in her absence.
There was another message waiting for her when she returned. She
opened it half-heartedly, and then sucked in a sharp breath.
He’d sent her a shirtless picture of himself lying in bed. His dark hair
was mussed by the pillow, which he’d propped up against the headboard to
work. He had his free hand under his jaw, in a calculated pose of study,
which was doing interesting things to the flexed muscles of his hirsute
chest. The picture cut off just above his abdomen and the dusting of hair
trailing down from his navel, but it wasn’t hard to imagine what was—or
wasn’t—beneath the border of her phone screen.
If you beg me, said the accompanying text, I’ll send you the uncensored
version.
I guess that’s why his pants were on the floor, she thought.
She often wondered if Nicholas only wanted her because he didn’t
know how to be with anyone else. He’d confessed to her once that he
thought it was hot that they lived under the same roof, and though he’d
walked that back quickly enough after gauging her reaction, it had held the
ring of truth to it. Proximity made her easy; it made her his ghost.
To her knowledge, he’d never had a real girlfriend. And despite his
intensity, he never let people get close. Except for her. Then he was too
close, all the time. Like a haunting.
God, the way he looked at her—
She might have called it adoration, if it weren’t for the undercurrent of
a violence that ran through those glances like a livewire, shocking any
remnants of sweetness into cringing submission.
She looked down, guiltily, at her screen, and saw that he was typing.
Quid pro quo, little bird. You can leave the necklace on.
Jay could imagine it—that was the worst part. How easy it would be to
take off her clothes for him, as she had so many times before. To do what he
told her to do.
All their lives, their relationship had been tainted by their respective
need to prove to one another that they were more than their parents, even as
they fell into that selfsame cycle of dominance and capitulation. If he
wanted her to meet him halfway, it had to start from a place of mutual
respect and not because she was convenient or biddable.
Nicholas needed to understand that if he really wanted to love her, he
couldn’t bully her into submission every time she did something he didn’t
like.
She might have actually believed it, too, if she weren’t currently saving
his photo to her phone.
Goodnight, Nick, she wrote. Don’t stay up too late.
It went to ‘read’ immediately. And though she waited, there was no
response.

Chapter Five

After Damon came onto her at the resort, Jay had avoided coming
home as much as possible. College had been great for that but the dorms
shut down for the holidays, forcing students to vacate, and so she had been
forced to endure several Thanksgivings and Christmases at home, which
she spent barricaded in her room with the door locked and a chair wedged
under the doorknob just in case.
They pretended to be a normal family at their so-called family dinners.
It was as if there were cameras embedded in the walls, zooming in on her
mother’s forced happiness, while Damon bragged over her about his latest
business conquests, and Nick just sat there in silence watching everyone
else with an expression of complete indifference.
He stayed away, too, but unlike her, he had a big group of friends,
courtesy of his father. The phone was always ringing off the hook from
people who weren’t important enough to have his cell phone number, and
Nick was more than happy to let the maid get it.
“Why don’t you answer your own phone calls?” Jay had said once.
“They’re your friends.”
“Them?” He’d looked at the phone with a scoff. “They’re nothing.”
Which had angered her more than it should have, because she often felt
the same way about herself. That nothing she did would ever be good
enough by any order of magnitude because nothing was still nothing
regardless of what you multiplied it with.
As soon as she felt like she safely could, Jay fled to her room, aware of
her stepfather’s leaded gaze boring into her back. You fucked up, his eyes
seemed to say. You should have chosen me.
You’re nothing.
When she heard the heavy knock on her door, Jay’s first horrified
thought was that it was him.
That he was going to force her to choose him.
“W-who is it?” she had asked, in a high, wavering voice, and Nick had
responded through the door, in a tone of deep disdain: “Me.”
She almost didn’t let him in, either, but it was Nick. She had known
him since he was a boy and except for that awful day at the beach, he had
never tried to do anything to her that would warrant a fear response like
this. He was her brother, for god’s sake. Well, almost.
It’s just Nick.
Jay opened the door and he brushed past her, giving her a whiff of
citrus aftershave as he swung into her computer chair backwards like it was
his, leaning his ropy forearms over the top so he could prop his chin on
them. He was wearing a white undershirt beneath a green-checked buttondown and had recently started gelling his hair. Jay thought that he looked
like he belonged on TRL, but he pulled it off anyway. Confidence, she
supposed, could make anything look good.
“What do you want?” She leaned against the wall by her door, keeping
an ear out for the sounds of their parents’ footsteps. She didn’t want Damon
catching her with Nick in her room.
“To get away from that.” His eyes flicked past her, towards the door.
“What else?”
“You have your own room,” she pointed out. “It’s even larger than
mine. You’re always telling me so. Remember?”
His dark eyebrows shot up and the look he gave her made her walk
across the room to fetch her old Berkeley hoodie. “What’s with you?” he
asked, sounding distracted.
You tried to kiss me. She zipped the sweatshirt all the way up over her
thin white V-neck. Don’t you remember?
“What?” Jay tried to keep her voice light. “You’re the only one allowed
to be in a bad mood?”
“You don’t have bad moods. You’re the perfect one.”
Jay bit her lip. After her slip-up with Angie about the whole stripper
thing, she’d learned to bury her real feelings and playact the grateful ragsto-riches princess they all wanted her to be. But hearing that from Nick—
hurt. He, of all people, should know her better than anyone.
“At least you only have to deal with them for three more years.” Jay sat
on the edge of her bed at a slight angle, so they were facing. “Then you can
leave.”
“Like you did?” His tone was almost accusing. “You’ve changed.”
“So have you, metal boy. It’s called growing up.”
That brought the ghost of a smile to his mouth. He looks different when
he smiles, Jay thought, surprised by her surprise. He looked less like his
father, and more like himself.
“Dad called you a bra-burning bitch the other night,” Nick drawled.
“He said he isn’t paying almost ten grand a quarter for a bunch of
communist pricks to teach you how to hate men.”
“I don’t hate men,” Jay said tightly.
“Not yet.” Nick kicked his feet against the wheels of her desk chair. “If
you do burn your bra, just make sure you’re not wearing it when you do. Or
better yet, go to one of those cool protests where they don’t wear anything
on top at all.”
“Please stop talking about my underwear,” said Jay.
He gave her a sideways glance. “You used to like it here. I remember
you almost creamed yourself when you saw your bedroom that first time.
Now, it’s like you hate it.” His eyes narrowed and she squirmed uneasily as
his expression shifted so minutely that no one else would have noticed but
her. “Did your mom say something to you before you left?”
“What? No.”
“My dad?”
Her heart froze, making the rapid pump of blood feel sharp and painful.
She stood up abruptly from the wall, folding her arms over her chest. “It’s
nothing like that. I’m just busy. That’s all. Sometimes, it’s just a little
overwhelming, dealing with all that pressure.”
“What,” he began, getting up as well, “do you know about pressure?”
“I work hard,” she said defiantly, wondering why she felt frightened. “I
always have. Coming from nothing, and being forced to prove myself again
and again—that’s pressure.”
He stalked towards her in a way that felt deliberately predatory and as
she tilted her head up to maintain eye contact, she realized, with a jolt, that
he was now taller.
Nick seemed to realize that, too. A shadow passed through his slategray eyes as he looked down at her face. “You don’t deal with pressure,
blue jay. You run from it. My dad thinks so, too.”
“Your dad’s an asshole,” Jay said hotly. “You can’t trust anything he
says.” Anger flickered through her, hot and unsteady. She swallowed it
back. “Especially about women. I don’t—”
“Jay.” Nick leaned an arm against the wall, bending close enough to
see the flecks in his gray eyes, and their fringe of thick, sooty lashes. Her
voice died in her throat as she glanced at his arm. “You’re deflecting.”
“Shut up, Nick.”
“Hollybrook’s little angel,” he mocked gently. “What are you running
from now?”
Still caught in her dreams like a snare, Jay was not sure where she was,
or even when she was. All she knew was that she wasn’t in her sunflowerdappled bedroom or Nick’s austere master suite, and for some reason the
light was wrong, and the air was cold and stale—
Terror filled her lungs, white-hot as a blade fresh from a forge. You’re
alone, that awful voice whispered in her ears, and she grabbed at the
mattress. You’re nothing. No one loves you.
“Mom?”
Alone.
“Nick?”
Her memories hit just as the panic attack did, both of them battering
her like a rogue wave against a cliff. A sob left her lips and she thrashed so
violently that she woke herself up for real.
She was in her apartment, tangled up in the vintage patchwork quilt she
had purchased at an estate sale because it had so much personality that she
couldn’t bear to leave it there to molder. Fake plants lined the top of her
clumsily painted dresser, their plastic and rubber leaves throwing out
sinister shadows that stretched over her face like long fingers. Catty corner
from that was a photo collage of people she used to hang out with, so faded
from the sun that she could barely make out their yellowed faces.
(What are you running from now?)
I don’t know. Jay slid out of bad, bracing herself against the edge of the
mattress as the ringing in her ears subsided. Her stomach turned and tilted,
and she found herself swaying as she stood upright on that nubby old carpet
and forced herself towards the kitchenette. Maybe everything.
She began to brew a pot of coffee to go with her breakfast and then
remembered as she looked into her odorous fridge that she had given most
of her food away to a neighbor before leaving for LA. There was a box of
Kashi in her cupboard, still sealed, and she ate it dry from the box while
some only-slightly-stale coffee dripped into the pitcher. It smelled like it
came from a gas station, but Jay didn’t need fancy coffee. She’d survived
on far worse.
With her non-eating hand, she scrolled through her phone, checking her
work emails and what little social media she had. There were no texts from
Nicholas, but that wasn’t entirely surprising after she’d refused to play into
his weird little sex games.
There was a message from her mother, though. Another one.
Don’t think I’ve forgotten you hanging up on me at the office. Do you
really think that you can just abandon your own mother like this whenever
it suits you? What gives you the right?
She must have been getting desperate. Her mother had never been this
interested in her before. Not even when she was a child. There was an entire
column of missed calls, some with messages attached. Jay wouldn’t let
herself listen to them, knowing that whatever they said would hurt.
(You’re too clingy, Jay. Nobody is going to want you around if you
pester them all the time)
Jay had put out some boxes from her last move in anticipation of the
packing but seeing them all surrounding her felt suffocating. The air itself
seemed to drain from the room. When she breathed in, she imagined she
could smell her mother’s Bath and Body Works body spray and the stale
cigarette smoke that came from the strip club.
I need to get out of here.
She picked up her now-cold coffee, which somehow managed to taste
even worse than it smelled, and settled into her chair with her phone. The
packing could wait, she decided. It wasn’t like she could do much anyway,
not while she was like this.
Her hands were shaking so badly that she could barely manage to bring
up her contacts list.
Who are you going to call, Jay? You don’t have any friends.
(You care too much. And now you’re alone.)
Then her eye landed on Lily’s name.
Hey, she wrote, before she could second-guess herself. I’m in SF. Want
to meet up?
Probably nothing would come of it, but at least she could walk to the
corner store or—
Her phone buzzed almost as soon as she had set it down.
Oh my GOD, can this be JAY? JAY VARENS? Because I’m pretty sure
Jay is dead. Otherwise she would have TEXTED ME instead of turning into
a literal ghost.
That stung. She heard Nicholas’s whisper: Have you texted her
recently? Or have you already started freezing her out, the way you always
do?
(a slave to your ghost)
Shaking her head, Jay wrote: It’s really me, Lily. I’m so sorry, I’ve just
been busy.
Quick—tell me something only SHE would know so I know you’re not a
pod person.
You got in trouble with security for writing Mrs. Jungkook on your
work badge in sharpie on April Fools’ Day last year.
Pffffft. Anyone could know that.
You’re allergic to cats and bees, and your favorite K-drama is Coffee
Prince.
OH HI JAY. SO NICE TO SEE YOU. WHERE THE HELL HAVE YOU
BEEN? <3
Jay scrunched a few locks of hair, wincing at how dry they felt. That’s
what she got for neglecting her hair care routine. I’m sorry I didn’t get back
to you sooner. It’s the new job. I’m still kind of settling in. They’ve been
working me hard.
A turn of phrase she regretted almost instantly as the image of Nicholas
bending her back over the kitchen counter while going down on her like he
had something to prove popped into her head.
(Quid pro quo, little bird)
Oh, RIGHT, Lily wrote, continuing to abuse her screaming caps-key.
How’s the new gig with Mr. TDaStSooY? Has he fallen in love with his
favorite new secretary yet?
Jay choked.
It’s good, she wrote, after a shaken pause. I’m just using some PTO to
tie up some loose ends.
Well, lucky for YOU, I happen to be available. Do you want to meet up
in the Mission?
Sure. Let’s get burritos. I’ve been craving them.
YAS. BURRITOS WITH MY JAYRITO. I’m so glad you’re not dead,
bestie. <3
Jay set the phone down again, throwing her head back with a loud sigh.
Fuck, Lily, she thought, amused and exasperated and drained, all at once.
She didn’t need someone to tell her that her life was royally screwed,
because she knew it was. It always had been.
Screwed up was basically her normal.
But the cost of that was that she had always needed to hold people at a
distance, to stop them before they could ask the difficult questions.
Nicholas had never seemed to care what people thought of him but she did.
It was like a game of smoke and mirrors: you could never let anyone get too
close or they’d see the rips and snarls that marred that illusion of perfection.
She had unthinkingly packed for the warmer So-Cal weather, so she
delved into her yet-to-be-packed-up closet and pulled on one of her old
sweaters and a pair of tight-fitting jeans. This time, she did take BART—
because Nicholas didn’t run her life—and as soon as she got off on
Sixteenth and Mission, she was assailed by the all-too-familiar sight of
homeless people begging in the station courtyard.
Jay skirted the edge of it, avoiding someone who was shooting up—
what a shock that would be to the historical society matrons, Jay thought.
They’d probably throw another fucking charity ball for it.
As she walked deeper into Mission, it gained a cozier, almost
residential feel. Lots of couples, some of them with children, and hipsters
wearing the latest street fashions. Other places, they stayed inside you. But
when you left the city, it was like ripping off a scab. It simply grew back
over the raw place you’d left, sealing up like a wound.
She found the rather uncreatively named Mission Burritos Lily had
texted her. She’d never even heard of the place before, but in her brief
tenure in the city, Jay had found that the less creative the name, the more
delicious the food. It was always those pop-up places with the cutesy,
punny names that ended up giving you the runs.
“Jay!” Lily jumped up from her seat, causing several people around her
to look around, perplexed. She was wearing jeans and a cute little striped
top that looked vintage and, knowing her, probably was. She wrapped Jay
in a hug, who stiffened and then returned it slowly, putting her arm around
the smaller woman and tentatively squeezing back. “You made it!”
“I hope you weren’t waiting long. BART was late, as usual.”
“Not at all.” Lily grinned. “Nice beach tan.”
“I’m always tan.” Jay rolled her eyes, following Lily to the ordering
counter. “So what’s new with you? Give me the elevator version first.”
“Well, I got promoted. To senior executive assistant!”
“Wow, that’s awesome. Congratulations.”
“I’m pumped,” Lily said, pausing to take a breath and place her order.
“Though obviously I miss your face. Sheridan hired a new assistant and I’m
pretty sure he hates me.”
“Who could hate you?” Jay said. “It would be like hating a puppy.”
“See? That’s why you’re the best. So tell me. How is your job?”
Jay glanced at the menu and ordered the vegan chorizo. “It’s looking
pretty permanent. Like I said, I’m just taking some personal days to box up
my things. Then I’m going back.”
“To LA?”
“Yeah.” Jay scratched at her neck. “I actually lived there for a while, so
it feels pretty familiar.”
“Extra ancho chiles, please—Jay, that’s so awesome! Is your work
hooking you up with a place?”
Emphasis on the hooking, her brain whispered.
“Sort of.” She managed a watery smile. “It’s a culture shock for sure
but so much of it’s changed. Not like here.” She asked for an horchata,
propping her hip against the counter as the server grabbed a plastic cup. “I
grew up here. In the city. Did I ever tell you that?”
“I think so, but it’s been a while so I don’t really remember.” Lily
cradled her foil-wrapped burrito like it was something precious. “Tell me
more about the guy. The hot one who came in. Do you know him? When
you went skipping out of there, you looked like you’d seen a ghost.”
“I know him.” She took her burrito carefully. “He’s my stepbrother.”
“Wait, really? Your brother? I thought he might have been—” Lily
blushed. “Your ex.”
Probably because I’ve fucked him more than I ever did any of my exes.
Jay took a desperate sip of horchata to cool the burning in her throat.
“We grew up together. After I left SF with my mom, that is. She married his
dad. He’s younger—four years younger,” she reminded herself.
“Wow, and now he’s your boss? That must be awkward.”
“No, he just owns the company. I work for his CFO, who’s really nice.”
She watched Lily take that in. “Do you like it?” she asked eventually.
“Yeah, I do, surprisingly. I never thought I’d get involved in the family
business.”
“You don’t work for the mob, do you?”
Jay laughed. “No. Nicholas is an investor. Not a killer. I don’t even
think he owns a gun.”
Lily tilted her head. “Not to belabor the point or anything, but, what’s
going on there? I don’t think I’ve ever heard you mention a brother before.
Are you close?”
“Not that close,” Jay mumbled.
Liar.
(Why are you making that sound, little bird? Is it because it hurts? Or
do you like it when Daddy fucks you rough?)
A memory of him biting her neck while he sank into her from behind
popped into her head, sharp and visceral. It nearly left her breathless.
(Such a good little slut)
“You’re not close and he flew all the way across the state to offer you
a job?”
“It’s complicated.” Her voice came out sounding a little strangled. “We
have . . . history.”
“Ah. I get it. Things are kind of weird between my mom and aunt, too.”
Are they, though? that obnoxious voice in Jay’s head whispered. “They
don’t like each other, but my mom would drop everything to fly back to
Asia in a heartbeat if anything ever happened to her.”
“Yeah,” Jay said faintly. “I guess it is a little bit like that.”
(you’ve owned me for years)
There was a lull in the chatter of the restaurant, and Jay could hear
some female pop artist playing in the kitchen as the fry cook cleaned. It
made her remember a different kitchen, where her fourteen-year-old self
had once eaten a hamburger with a pretty young stripper named Honey.
“You know,” Lily said, a little self-consciously, “I was never sure you
wanted to be friends.”
“What?” Jay covered her mouth, hiding the bite she’d just taken as her
mouth fell open.
“You were just so quiet and kind of distant.” She toyed with her bright
purple straw. “I figured we were pretty good work friends, but it didn’t
seem like you wanted to be more than that.”
“I’m sorry.” Jay set down her food. “I’ve never been very good at
reaching out.”
“No kidding.” Lily wiggled her brows to soften the bite of her words.
“I didn’t want to lead with this, because I didn’t want to freak you out, but I
actually have some cousins who live in the OC. Sometimes we all rent a
house in Malibu and spend a few weeks by the beach. So, if you want, you
could come and hang. All you’d have to do is pitch in for rent.”
“That would be amazing. I’d love that so much.”
“See? Yes. Now it needs to happen.”
Jay smiled and shook her head. “So what else have you been doing?
You got an amazing promotion, and that’s awesome. Do you have anything
else going on?”
“Well, I’ve been seeing this guy. I met him at an art show. They were
doing a Yayoi Kusuma exhibit at the SFMoMa—you should totally go, Jay,
they have an exhibition on ephemeral art—and we got to talking in the
infinity room. He was wearing an OK Go hoodie so I knew he was going to
be cool. We ended up going for drinks and desserts in the museum café.”
“Wow,” Jay said, a little longingly. “That’s like something out of a
movie.”
“I know.” Lily grinned. “What about you? Seeing anyone?”
“Um.” Jay flicked her aluminum wrapper. “Kind of.”
“Jay! What’s he like? Is he hot? Tell me everything.”
“Well—” Jay stared at the wall, worrying her lip between her teeth.
“He’s very attractive—and he knows it,” she added, her face softening
unconsciously. “But he’s very contained. You wouldn’t know it at a glance,
because he looks like a stereotypical jock, but there’s a lot going on beneath
the surface. When you’re close enough to him, you can almost feel his mind
working. Like it’s buzzing right against your skin—”
(You’re the sweetest girl I know)
Jay broke off.
Watching her closely, Lily asked, “Is he nice?”
“No—I mean, he tries. Sort of. But he’s bad at it.” Jay sighed ruefully.
“He’s kind of an asshole.”
“Oh.” Lily frowned. “That’s not good.”
“It sounds worse than it is,” Jay said. “He’s not cruel to me.” Low bar,
Jay. “He really tries to give me what he thinks I want. In some ways, he’s a
product of his environment. His father was a wealthy man who used his
privilege to hurt people or buy them off, and that left an impression.”
“So, a typical late-stage capitalist.”
Jay breathed out a reluctant laugh. “Something like that. I worry that
I’m just an outlet for him, though. An easy source of affection he can come
to and then leave. You know how it can be—some people treat their
relationships like they’re a glass of wine at the end of the day.”
“Jay, if a man is drinking you down like a bottle of good red at the end
of the night, I’d say you’re in a better position than most straight women.”
She tilted her head. “I mean, as long as he’s not hurting you. He’s not
hurting you, is he?”
“No,” Jay said, aghast. “No, of course not.”
Except for that one time.
“Then I don’t see a problem as long as you’re happy.” Lily shrugged
her shoulders. “Let him give you the princess treatment. Nobody said you
can’t use someone back for using you.”
Use Nick.
The conversation switched to lighter topics with longer pauses as they
ate, but Jay kept thinking about Lily’s words. Even on the ride back, when
she was siting with her legs crushed to one side so her feet wouldn’t touch
the man who was aggressively splayed out in the seat across from her, she
found herself thinking of how good it had felt to abandon her scruples and
just take for once as soon as he laid his ungentle hands on her body.
When she closed her eyes, she could forget who he was and what he’d
done. She could focus on those slow, deep kisses that made her feel like she
was drowning, and the hard and desperate fucks that sometimes left her
feeling too limp to even stand. She even liked the gifts, usually, though she
was afraid that if she didn’t put her foot down over his rampant spending
for those, the sheer amount of them would increase to terrifying extremes.
But was that love? She was pretty sure it wasn’t, just as how she was
equally sure Lily’s “girl, you get some” enthusiasm would wane if she
found out that the man drinking her down like a good red was her own
stepbrother.
Jay hitched her purse more tightly against her body as she slid her
ticket into the reader for the turn gate, watching it get sucked in and spat
out.
That was the problem, though. In his single-minded pursuit of her,
Nicholas never stopped to think about how other people would look at them
when—if—their relationship came out. His privilege had insulated him
from the stark realities of his own desires.
She knew exactly how it would be. It was already there in how
Meghana and Renata, Nick’s general counsel, looked at her. Or didn’t look
at her. It was the disappointed look of finding out that someone was actually
a much worse person than you thought they were.
Everyone would look at them like that if she married him. Marriages
were a part of the public record—she had looked that up—and all of their
colleagues and old friends would think they were out of their minds. Or,
like Damon, they’d turn it into something salacious and assume that they’d
spent their teen years ensconced in each other’s bedrooms.
Worse, they’d make her out to be some kind of predator. She couldn’t
bear that—because it wasn’t true. She didn’t want to see suspicion and
rumor tarnish Nick’s reputation and the way he ran his business, either.
He’d become a laughingstock and so would she.
And he would hate her for it.
Jay touched the bird ring she wore at her throat and a chill zipped down
her spine as she passed a parked Mercedes. She stopped and looked over
her shoulder. The street outside of her apartment had the usual amount of
foot traffic, and nothing seemed amiss, but the cold spot hadn’t left.
She had the strangest sensation that she was being watched.

“I noticed your calendar was blocked off all morning. Were you in that
meeting with the software development company?”
“Yeah.” Nicholas stabbed his fork into his chicken kebab, silently
cursing the obnoxious tech CEO and the sensitivity training session that had
preceded it. “He got weaselly about the interest rates and said he ‘wasn’t
sure our reputation was compatible with his family-owned business.’”
“Was this about the misconduct allegations? I thought that rumor was
put to rest.”
“Apparently not.” Among other things. “Maybe he heard we lost our
VP.”
Arthur shook his head. “How would they hear about that? They’re
multinational.”
“I guess he knows how to Google.” Nicholas grimaced. “I looked him
up—he’s on his third wife. So unless she started out as his secretary, their
business is about as family-owned as the mob.” He felt his face heat as it
belatedly occurred to him that his words could just as easily apply to
himself and his own “family business.”
“I’m assuming you turned him down then.”
“I said if he couldn’t afford our rates, perhaps he was right and we
weren’t a good fit for him.”
Arthur smiled into his doogh. “I’m sure he loved that.”
“Yeah.” Nicholas looked around the Afghan diner, taking in the empty
seats. It was the same one he had taken Jay to after their first night together,
and then again just before he’d proposed. He’d seen the owner’s eyes widen
with recognition as he came in before scanning the rest of the room—
searching for Jay. He eyed his picked radish salad, feeling as if dozens of
tiny bristles were sticking him in his spine. “He’ll be back, though. They
always are.”
“They do say hindsight is twenty-twenty.” Arthur picked up a chicken
skewer so heavily dusted with paprika that it looked red. “How’s Jay doing,
by the way?”
“Jay?”
“She put in about a week of PTO to go back to San Francisco.” Arthur
paused with the skewer halfway to his mouth. Nicholas saw the man’s eyes
flick over his face. “I figured you knew. She mentioned a rent hike. Is
everything all right?”
“She’s just settling up her old life before she moves here permanently,”
he said guardedly.
“I’m glad to hear it. Between you and me, she needs the break. She
stays later than I do. As late as you, I think.” Arthur paused again and
Nicholas felt himself tense in anticipation.
“Jay works hard.”
“And seamlessly. Doing my own scheduling is turning out to be quite
the novelty. It’s been years since I touched some of that software she uses.
She makes it look so easy.”
“You can borrow Annica while she’s gone. I’m used to running my
own schedule.”
The other man chuckled. “As kind as that is, Annica’s no Jay.”
“I thought you liked her. You hired you, didn’t you?”
“I did, and she does good work, but she’s not particularly . . .
personable.” Arthur coughed into his napkin. “She has a group chat with
some of her friends at the company. I’ve seen some of the messages that
were flagged by our monitoring software. They weren’t always kind.”
The robot has friends? Interesting.
“By the way,” Arthur said. “Out of curiosity, did you limit Annica’s
lunch hour?”
“Hmm? No. Why?”
“She just seemed a little rushed during her paid lunch with Jay the
other day. The two of them came back very early.”
“If she did, that was all her. It makes no difference to me how long she
takes as long as she does her job.” Something else to file away for later, he
thought distractedly. “How’s your wife?”
“Leah’s great. Thinks I work too hard. We’re overdue for another
vacation, although the problem with a vacation is that then you need
another vacation to recover from your vacation.” He went back for more of
his yogurt drink, face pink from the spices. “That offer for dinner is still
open, by the way. Bring your sister. Leah would get on with Jay like a
house on fire.”
Your sister gave him pause. “Everyone does. In high school, she was
everyone’s little darling.”
“Leah was the same way,” Arthur said, a note of pride in his voice.
“Women like that—they just shine.”
“How did you end up with someone like that?”
It came out sounding like an insult but Arthur, gazing inward at the
happy memories only he could see, didn’t appear to notice. “I ask myself
the same question, to be honest. I like to think it’s because I swept her off
her feet. But she says it’s because I make her laugh.”
Is that so.
The owner was manning the cash register as Nicholas walked up to
settle the bill. “Where’s your pretty girlfriend?” he asked, smiling in a way
that he probably thought was friendly. “I have been saving my best baklava
for her.”
“She’s not here,” Nicholas said shortly, and the man eyed him in
disapproval.
“That’s too bad.”
Fucking unbelievable. He was getting judged by someone who worked
in a kitchen?
When he got back to the office, he had a follow-up meeting with HR.
They wanted to review his progress and discuss “what he’d learned.”
Remembering what Jay had said, he swallowed back his true feelings and
parroted a bunch of nonsense about growing as a person that Meghana and
her lackey seemed to eat right up.
With no Jay to drive home, he scheduled a client dinner he’d been
putting off with a tech executive. This one, young and edgy—he’d selfdescribed as an iconoclast—wanted to sample the local bar scene, so they
went to The Shack, which was basically a dive bar that lived with its very
rich parents. It was the sort of place he tended to avoid at all costs.
Nicholas ordered a beer and half-listened while the man talked up his
business. He still wasn’t sure what his company did exactly, but their CEO
was convinced that they were going to be the next unicorn. The way he was
pounding back hard seltzer wasn’t helping his fluency. When he pushed
back from the table with a belch and excused himself to the bathroom
Nicholas tried not to roll his eyes, turning away from the table to scan the
crowd as he took a deep swallow of stout.
“Nick?” a man’s voice said in his ear. “Hey man, how’s it hanging?
Long time, no see.”
Nicholas turned, and found himself staring into the face of his exfriend. Shock was quickly eclipsed by anger and disdain. He picked up the
half-empty bottle again, taking a heavy draught. “Probably because you got
me sent to jail.”
Jake’s eyebrows drew together, briefly disconcerted, and then he
laughed. It annoyed Nicholas that his laugh sounded exactly the same,
horsey and loud. “Yeah, because you fucking punched me, Beaucroft.”
“And you deserved it, Van Hoff. Payback’s a bitch, or so I’m told.” His
attention shifted, flicking between the muffled music and ambient bar
chatter. “That seat’s taken.”
Jake’s smile flickered. He’d already started to sink down on the
executive’s vacated stool. “What are you doing here? I thought this place
was too good for you.”
“My client felt like slumming.” He set down his bottle. “What are you
doing here?”
“Me? I’m a regular. Though now that I’m a kept man, I don’t get out as
much.”
“Good for you.”
“Don’t you want to know who?” Jake asked, his voice sly.
“I really don’t care who you’re fucking.” Nicholas glanced in the
direction of the bathrooms and then away. “I’m not in the mood to catch up,
either.”
“That’s right, I hear you’ve become a real family man ever since Jay
came back home. Wining and dining charities for little children—that’s real
nice. She was always really into that charity shit, wasn’t she? I remember
you used to make fun of her for it. Saint Justine, I think is what you used to
call her. Though I’ve never seen a saint with tits like that.”
“How’s working for your washed-up uncle going? I heard your dad
drop-kicked you to the curb like some deadbeat after losing his last election.
Must suck to suck.”
“You haven’t changed at all.” Jake laughed again, but this time there
was a nasty edge to it. “You always did act like you were better than the rest
of us, but you and I have more in common than you think. Remember that,
the next time you decide to go full psycho for your hot sister.”
“Don’t think I won’t throw you through that fucking window,” said
Nicholas.
Jake flipped him off with a nasty smirk, though not, Nicholas noted
with sardonic amusement, before stepping hastily out of reach. “See you
around, Nicky. Tell Saint Jay I said hi.”
A growl built in his throat as the other man turned away. But he could
see the executive making his way back across the floor, still fumbling with
the zipper of his tailored pants. That little fuck, he thought, unsure whether
he meant Jake, the executive, or everyone in this whole fucking bar.
“We’re leaving,” Nicholas said, as soon as the drunken executive was
in hearing distance. “Email me your decision Monday or don’t bother.”
By the time he got home from the man’s hotel, he was bristling with
irritation. He shrugged off his jacket and tossed it on the back of the sofa in
the den, working his tie loose one-handed. He unbuttoned his shirt but left it
hanging open as he poured himself a glass of wine and started to reach for
another glass before remembering—she isn’t here. His dark mood
plummeted and he opened his phone, scrolling until he got to the photo that
he’d made her send him last night.
She was sitting in an ugly blue chair (blue chair for the blue jay, he
thought), and the top she was wearing had frayed straps. Her face was bare
and she was looking at the camera with an expression he was well familiar
with, and he knew she’d sent it to him exactly like this just to prove a point,
but he undid his pants anyway, sliding his hand into his open fly with a
weary sigh.
You make her laugh—his brow furrowed as his head tipped back—but I
make her come.
But was that enough? God, even that little fuck Van Hoff had found
someone to warm his dick at night.
Just once, he would have liked for her to loosen up rather than
constantly making him work for it. Fuck if he wasn’t imagining Jay with
those frayed straps dangling around her arms and her dark nipples peeking
through the loose curls of her hair. Touching herself. A hint of frustration in
those big hazel eyes. Hot for him and ready to beg for it.
Yes, Daddy? Do you want me?
Nicholas shuddered violently and then swore as the seeping warmth of
his own come soaked through the wool of his dress pants to kiss his thighs.
“Fuck.” He leaped up from the chair so suddenly that he spilled wine on
both himself and the carpet. “Fuck! Goddammit.”
He stormed into his bedroom and heard a distant howl—the cat. He’d
forgotten to feed her fucking cat. Muttering a litany of curses under his
breath, Nicholas rinsed the pants off in the bathroom sink and left them
hanging over the edge of the counter to dry as he stormed down the hall to
Jay’s room, where the cat was now clawing at the door. When he returned to
the living room, now wearing sweatpants and nothing else, and his hands
reeking faintly of whatever slaughterhouse floor sweepings went into the
cat’s food, his mood was completely shot.
He threw open the window with a crack, letting in a gust of cold night
air tinted with jasmine. That, and the faint and familiar tang of chlorine,
soothed him somewhat. He sank onto the loveseat and glowered at the pool,
thinking of Jay and what he had done to her in it.
It enraged him that she could leave so easily while everything inside
him burned with such raging fury. The pain of it was a shallow echo of the
mindless wrath he’d experienced shortly after his father’s death when he
had swept through the house room by room and destroyed anything the old
man had cherished or loved, propelled by the thought that he and his father
had driven the only person in his life who had ever mattered away forever.
That hadn’t helped, though, and he knew deep down that he would
willingly endure her torture until his world imploded, because when she
smiled at him with that shy approval, it felt like nothing in the universe
could ever go wrong again.
His father’s ghostly laughter mocked him.
(She’s got you wrapped around her finger, boy)
He picked up his phone and looked at the photo for a beat, before
tapping back to messages.
How’s the packing going?
She didn’t respond right away. When she did, he got a picture of some
sealed cardboard boxes with her neat handwriting laddering up the sides. UHaul came earlier. Had to meet the driver down at the end of the street
because he got lost. He was nice, though.
Nicholas didn’t want to hear about how nice the U-Haul driver was. He
imagined that any man greeted by a sweaty, glowing Jay would probably be
very fucking nice indeed.
I hope you weren’t cleaning all day.
No, I had lunch with Lily. How was your day?
Nicholas bit back a bitter laugh.
How was his day? Fucking wonderful. He was going to have to Google
“how to get come out of dress pants” and spend his evening scrubbing wine
out of the white carpet so it didn’t stain, and if he got one more “urgent”
work email after nine o’ clock, he really thought he might kill someone.
But please, Jay, tell me how nice that U-Haul driver was. Tell me how
he tried very politely not to look at your perfect saintly tits.
He wondered, with a dispassionate sense of curiosity, if this was what
madness felt like.
I had a lot of meetings and a business lunch with Arthur at that Afghan
place I take you to. Then I had business drinks with a client. He invited us
to dinner to meet his wife, by the way.
The client? she asked, and he thought brat.
No, Jay. Arthur.
As a couple?
No.
She never let him take her anywhere unless it was completely proper.
Six inches apart, no touching. There were middle school dance chaperones
were more lenient than Jay. When she’d been wearing that barely-there
dress at the gala, he’d positioned his hands on her body so carefully when
they danced that she might as well have been made of brittle crystal.
And even then, she’d gotten angry and demanded to leave.
That would be nice. I like him and I’d love to meet his wife. Have you
met her?
Once. I don’t think she likes me very much.
Do you think she’ll like me?
He could imagine the worry on her face. She’d always been a people
pleaser.
Nobody in their right mind could meet you and not fall in love with
you.
As they had chatted, the wine had gradually relaxed him—and so had
she. He was enjoying their conversation, imagining her expressions and
gestures so clearly that she might as well have been sitting in front of him.
But as soon as he’d sent those words—those damning fucking words—his
fingertips went cold.
Fuck, he thought again, sitting up so quickly that he nearly upended his
wine a second time.
It was too late. She was already typing. Do you mean that?
Yes, Nick. Go ahead, he imagined his father’s voice sneering. Tell her
how you really feel.
Something inside him burst. What, precisely, was wrong, he could not
say. Only that being here in this room with the smell of wine still emanating
from the carpet, taunted by the phantoms of the father he despised and the
woman he wasn’t allowed to love, he felt like he might go mad.
And now, knowing the violence that he was capable of and terrified
that she might glimpse it and push him away, he couldn’t trust himself to
tell her anything.
She’d already ripped his heart out once.
Nicholas picked up his half-full glass of wine and hurled it into the
kitchen trash, the shatter resonating with the dark impulses that clawed
beneath his skin. If she were here, he’d show her what he meant. He would
throw her down and tell her with his body what he couldn’t say with words,
making her come until she fucking screamed.
She’d asked him once why he always kissed her on the hand before he
tied her up, and though the words had eluded him then, it was because he
wanted her to know that he loved her so goddamn desperately. That even
when she was on her back taking him like Daddy’s eager little slut, she was
still his sweet, perfect blue jay: the woman who made him feel as if he
mattered even without the gilded trappings of his life.
He set the phone down on the window seat and shucked off what
remained of his clothing, diving into the pool nude. His body sliced through
the surface like a white-hot iron cutting through sheets of ice as his limbs
made the mirror-like surface roil with violent waves.
Swimming had been more satisfying when he was younger and the
thrill of competition had made it feel vicious. Now it was just something to
pass the time until he wore himself out.
After four laps, he stopped counting and just gave himself over to the
emptiness. And when he went to bed, drenched and exhausted and empty,
he left his phone downstairs.

Chapter Six

That party still haunted her dreams.
Half-blinded by her own tears, Jay had woven her way through the
startled guests, who stared at her and her tattered dress as if she were a
battered Cinderella fleeing the ball. Nobody asked if she needed help—that
was what she remembered later. All those men who had asked her to dance
had stood idle with their hands in their pockets, watching her run as the
beads from the torn bodice scattered like hail and the women in attendance
had all turned away, one by one.
It was surreal. In that part of her brain that was slowly processing all of
this, and would replay it over and over again in her nightmares for years to
come, she had been shocked that nobody had even cut the music. It wasn’t
like the movies. There was no collective gasp, no dramatic silence. She had
run from her old life while 90s elevator jazz played in the background.
Someone had even laughed: a woman, brassy and high-pitched. It sounded
like her mother. She hoped it wasn’t.
Danielle hadn’t called her for weeks afterwards. Her mother’s silences
could feel as enduring as a harsh winter when she was angry. It must be a
mistake, she had told herself. Damon must have told her another lie. But
when her mother had called, it was because she was looking for her driver’s
license and wondered if Jay had somehow taken it in her purse.
She didn’t seem to care about what had made her leave at all.
“Where are you, baby? You know you’re embarrassing us all, leaving
like that. People are asking questions. Come home. We can fix this. Don’t
be a foolish child.”
Ignoring the cab driver’s staring, Jay had held what remained of her
beaded bodice in place, staring fixatedly out the window with eyes that now
felt too dry to cry. But she wasn’t seeing the cracked leather interiors or the
buttery yellow lights in the assembly line McMansions. All she could see
was Damon’s blood smeared over Nick’s knuckles. The violence in his eyes
as she pleaded with him to stop.
He’s never going to let me go, she thought. Never. He’ll destroy us both
before he’ll free me.
Her belongings were already partially packed from when she had tried
to book into that hotel. Before Damon had put a freeze on her credit cards.
Before—she swallowed hard—everything else.
Knowing that there was a very good chance anything she left would be
thrown out or destroyed, Jay packed her journal, her favorite clothes, her
beloved rocks. Even the gypsum rose Nick had given her. She told herself at
the time that she could sell it later, the way she planned to sell her jewelry,
but part of her had known even then that this was a lie.
With her backpack on, weighed down by the cat carrier and her largest
purse, Jay left the house for what she thought would be the last time and
waited for the taxi that would take her to the Greyhound station. She
jumped at every sound, every crunch of gravel, every rasp of the trees,
terrified that Nick—or Damon—were out looking for her already, ready to
march her back to that hateful house and all that it represented.
The last bus left at eleven. Jay had gotten there at a quarter to, just in
time for the overnight. “No pets,” the driver said, and Jay, clutching
Carbon’s carrier, had burst into tears, which had made the driver shoo her
along towards the back with a look of exasperation. She spent the next eight
hours squashed between an older woman doing her knitting and a solemnfaced mother and son.
When she disembarked at last, and the bus pulled away in a cloud of
acrid smoke, she found herself thinking that the city looked—different . . .
but the same. She recognized the smell: stale urine, rainwater and exhaust,
old concrete and new steel.
She had checked into the cheapest motel she could find, which wasn’t
very. With a view of the buzzing neon sign outside her window, Jay booked
nine apartment tours for the next day. She had needed to sell one of her
purses to afford the advance her new roommates wanted for the next
month’s rent, but they had all seemed nice. And one of them—Dante—had
helped her get an interview at the restaurant he worked in, where she had
ended up staying for the next three years while attending night classes at the
local community college for an administrative certificate.
Jay sometimes wondered if Dante thought she had slept with him out of
a pathetic sense of gratitude. Part of it was that. He had taken care of her at
her lowest and she went weak in the hands of a capable man. But he was
also nothing like Nicholas and that had been part of it, too. She needed to
prove to herself that she could get off with a normal man.
That she could be with a normal man.
But when she had asked him, on their very first night, if he could put a
hand around her throat, Dante had looked at her with such sympathy that
she felt like he’d shot her in the head.
“Jay, who hurt you?”
Everyone, she had wanted to respond. Everyone hurt me. You just did
too.
“No one,” she had lied. “It was just something I wanted to try.”
“Well, I don’t.” And then, as if in an attempt to soothe, he’d added,
“Nice guys don’t.”
Nice guys. For years, she had hated Nicholas for warping her that way.
For every faked orgasm with her nice boyfriend, and the dreams that had
her waking up breathless from things that nice guys weren’t supposed to
want. For making her want things she shouldn’t want.
Talking with Lily had made her realize how much stock she had put
into living her life according to what other people thought she should be
doing. She had been the good girl, even when she didn’t want to be. Even if
sometimes, she actually wanted to be bad.
Especially with him.
Jay looked up and saw that her aimless walk had led her not to BART,
but the old restaurant where she had used to work. Out of sheer habit, she’d
taken the same path from the apartment she’d shared with Dante and his
friends.
Gill’s.
Wow, she thought. I can’t believe it’s still here.
She looked up at the peeling façade and felt a vague sense of
disappointment. She wasn’t sure why. Had she expected some sort of
epiphany? Or that it would be completely bulldozed away? It was honestly
amazing that it was still open. There had been rats in the storeroom that the
fry cook had needed to shoo away and it didn’t look much more sanitary
now.
Jay swayed towards the doorway, tempted. But what if someone she
had known still worked there? What if one of those waitresses in the little
pink aprons that they had all been made to wear still had their makeup done
like it was the 90s, with their brown lipstick and blue eyeshadow, and hair
that reeked of Sun In, and they looked at her, and said, “Jay, is that you?
You haven’t changed at all.”
Part of her would splinter and break off.
No, it seemed safer not to go in. The restaurant, and her tenure there,
could remain exactly where they were: frozen in time. Leashed safely away,
where they couldn’t hurt her.
So much of her past still could.
I’m not the same, she thought, continuing down the sidewalk. I can’t go
back to what I was.
The tension didn’t leave her shoulders until the buildings miraculously
perked up a few blocks down, and she started to see little strings of
fairylights in the fenced-off courtyards designed to shield restaurant patrons
from the street traffic. Various appealing smells wafted from their crackedopen windows, to dispense with the humidity and heat of the kitchens,
saturating the narrow sidewalk with the scents roasted garlic, baking bread,
and cooked meat.
Her stomach growled: a reminder that all she had eaten today was bad
coffee and stale cereal. She went into the nearest bistro and ordered an
extremely overpriced salad: arugula topped with red and gold beets, sliced
walnuts, avocado, and olive oil and balsamic vinaigrette. The place was
packed and looking at businessmen and -women in their smart, pressed
suits.
(you belong here just as much as I do)
“Arugula salad for Jay?”
Jay jumped. “Yes, thank you.” She had thought she might eat on the
patio but everything felt too close and too loud, and the traffic noises were
making her ears ring.
Clutching her salad, she walked the remaining six blocks to her
apartment, dodging people and sidewalk trash. When a man lunged at her,
she nearly screamed—and her breath only left her when she realized that he
had merely tripped over the uneven pavement. They shared an awkward,
panicky look and then Jay dashed away.
She’d allowed herself to become secluded, hiding away in Nicholas’s
big mansion like a princess in a tower. Every time she set foot outside, she
felt as if her every step were being tracked by people who wished her
nothing but the very worst.
She’d heard the rumors circulating. They all thought her mother was
some kind of porn star, her stepfather an embezzler and a sex fiend. She
was damaged goods, a bad seed. Just like her mother. A whore. The only
reason Nicholas—the town’s new golden scion—could possibly take her
back was if she was screwing him. And she couldn’t even get deny it,
because it was true.
It was all true.
Safe in her apartment, Jay managed a few bites of salad before she
gave up and put the rest away. She opened a dusty old bottle of cheap wine
that she’d had for god-knew how long and sloshed some into a red Solo cup
that she had to rinse the dust out of, frowning down at her reflection in the
murky dark liquid.
Perhaps that was how Nicholas saw her, too. Not an expensive red,
after all, but a cheap table wine to be pulled down and consumed, and then
poured out or forgotten. He hadn’t bothered to respond to her question
when she asked him how he really felt, which was just as good as an
answer.
He might not want to fuck an angel, but everyone wanted to marry one.
Even men like Nick.
A sound escaped her, high and unhappy. She stood, and realized her
cup was empty when she wobbled unsteadily.
Very rude of the floor to keep moving.
Gritting her teeth, Jay filled the cup again, bracing herself against the
counter. The alcohol was making her too hot, so she stepped out of her
pants, kicking them beneath the card table as she walked the dozen or so
steps it took to get to her sleeping area.
The strap of her bra slid down her shoulder when she dropped down on
her bed. Jay started to adjust it automatically and then froze, glancing at her
phone, remembering—
(quid pro quo)
She set her cup of wine on the stack of hardcovers that served as her
nightstand and nearly fell off the bed. Breathing a little harder, not letting
herself think too hard about what she was doing, she began undoing the
buttons of her blouse.
The dim orange lighting in the room was soft, shadows fuzzing the
farthest corners and leaving dusky shadows on her skin. She could see
herself in the cheap IKEA mirror propped up against her closet, shirt
hanging open around the fancy French underwear Nicholas had bought for
her and the body she had never let herself love.
She touched herself experimentally, running a hand over her torso,
closing her hand briefly over her own neck before sliding her fingers down
her front, all the way to her waistband.
Feeling ashamed (but not ashamed enough to stop), she clumsily
opened her lock screen and swiped through the photos until she came to the
one that she had saved. Nicholas, and his swimmer’s body, with those toobroad shoulders and those lean washboard abs.
She had dreamed of him—before. God, she had hated it, because she
hadn’t hated it enough. Dreams where he’d sneak into her room and tie her
to her bed, torturing her with his hands and tongue—you really thought I’d
let you get away?—before impaling her roughly on his swollen cock. She
would wake up feeling as achy as if he had fucked her, with arousal
clinging to her thighs, and she would turn and gasp to her boyfriend,
“Danny, I need you, please.”
He'd thought that was so cute, that she called him that. He thought she
was sweet. What would he have thought of her if he knew that she was
picturing another man on top of her during those sweaty, feverish sessions
where they were both still sleepy enough that Daddy could still sound like
Danny, and maybe he wouldn’t notice if she lifted her hips and took him
deeper, urging him to a more forceful cadence that still left her so
unsatisfied that she wanted to scream.
But she had stayed with him, because she was a good girl, and he was a
nice boy, and she wasn’t supposed to crave the things that would rip her
apart.
(Not if that’s what you want)
Her nipples had grown painfully stiff. She plucked at one through the
lace, arching into her own hand, and as she closed her eyes, she imagined it
was his stern mouth against her skin. His hands dipping into her panties,
rolling over the slickness of her clit—you beautiful little whore.
She shuddered violently.
Sex with Nicholas had always had the faint sting of punishment. She
remembered being so surprised the first time that she had been with another
man, just how little she felt afterwards.
She wanted to feel. She wanted it to hurt.
Who hurt you, Jay?
A slow, drunken smile tilted up the bitter corners of her mouth as she
watched her own hand move on the screen. Watching herself fuck herself.
You did.
Nicholas never seemed to know what to do with her when she was the
one in control. Just because he was 6’4” and had more money than any one
person could possibly need in a single lifetime, he thought he could do
whatever he pleased.
A drink and a fuck, thought Jay, pushing her hair out of her face. This
time, when her bra strap slid down her shoulder, she didn’t bother to fix it.
How’s that for quid pro quo?
She wondered if any of the women he’d hooked up with had ever sent
him photos.
Had he ever looked at them and anticipated the long night ahead? Or
was he cold and indifferent, the way he was in his business meetings?
She thrust two fingers inside herself and gasped.
He wouldn’t be cold for me.
She didn’t recognize the woman framed by her phone screen. Her hair
tumbled over her shoulder in a heavy fall, hitting just above her heaving
breasts, where the balconette bra was doing wonders for her cleavage. Even
her round stomach and dimpled waist, which she normally couldn’t look at,
seemed soft and pleasingly feminine.
She cupped herself between her legs and pushed out her chest, tilting
her head down and to the side. Lift up on your thighs, Justine, her mother
used to tell her. You have child-bearing hips and they make you look fat
sitting down. She gave the camera lens a defiant look as she sat on her
folded legs, deciding not to give a fuck if it made her stupid ass look big.
Click.
Her heart pounded as she typed out an accompanying message, one that
would hit him well below the belt. She nearly dropped the phone, her hands
were shaking so hard.
Oh my god, a panicky part of her brain whispered as she hit ‘send.’
What did you just do?
I don’t care, said that stupid, defiant part of her brain. Fuck
consequences.
Beyond that muted flare of panic, Jay was too drunk to fully pay her
alarm heed. The danger, like the wine, was too seductive. She wanted
Nicholas rattled, wanted to make him feel something close to the way she
did. It was only fair, when he’d kept her off-balance for nearly nine years.
The ceiling began to spin and she leaned back, setting the phone beside
her. The phantom scent of citrus filled with the back of her throat and she
sighed, closing her eyes, relaxing for the first time all night as she
surrendered at last to her intoxicated stupor.
“Nick . . .” she mumbled. “Daddy . . . please . . .”
By the time her message finally went to read and her ringtone began to
chime, she was already passed out cold.

The fucking wine had given him a headache.
Nicholas dumped the bottle out in the dirty sink while the bread
toasted. Jay’s cat wailed from her room upstairs and he growled under his
breath as he slathered butter over the bread and doused it in sprinkles before
cramming it into his mouth. As he walked up the stairs to feed the fucking
thing, he wondered if the butter he’d used was starting to go off.
The cat was waiting for him. As he nudged it out of the way with his
foot, it rubbed against his leg ingratiatingly. He leaned down and scratched
it above its tail, the way he’d seen Jay do so many times. It purred, ears
flexing as it peered up at him like it wanted something.
Nicholas had a pretty good idea what that something was.
“You know,” he told it. “I always wanted a dog.”
The cat blinked.
Leaving the creature to its meal, he went to his own room to change,
buttoning himself into one of his work shirts and a tie he selected blindly
from a drawer. After stepping into a pair of pressed pants, he fastened his
Bulgari watch around his wrist and picked up his phone to check the time,
realizing as soon as he did how fucking inane that was.
Because you see it as a status symbol, he could imagine Jay saying. Not
a timepiece.
This town was all about appearances. It was why Michael was being
paid out in installments instead of a lump sum. It was why he had a PI on
his payroll to look into anyone who caused him grief. It was why Jay
wouldn’t touch him where anyone could see.
She thought he saw her as a status symbol, too.
The morning dragged. It usually did but normally he got a modicum of
satisfaction from telling old colleagues of his father “no.” He didn’t imagine
they heard no very often, and the frustration on their faces when they saw
how they couldn’t change his mind, even if they begged, always gave him a
bit of a high.
Not today, though. As they filed out in the fancy suits picked out by
their mistresses and wives, trying to hide their disappointment in an attempt
to save face, he felt absolutely nothing.
Annica shut her laptop and hovered until he motioned for her to
precede him. She had done nothing wrong but he was still annoyed with
her. The terse responses and general hesitation to do anything but what she
had been explicitly asked didn’t help.
“She’s like a fucking automaton,” he’d told Jay once. They had been
eating dinner, and the talk had shifted, naturally, to work. “She doesn’t do
anything that isn’t already in her programming.”
Jay had gotten a funny look on her face and told him that wasn’t very
nice.
Is that what you like? he wondered grimly. Nice?
Then why do you like it when I fuck you so hard that you cry?
He raised his coffee cup to his lips and then lowered it in disgust when
he realized it was empty. Arthur might be fine with his employees talking
back to him, but he wasn’t.
He was getting tired of Annica’s bad attitude.
As if she had radar built into her mousy head, a ping popped up on his
screen.
Mr. Beaucroft? Can we talk?
Nicholas eyed the chat log. Maybe she was quitting. God, he hoped so.
Yes, I’ll reserve a room.
Glad for the distraction, he clicked over to reserve a room. It was a
shame that he’d have to hire a new secretary. HR would be all over his ass
to make sure he hadn’t done anything to this one—and wouldn’t that be
fun? With such short notice, they wouldn’t have time to backfill the position
right away. Jay would have to split the difference and pick up some of the
slack.
He missed the disapproving glares she’d level his way whenever he
worked someone over a little too hard. Which he did, often—he had
enjoyed showing off for her, and seeing her respond to the way he flexed
his control. She may have looked like butter wouldn’t melt in her mouth in
those fitted skirts and pretty collared blouses, but she always had her legs
crossed in their meetings.
Almost, he thought, with dark amusement, as if she didn’t trust herself
to open them.
But he could ponder that later, when he was alone with a glass of wine
and could give Jay and her thighs the proper consideration they deserved.
Right now, he had to deal with Annica and this.
Whatever this was.
She was taking her sweet time, lingering over adjusting her
headphones. Nobody was that compulsive. He watched her slow approach
through narrowed eyes, taking in the khakis and the preppy stewardess
blouse.
She looks like a fucking J. Crew ad.
“What can I do for you?” he asked, even before she was fully through
the door. She gave him a look before snapping it emphatically closed. He
wanted to roll his eyes but instead, he kept his face carefully composed. Jay
would have been proud.
“I want to discuss my title.”
Nicholas frowned as she seated herself in one of the chairs across from
him, pulling at her pants to shake the wrinkles out. “What about your title?”
“I’ve been here for over two years. I think my title should reflect that.”
“We don’t promote people for warming chairs.” He leaned back in the
seat, crossing one long leg over his knee. “Tell me about some of the
contributions you’ve made lately. Any innovations you’ve come up with to
improve the company’s workflow or morale. That’s what we promote on.”
Annica’s eyebrows shot downwards. “My workload has increased
significantly since I was assigned as your assistant. I’ve been here twice as
long as Jay and now I’m doing twice the amount of work, but we both have
the same title. That doesn’t seem fair.”
“That’s your benchmark for defining your performance?” he kept his
tone careful, deliberate. Inwardly, he was seething. “The work of other
employees?”
“I’m not saying I think that she’s a bad employee,” Annica said, which
suggested she thought this plenty in private, “but my duties are extensive,
and I have seniority, so I think I’m at least entitled to a discussion about
becoming a Senior Administrative Assistant—or what I need to do to get
there. Since I was assigned to you, we’ve never discussed my career
growth.”
I wonder why. He remembered Arthur casually asking if he had limited
Annica’s lunch hours, saying that her lunch with Jay had seemed rushed.
He’d forgotten to look into it, not really caring enough to dig into details
that didn’t concern him, but as he watched Annica fidget in front of him, he
found himself now considering other, possible implications of her behavior.
Could Annica have been the one spreading the rumors that Jay had
overheard?
Still pleasant, he said, “So what you’re saying is, you’d like my
feedback.”
“Yes.”
“My honest feedback.”
A wary expression crossed her face. “Yes,” she said again, though less
surely. “Why? Is there an issue with my work that’s keeping me from
moving ahead?”
“Meeting expectations isn’t a guarantee for promotion. It’s doing the
job we pay you for. If we go by your logic, Jay should have been making
more than you when she was first hired—for doing twice as much work.
And if that’s the case, perhaps we do need to revisit the description of the
role. But in the meantime, I’d like to see more of a team player mindset
from you.”
Nicholas didn’t think he imagined the flash of anger that crossed her
face. “Define team player, please,” Annica said tautly. “I don’t think I
understand what you’re asking me to do.”
“You’ve told me what you’re doing to meet expectations, but you did
so at the expense of another employee, whose workload and performance is,
quite frankly, none of your concern. I’ve also been informed that you seem
reluctant to participate in work events.”
She definitely looked angry now. “So you’re saying I have to
participate in work events even if I don’t want to, or don’t find them to be a
good use of my time?”
“No. I’m saying that your efforts are satisfactory but don’t exceed
expectations.”
Annica let out a harsh breath. “With all due respect, I don’t think your
assessment of my work is particularly impartial or fair.”
“Oh? Why not?”
Tell me. Give me a reason to fire you.
I’ll fucking do it.
She flinched when their eyes met but didn’t back down. “I think you
know why.”
“I don’t.” He continued to meet her eyes levelly as he leaned forward,
bracing his hands on the smooth wooden tabletop. “Tell me.”
The industrial clock on the wall ticked. Annica licked her lips before
looking back down at the table, breaking eye contact at last. “I’m sorry I
wasted your time with this discussion. I’ll just get back to organizing your
schedule for the day before I write down those figures for Harold.”
That’s what I thought, you little sneak. He leaned back in the chair as
she spun around in clear irritation, all but stomping back to her desk. Arthur
had mentioned a group chat. He wasn’t in the habit of spying on his
employees, but perhaps he ought to get James to monitor it. If she was
playing fast and loose with rumors in the office, she might also be
committing other violations.
He picked up his phone and began to scroll through his emails. Then it
buzzed in his hand and a notification blocked the top of his screen, which
annoyed him until he saw that it was from Jay.
After that shitshow of a conversation, he’d left her on read, unsure of
how to respond and aware that the longer he waited, the more likely it
would only spiral into another argument. She could have written to him, but
she hadn’t, which pissed him off. What the hell was she doing up there that
was so important that she couldn’t be bothered to check in with him?
There was a photo attachment. Curious and vaguely apprehensive, he
tapped to open it—and then his breath left him in a rush and he dropped his
phone.
“Fuck,” he growled, as he bumped his head on the table trying to
retrieve it. The photo was still on the screen. With a glance at the security
cameras, he thumbed it dark and shrugged off his jacket, draping it over his
arm and slightly in front of himself as he walked briskly to the executive
bathrooms. What the hell does she think she’s playing at?
He slammed the door behind him and locked it, leaning against the
door briefly before heading towards the stall. There, alone at last, he
unlocked his screen and squeezed his thigh bracingly as he took in her
flushed face, and the unbuttoned blouse thrown open to reveal lingerie so
sheer, it was nearly an afterthought.
The zipper track of his pants pressed uncomfortably into his erection as
his cock swelled. She had a hand between her legs, inside her see-throughfucking-underwear, and though she was shielding herself from his view, he
could still make out the slight shadow of her pubic hair, and the shape of
her sex. And her fingers—
Her fingers were fucking glistening.
With a groan, he freed himself from his pants.
He had always held himself back with her. How could he do otherwise,
when she dragged herself to his bedroom like an innocent martyr
approaching the executioner’s block? But this version of Jay looked as if
she could quite literally fuck him within an inch of his life.
Did you really think you could send me this and get away with it? He
drew in a rough breath. I hope you’re ready to finish this game you’ve
started.
He sent her a video call. She didn’t pick up.
Aware that this came dangerously close to violating his promise not to
touch her in the office and far beyond caring, he sent her another message.
Pick up the phone. There are consequences for being a bad girl.
Jay didn’t respond. She also didn’t pick up the phone. The text had
been received but it hadn’t gone to ‘read.’ If she was near her phone, she
was purposefully not looking at it.
Annoyed now, Nicholas tried calling her, but after eight rings, he only
got her voicemail.
“Hi, this is Justine Varens. I’m so sorry I missed your call. If you’d like
me to get back to you, leave your name and number, and I’ll reach out as
soon as I can.”
God, I wish you fucking would.
He closed his eyes and stroked himself as he called her phone again,
savoring the sound of her voice. He fucking loved her voice—low and
throaty, and yes, just a little cold. But he knew how to make his little
snowbird melt, and she always sang for Daddy.
Nicholas fell back against the tank, fisting his straining dick in earnest
now as he swiped back to the picture she’d sent him. Her skin glowed, all
those curves she buttoned away now on full display for his greedy eyes.
From the sharp rise of her collarbones, to her dimpled thighs, to her sweet
and beautiful face, he felt transfixed. Hypnotized.
It reminded him of the video he’d taken of her all those years ago, and
the way she had looked while she had gotten herself off in her room.
Arching her back and lifting her hips while she touched herself beneath her
clothes, unaware that she was doing so for a rapt audience.
Well, she’s certainly aware now.
Nicholas sank his teeth into his lip so hard that he tasted blood as he
came, metallic and sharply bitter. Panting, he swiped off his bloody mouth
with the wrist of his come-slicked hand.
“Fuck,” he said again, eyes rolling back. “Fuck.”
He had been in love with her for his whole entire life, but it was his lust
for her that had proved to be their undoing. No love, no matter how pure,
could remain so in a man like him.

Chapter Seven

There are consequences for being a bad girl.
Jay cleaned her apartment furiously but no matter how many dishes she
wrapped up or clothes she folded, she remembered the photo she had sent
Nicholas and his response. Or rather, his responses. He’d called her twice.
One had been a video call. It hadn’t even been six yet, so he would have
still been at work. Possibly even at his desk.
Heat crawled up her face at the thought.
Especially when, this morning, there had been yet another message.
Don’t think this is over.
God, what had he been thinking, opening that at work? What if
someone had seen it? No matter if the mental image of his control
splintering in public made her breath come up short—it was his job. Not
that she was blameless. She had been so fucking stupid, sending that to him,
of all people.
Do you want him to blackmail you again, Jay?
She leaned back against a box of things she had wrapped up from her
sleeping area. She had been about to tackle her books and some of her
smaller knickknacks, but her hands wouldn’t stop shaking and her current
predicament wasn’t helping. Thinking about the past had rekindled her
conflicting feelings for Nicholas and the alcohol had only added fuel to that
fire.
For years, she had lived under the threat of his blackmail, never quite
knowing if he would follow up on his threat, and now she’d just handed
him the means to control her again.
It’s the excuse you wanted, isn’t it? To come back and never be able to
leave.
No matter how hard or how fast she ran from the past, it always caught
up to her. It was the monster chasing her in her nightmares, but it wore a
seducer’s face.
Fate really was an ouroboros. Even her mother was back to her old
games. It wasn’t enough to have the last word, she needed to hound her, lay
down the guilt card. Remind her that it had been weeks since they’d talked
—like they had weekly fireside chats over cocoa, instead of continual
demands to exploit her stepbrother for money.
Jay had scrolled through her mother’s texts with a sinking heart, even
the ones she hadn’t let herself look at. They were worse than she thought.
With every word she read, she could feel pieces of herself flaking away.
You took me by the hand and led me to my own ruin, Jay wanted to tell
her, in addition to so many other things. You told me I would be safe.
The fastest way to put out her mother’s rages was to starve them of
oxygen. But her mother was tenacious. She could wear away at you like
sandpaper until your resistance was raw and bloody. No, Danielle Beaucroft
had clawed her way out of the mid-tier strip club she’d worked at for far
longer than she should have, and married a man who had draped her in
diamonds and designer clothes. Nothing, for her, would ever be enough.
All those years she had defended her mother’s choices, but now she
just felt like a fool. She had let herself be demeaned and used, and hadn’t
even noticed until Nicholas himself had pointed it out. Which was a big
fucking irony, since he had demeaned and used her, too.
She’d just half-convinced herself that she liked it when he did.
And now, thanks to her, he could do it all over again.
There was still no food in the apartment and she didn’t really feel like
shopping. Cooking had been her go-to means of self-comfort, the smells of
caramelizing food and spices giving her a nostalgia for a homelife she’d
never had, but Jay didn’t feel like standing over a stove, either. When she
got hungry enough, she bought herself some red curry from a food truck
parked down the street, but she felt the invisible tug of her mother’s
impatient words with every step.
You aren’t walking away from this, Jay.
Desperately trying not to think about Nick or her mother, Jay boxed up
half the living area, using some of her old sheet sets and throw pillows to
cushion the rocks from her collection so they wouldn’t break or shatter
during transit. But when she came back from the bathroom to find yet
another missed call from her mother, something inside her snapped.
Because she had never gotten to walk away, had she? Only her mother
had.
Arming herself with the reminder of the wine from last night, Jay took
a long swig right from the bottle as she sat down in the blue chair and
dialed her mother’s phone number.
“Justine? Is that you?” her mother’s voice was distant, like she had the
phone on speaker. “It’s about time you called. I was beginning to think I
didn’t have a daughter anymore.”
“Are you driving?”
There was a pause. “No.”
Jay combed a hand through her hair with a sigh. Faced with the
prospect of a confrontation, she could feel her courage rapidly deserting her.
She was pretty sure her mother was lying but she needed to choose her
battles carefully and that wasn’t what she wanted to fight about.
“Why do you keep calling me?” she asked at last. “What do you
want?”
“I didn’t think you cared. It’s been weeks. I was starting to worry.”
“About me?” Jay asked, as she kicked her legs over the arm of the
chair and stared, upside-down, at the entryway to her apartment. “Or the
money you keep asking me for?”
“Don’t be ridiculous, baby. You’re my daughter.”
“That doesn’t answer my question.”
“Of course I care about you,” her mother said, with a stiff air of injured
dignity. “Even after you said you would help me before leaving me out to
dry. Not that it seems to matter to you that your brother was going to take
me for everything I was worth and leave me out on the streets.”
Middle class living is not ‘the streets,’ Mom. But apparently this was
the narrative her mother had committed herself to, and she seemed to like
the sound of it. As if she were some suburban Blanche Dubois, languishing
away in genteel poverty.
Jay drew in a deep, angry breath, blinking away the sight of all the
piled-up boxes in her apartment. Thinking of all the times she wasn’t sure if
she was going to make her rent payment for the month, and the nightmares
she had about being forced back to the place she’d run screaming from.
Thinking of all the tears she had shed from feeling so fucking alone.
And all this time, her mother had flounced around, doing whatever she
wanted. Only calling when it suited her and her needs. She never even
asked me what happened that night, Jay realized, the knowledge hitting her
like a splash of icy water. Even Nick, as callous as he was, had asked.
She’s looking for a reaction from you, a voice like Nick’s whispered.
Don’t let the bitch think she’s made you weak.
“Why did you ask me to go to Nicholas?” It was the first time she had
put her nebulous suspicions into words, and the sound of them in the silence
was ugly and jarring. “What did you think I could possibly do that would
make him change his mind?”
There was another pause, longer this time. Jay thought she heard
murmuring in the background. “Because you were close.” Holding onto the
phrase she’d chosen before, the first time she’d called Jay at this very same
apartment, she went on, “You were the only one he listened to.”
“Not since he was ten. I hadn’t spoken to him for almost nine years
when you—is there someone there with you?” Jay asked abruptly, as the
sound of voices rose again.
“No,” her mother said shortly. “I’m just out. Running my own errands
—like a normal person. Perhaps you’ve forgotten what that’s like, now that
you’re back living at that house. You didn’t exactly check to see if it was
convenient to call first.”
“And you did during the fifteen times you called me?” Jay said.
“Answer the question.”
“Don’t raise your voice at me, Justine. My god, you always did think
you were better than me, didn’t you? Resenting me, looking down your
little nose at me just for doing what had to be done.”
“You mean marrying Damon? Wow, great job on that one. Maybe one
of the songs in your sets should have been ‘Stand By Your Man.’”
Her mother scoffed. “At least I got paid for it.”
Jay made a sound like she’d been punched. She sat up so suddenly that
the floor jolted. As she put her now-unsteady feet down, she struggled to
hold onto the wine bottle and anchor herself against the tumultuous
maelstrom her apartment had become.
“What’s that supposed to mean?”
“I think you know damn well what it means. You’re not that innocent.”
There was a burst of static as her mother breathed out an angry laugh. “Do
you think I’m blind, as well as stupid? Maybe you didn’t see what he was
like when you left, but I did. I knew. That wasn’t a man regretting the loss
of his sister.”
Jay set down the bottle. It fell over and rolled, sloshing wine over the
carpet, but she didn’t notice. “What are you accusing me of?”
“He denied it, too.” She sounded smug now. “But men don’t shell out
ten grand for something they don’t think they can ride or screw.”
Someone next door pounded on her wall in reproof. Possibly because
of the shouted ‘fuck’—she knew they had children. If she were slightly
distressed, she might have been embarrassed. But right now, she felt as if
she were trapped inside a glass box and the walls were slowly closing in,
squeezing every molecule of air from her lungs.
At least I got paid for it.
“Even when he was a child, he was a nasty little freak,” her mother was
saying. “You could tell what kind of man he was going to be by the way he
would just stare through you. Sometimes I looked into those empty eyes of
his and I knew that he was dead inside. But he loved you, didn’t he? You
made him love you.”
“Oh my god, are you jealous? Jealous of Nick? You were supposed to
love me, Mom. You were supposed to protect me. From them. From
everything. And instead you—” She broke off, struggling to draw in a
choked breath. Tears rolled down her cheeks. “Did you throw me at him
like some kind of sacrificial lamb? Is that what you’re telling me? You used
me as a pawn to get your fucking money because you saw me as some kind
of—burden?”
There was another one of those staticky bursts. “He was never going to
hurt you.”
(Don’t defend her. She sold you to me.)
Pain exploded in Jay’s right hand. She could feel the plastic of her
phone resisting, ready to crack. That made two of them. “And that makes it
better that you sold me out?”
“Don’t act like we were on the same side. It was always the two of you
against me. You were embarrassed of me and he—he just hated me. But he
was never on your side, either. Men like him and his father only care about
one side on a woman and it’s the same one you turned on me.”
Oh my god.
“I suppose he didn’t give you anything after all that. I figured he
wouldn’t, when I didn’t hear back from you. He really is his father’s son.”
She laughed angrily. “A cheat and a liar, screwing everything that moves.
That’s his real inheritance.”
“That’s not true.” The words felt like shards of glass in her mouth.
“Nick’s nothing like his father. Damon was a fucking monster. Nick is—”
“Yes, that’s right, go ahead and defend him,” her mother said nastily.
“Make me the villain. You’ll only end up on your ass just like I did. A stupid
little whore, just like your whore mother—that’s what you always thought
of me, wasn’t it? Oh, how I embarrassed you in front of your little friends.
But a smart whore gets paid, Justine. That’s the difference between you and
me.”
Jay was suddenly, incandescently angry. “How dare you. He loves me.
He loves me and he offered me everything—the whole ten million—all of
it. He cut me a check and put it right in my hand. He even—” a shaky laugh
escaped her “—god, he even said I could give it to you.”
There was a charged pause. “What?”
“I told him no, obviously.” Jay rubbed at one of her eyes. “I tore it up
and told him I didn’t want it and that I didn’t want you to have it, either, and
do you know what, Mom? I am so glad that I did. I’m not going to be
bought and sold like a fucking piece of jewelry.”
“You tore up the check?”
“Did you ever love me? Or was I just another stepping stone on your
quest for a better life? Never mind,” she said abruptly. “Don’t answer that. I
think I already know.”
“Justine—”
“Have the life you deserve, Mother. I won’t be in it. Screw you.”
She hung up on her mother, tears running down her face. She swiped
them away, fruitlessly, as more rushed in to take their place.
“Shit,” she said, in a small, broken voice. “So that’s it then.”
As terrible as Damon had been, she had always been able to hold onto
the hope that maybe her mother hadn’t really known what he was like. Her
mother was selfish and vain, but she was also desperate, and her life had
been hard. Both of their lives had been hard.
And after all those years of watching her mother cultivate an air of
girlish innocence that she’d never really had, Jay had told herself that it was
desperation that caused her to want to hold onto a cruel and distant man.
Desperation that made her turn away when everything come to a head, and
Jay had found herself in her stepfather’s crosshairs.
Not hatred.
Not resentment.
Nausea rose in her throat, bitter and hot, as that memory of blood and
darkness and cheap holiday glitter slammed into her like a wrecking ball.
All this time, she had seen Nicholas as the fox in the henhouse, the surprise
traitor. But apparently her mother had been picking feathers out of her teeth
for years.
What did it say about her now that her first instinct was to turn to him?
Despite everything, the soothing sound of his low voice in her ear had
lulled her back to sleep from the very nightmares he’d helped cause, and
she had never felt as safe as she did when she was in his arms.
(I wish it had always been like this between us)
I do, too, she thought desperately. God help me, I do.
Even if it wasn’t good for her, he was the only thing she’d ever had that
was just hers.
Jay picked up her phone again, swiping away the text her mother had
already left, not wanting to see the words before they could burn themselves
into her brain.
I talked to Mom. She typed before she could think better of it. With her
eyes blurry with tears, it was easy to ignore what she had sent him before.
She knew, Nick. She KNEW this whole time.
Jay stared ahead unseeingly at her wall.
You were right about her. You were right about everything.
She closed her eyes briefly, before swiping at them again with the back
of her wrist.
I don’t know what to do.
She set her phone down and that was when she noticed the wine. With
a curse—that’s coming out of your deposit, Jay—she picked up the bottle
and swallowed down what was left, before tossing a wad of paper towels on
top of the spill to absorb the worst of the stain.
Her phone didn’t light up. After a while, she stopped expecting it to.
Instead, she crawled into her bed and she cried herself to sleep.

“How was the sensitivity training?”
He resisted the urge to make a remark about deprogramming as he
toyed with one of Meghana’s yarn figures. “As I said before, it’s given me a
lot to think about. Particularly with regard to some of the shortfalls in our
company.”
The corners of the HR director’s mouth tightened. “Such as?”
“Such as an emphasis on the diversity our company claims to want to
champion.” His suit creaked as he leaned forward. “I’m sure we have data
on the demographic makeup of our employees. We’ve sent out enough optin surveys. Someone should do a deep-dive into that and work on some
spotlight panels for cultural inclusivity.”
Meghana’s frown deepened thoughtfully. “That isn’t a bad idea.”
“Of course it’s not. It’s a very good idea—it was Jay’s.” He watched
her expression become guarded. “She has a lot of good ideas that aren’t
being utilized as Arthur’s secretary.”
“I believe the role is called ‘administrative assistant.’”
“Don’t we have a VP role open?” he mused, keeping one eye trained on
her face. “What are the optics of having her run for it?”
“Does she want to run for it?”
“Yes,” he lied. If Jay hadn’t considered it already, he would see to it
that she did. His conversation with Annica had been good for one thing: it
had given him an insight into how other people viewed Jay’s role in this
company, and how that might be perceived if her relationship with him
were outed while she was still a lowly subordinate.
If she was going to marry him, she needed a better job.
Meghana sighed and rubbed at her temples. “It wouldn’t look
particularly good considering your history, but it’s not completely
unfeasible. She’s a very good employee and came highly recommended
from her previous employer.” She shot him a look that said, Don’t get any
ideas. “The endorsement would look better coming from Arthur than it
would from you.”
“I understand.”
“And there would have to be paperwork.”
Nicholas nodded, barely listening. Arthur would endorse her—he loved
Jay. He thought she shone like his wife. And while Meghana seemed
hesitant now, promoting a woman from within always got corporate hard.
His father’s conduct had left a visible taint on the company’s reputation that
they were all desperate to scrub off, and Jay, with her squeaky-clean image
and genuine warmth, had the authenticity that corporations desperately
craved.
And she won’t be a “kept woman” if she’s netting a cool six figures of
her own, will she?
Yes, he thought, with satisfaction. This solution was going to fix
everything.
“Speaking of signing—” Meghana slid a paper across the desk “—I
need your signature on this form. It’s your notice of completion, for our
records.”
“And then we’re done. No more sensitivity training.”
It hadn’t been a question but Meghana chose to treat it like one. “Yes,
this marks your program as officially complete.”
Fucking finally. “Good.” He scrawled his name on it and asked, “Is that
all?”
“That’s all.”
Nicholas swung out of the chair eagerly, grateful to be out of that toocolorful office and its oppressively correct and sterile atmosphere.
His phone lit up with a text and his mouth curved into a smile when he
saw it was from Jay.
There you are, he thought. Couldn’t stay away from me, could you, little
bird?
I have big plans for you.
She’d probably finished packing early and was texting to let him know
she was returning home. He could arrange her transportation, see to it that
she had dinner and a warm bath—and then pay her back for that photo that
she’d sent him in her underwear.
Maybe I’ll tie her to the bed and fuck her tits, since she’s so eager to
show them off, he thought, stirring at the mental image of a bound and
helpless Jay spread out over his sheets.
His smile disappeared as he scanned the texts. “Oh, fuck.”
“Mr. Beaucroft?”
He looked up. Stacey was staring at him with a look of concern. “It’s
nothing,” he said gruffly. “I just forgot to pick up my dry cleaning.”
What the hell did she say to you? he typed.
Jay didn’t respond.
He called her phone.
It went to voicemail.
“Fuck,” he said again, glancing around surreptitiously. So she wanted
to play this game, did she? Running away, the way she always did. Icing
him out. Not this time, Jay.
He grabbed his briefcase off his desk and began cramming papers into
it one-handed, keeping his phone pinned between his cheek and shoulder as
he made a call to the nearest airport, wondering, even as he did, how much
it would cost to have his stepmother put in an oil drum and buried alive
somewhere in Coachella Valley.

A police siren woke her up.
This sound was a familiar part of the city soundscape. Growing up in
San Francisco in the 90s, Jay had often stared up at her water-stained
ceiling in terror wondering if it was her mother that was being taken away.
Her mom always laughed it off, of course—“Nothing’s going to happen to
me, Jay, don’t be so dramatic”—but how was she supposed to turn off her
worries just like that when her greatest fear was being left alone?
It had been different in the house. She had woken up there, too, but
Nicholas would take her into his arms and whisper, “It’s all right, blue jay.
Daddy’s here” and stroke her until she fell asleep.
His tenderness had awakened something inside her that threatened to
devastate, even as it promised to satisfy the deep-seated craving she had to
be loved with a savagery that bordered on ruthless. And if she let herself
accept that love, she would also have to live with the fear that it could be
taken away or wielded against her.
She turned and banged her hip on the corner of a box, making the
contents rattle. She lurched to straighten the fulgurite, imagining, as her
fingers traced over the rough, brittle surface, the lightning that had caused
those minerals to crystalize. She could almost picture the flash of blinding
brilliance jettisoning from the heavens, only to be imprisoned between
layers of dull, dead rock.
It made her cry, actually, which was so stupid.
Because all of this was her own damn fault.
A knock sounded on her door just as the tears started running down her
cheeks.
She jumped like she’d been shocked, glancing at her clock. Past ten.
Who could it be? She barely saw her neighbors and didn’t even know their
names—she certainly knew none of them well enough that they would be
pounding on her door to summon her this late.
Her unease from before returned, backed by fear. She made sure to
keep the security chain latched as she cracked open the door, which didn’t
have a peephole, and found herself staring into a familiar pair of piercing
grey eyes that left her feeling faint as the owner of them slowly came into
focus.
“Oh my god, N-Nick?”
He put his hand on the wall, next to the jamb, like he was considering
forcing her way in.
“Open the door.”
Jay stared at him dumbly, unable to process the sight of her tall,
wealthy stepbrother standing in the dilapidated hallway of her not-so-cheap
apartment. He was wearing distressed dark-wash jeans and a blazer that was
perfectly tailored to his broad shoulders. A backpack hung loosely over one
of them and in his other hand was a yowling cat carrier. That was what
broke through her glaze of shock and made her fumble to undo the chain.
Someone might see—
“What are you doing here?” she asked, stepping back, as he shoved the
door open with a bang that made her wince. “Shouldn’t you be at the
office?”
“I took some personal days.”
“To come here?”
He set the carrier down, fixing her with a look. “What do you think?”
Jay did not know what to think, so she stepped past him to shut the
front door before bending to undo the one on the carrier, half-expecting him
to grab her. He didn’t, but just him being in the room had her shaking so
badly that it still took her two tries to undo the latch.
Her poor cat immediately darted under her bed. Jay wanted to hide,
too.
Conscious of the tears on her face and Nicholas’s silent anger, Jay
removed the top of the carrier, and took the three-quarters empty jug of cat
sand out of the front hall closet to fill the now-converted litter box. She was
glad for the task. It bought her time, because she could feel his eyes on her,
heavy and accusing, and she was not sure how to speak around the lump
that had formed in her throat. Too much lay between them and the thought
of broaching any of it left her feeling paralyzed, especially while he was
looking at her like that.
“I asked you a question, Jay.”
“I—I d-don’t know.”
You know how to beg, though, that voice in her head whispered.
She glanced up sharply from filling the box, all of their exchanges from
the last week filling the silence that hung between them. He was still
watching her and the muted fire in his gaze made her instantly aware of the
fact that she was on her knees in front of him, clad only in her sleep shorts
and a threadbare shirt with no bra.
Jay swung to her feet so quickly that she got a bit of a head rush. “If
this is about what I said earlier, I’m sorry. I shouldn’t have overreac—”
His hands shot out to grab her, spanning beneath her ribs. Her voice
faded into a croak. She wanted to back away, but there was nowhere to back
to, so she put her hands on his chest, flat. To push him away, or so she told
herself, though once she touched him, neither of them moved.
“You know why I’m here.” He breathed in once, deeply. The look on
his face shifted from anger to something she was far more familiar with,
that made her fingers bite into the fabric until she could feel the minute shift
of his pectoral muscles. “Let’s not play games for fucking once.”
“I wasn’t—”
“You are.” His voice was quiet, vicious. “You’ve been crying.”
She did push at him then, and he gripped her tighter.
“I came here because you called me. Because I care about you.”
The floor jerked beneath her feet. “Nick, I—”
“I really don’t want to hear your excuses, Justine.”
The cold authority in his voice, and the way he lingered over her full
name, did strange things to her body. Why is he calling me that?
She swayed slightly when he removed her hands from his chest and
brought them to her sides. His grip was loose, but Jay was pretty sure he
wouldn’t let her get away if she tried to run. Just to be certain, she gave an
experimental wriggle and his fingers tightened, accompanied by a
forbidding hum in the back of his throat that caused her pulse to spike.
Still holding onto her wrists, he gave her a nudge backwards. “Sit
down.”
She backed obediently as he herded her to the tiny loveseat that sat
catty corner to her favorite blue chair. Then he pushed down on her
shoulders with the same practiced shove that he used on her in bed. Her legs
buckled as if primed, and she collapsed on the faded cushions. The sound
that left her was a little too harsh, and it made him look at her again, slow
and speculative.
Jay hunched her shoulders, trying to hide how hard her nipples had
gotten.
“I just got out of that fucking airport and you—” He paused, and she
folded her arms. “I need to decide what to do with you.”
“What?” she scoffed. “Are you going to punish me?”
“Yes.”
Yes? He shrugged off his blazer and tossed it onto her chair. Their eyes
met. Her fingers dug into her own flesh as she tried to control her breathing.
He didn’t approach, though. Instead, he went to her kitchen nook and began
rooting through her cupboards. The old T-shirt clung to his body with each
twisting movement, highlighting the flex of heavy muscle beneath.
She stared at his arms. “What do you mean, yes?”
“I’m going to punish you.”
Jay willed herself to be angry. She wanted to be angry. How dare he
come bursting into her kitchen with all his talk about punishments?
Pain flared on her forearms; she’d gouged herself with her own nails.
Jay grabbed a couch cushion, hugging that to her chest instead. Sweat was
making her top stick to her arms and back.
“What are you going to do?”
He didn’t respond.
“What are you looking for in there?” she continued, settling on a
hostile tone that she hoped hid how thoroughly unsettled she was. “Maybe I
can help you find it.”
He glanced over his shoulder briefly before ripping open a teabag. That
look made her throat tighten until it felt like she was breathing in through a
straw.
“It’s my apartment,” she went on recklessly. It was as if she were
unable to stop, even though she was knew she was making things worse. “I
know where everything is. You could ask me instead of bulldozing around
my kitchen.”
With more emphasis than necessary, Nicholas dropped the teabag into
one of her mugs, which he filled with cold water and then put it into a
microwave. Watching his hands on her things, imagining them on her body,
was making her antsy. God, why wouldn’t he say anything?
“I have a water boiler,” she blurted. “You don’t need to do that.
Nobody who’s civilized heats tea in the microwave.”
“You fucking ran from me.”
The words fell like blades, looming between them until the microwave
bleeped. Pulling his eyes away from her at last, Nicholas topped the mug
off with more cold water before carrying it over to her, and she tried not to
flinch at his nearness.
“I wasn’t running.”
“Oh really? Is that why you fucked me like you were saying goodbye?
And then sent me a picture to bait me, like you wanted me to have
something to use against you?”
The glacial calm scared her more than his anger did, because there was
nothing there to fight against, only a cold, hard truth that had her sliding
down towards the inevitable as he pressed the warm mug into her hands.
Mistaking the cause for her alarm, he said, “Oh, we’ll be discussing the
photo, too—after you tell me what your mother said to you to get you so
worked up that you decided to go full no-contact.”
“Nick—”
“Don’t Nick me. You’ve been giving me the runaround for days and
I’m not putting up with it now.” He paused. “Not until I get to fuck it out of
you.”
She nearly dropped the mug. The sting of hot tea on her bare thighs
made her hiss. Nicholas took it from her trembling hands and set it on the
end table.
Fuck it out of me. The cushion slipped out from beneath her arm.
Nicholas took that away, too, tossing it aside as he knelt in front of her.
She backed from him and he put his hand on her bare knee, looking up at
her from his spot between her legs.
“Tell me what your mother said.”
The left knee of his jeans was frayed and she wondered if it was
intentional or he just liked the pair too much to throw them away. “I don’t
want to,” she whispered, staring at the threads.
“I didn’t fly almost four hundred miles for I don’t want to, little bird.”
“You’re going to be angry.”
“I already am.” He drew his thumb over her kneecap. It sent
goosebumps soaring up and down her legs, eliciting a dull throb from her
clit. “Tell me anyway.”
Feeling winded, Jay gasped out, “She called me—a . . . a whore.”
“And?”
She glanced away, rubbing at her tea-dampened shorts. Her eyes were
stinging and far too warm. “She said I was just like her, only w-worse
because I was t-too stupid to get paid. She hates me,” she cried out, her
voice rising. “She sold me to you because she—h-hates me.”
Her voice broke into a raw sob, tears escaping before she could stop
them. His face was too blurry to see his expression but Jay recognized the
offensive set to his shoulders.
“Oh, god—” her voice came out sounding clotted and pathetic “—don’t
—”
“That dried-up old cunt.”
“Nick!”
“You’re really going to defend your mother to me now?”
“N-no, but—”
“Your mother, who gave me your number and home address for less
than it costs to buy a fucking car, because she knew damn well what would
happen if I showed up on your front step and maybe,” he finished, moving
slowly to circle behind the couch, “she even wanted it to?”
There was a terrible silence, so loud it was nearly deafening. Her
breathing left her in a shaky rush when one of his arms slipped around her
waist from behind.
“She knew what I wanted to do to you.”
The words slid into her like a knife.
That wasn’t a man regretting the loss of his sister.
“No.” She jerked, breathless. “Stop it. I don’t want to hear this!”
“All right.” Jay stopped breathing when he dusted his knuckles over the
front of her shirt. “Then let’s talk about what you sent me at work.”
Her breasts tingled. She pushed against him and he tightened his arm.
“I was drunk.”
“You know what I think, Jay?” He let his free hand fall to her lap,
pressing hard enough that they could both feel how wet she was now. Jay
lurched forward again, and he spread her through her shorts, putting
pressure on her clit until she gasped. “I think it turns you on to fuck with
me.”
“It doesn’t.”
He blew into her ear: “Liar.”
Heat shimmered over her skin in a rolling wave as he slid his fingers
against the crotch of her pants, soaking her through both layers of cotton.
God, this was familiar. The shame. Her fingertips throbbed. Everything
throbbed. She grabbed the arm around her waist and tried unsuccessfully to
remove it from her body. “Why are you being such a bastard?”
“Because I don’t know what’s going on in your head. You still look at
me like I’m a monster. The only time I know when I’m making you feel
anything is when I’m i—”
He broke off, and when he withdrew, it was like a slap. “Fuck,” he said,
almost too quietly for her to hear. And then slightly louder, as he stepped
back into view, facing the direction of her cardboard boxes, “Fuck.”
“Nicholas, don’t—”
“I don’t know what I—” His eyes scanned the boxes, an expression on
his face that she would almost call trapped. Then he did a double-take. Jay,
following the direction of his eyes, felt her heart sink as he walked towards
the box that held all her rocks. “What is that?”
The word don’t rose to her lips again, but she wasn’t sure what it was
that she wanted to tell him not to do.
He picked up the gypsum rose, and Jay nearly protested again, except
that he held it as carefully in his large hands as he had the night he’d given
it to her as a present.
Before everything had gone so terribly wrong.
“You told me you sold this.”
Jay looked away. His startled expression disappeared, and whatever
vulnerable, desperate emotion she thought she’d glimpsed hardened before
her eyes, just like stone.
“So, you really can be cruel.” He ran his thumbs over the florets before
setting it carefully back into the box, in a way that made her throat ache. It
wasn’t until she’d released the breath that she’d been holding that Jay could
admit to her fear that he’d been going to throw it. “You must have hated
me.”
“I did,” she agreed, her voice a broken whisper.
“Not enough to sell the rock, though.”
Jay looked at her hands, willing them to stop hurting. Willing
everything to stop hurting. “How could I? It was the only proof I had that
anyone in that house ever loved me.”
“I still do.” Nicholas hovered over the loveseat, impossibly tall, before
swinging onto the cushions. She scrambled back as he crawled towards her
on his hands and knees. The rough denim of his jeans abraded her bare skin
and the sensation of it pulsed like an electric shock between her thighs. “I
tore myself apart when you left and I am not going to lose you again.”
The arm of the couch hit her back. She looked up at him, breathing so
hard that she felt like she might choke on the sheer abundance of air in the
room.
“Jay.” He leaned closer—she could see the stubble dotting his cheeks
and chin, the bursts of color caught in his pale grey eyes. “We’ve wasted
too much time trying to hurt each other.”
Jay shot him a trapped look, her fingers digging into the plush. The
rasp of his breathing was all she could hear over the ringing in her ears.
“No,” she said, denying them, denying this. Her heart was on the verge of
implosion. “Nick, please—”
“Why won’t you love me?” he asked, his deep voice cracking.
Unable to put distance between their bodies, she turned her face away,
bracing herself for the force she was sure was coming, the punishing grip
on her wrists, but when it didn’t, and she glanced at his achingly familiar
face, something inside of her cracked, and everything came pouring out.
“You want to control who I am,” she cried. “You want to . . . remake
me. You’re always trying to put me into clothes I don’t want to wear or buy
me things I don’t need, forcing me do things I don’t want. And I’ve tried to
talk to you about it, but you don’t listen. It’s like you want me to be an
accessory, like the watch you wear around your wrist—”
“That’s not what I want.” He ripped his shirt off impatiently and the
graze of his bare shoulder against her bent knee sent another glittering jolt
of desire racing through her. “I want the Jay who sits like a little princess at
her desk and has everyone in her thrall, and this Jay—” He yanked at her
shorts and underwear, causing her hips to buck involuntarily. “The Jay who
claws my back up when I fuck her too hard and loves to call me Daddy.”
Jay looked at him—that was a mistake. Because the sight of Nicholas
bare-chested and on his knees, looking at her body like a condemned man
looking at his last meal, stole what little breath remained in her lungs.
You’re the sweetest girl I know, he’d said, but sweet things got consumed
until there was nothing left and she already felt like she was gone.
She tried, one last time, to protest, but the sound that left her seemed to
snap what restraint he had remaining and he didn’t let her try a second time,
hauling her legs up over his shoulders and doing things with his mouth that
made her remember pitch-black bedrooms and passion as fatally bitter as
cyanide. When his lip caught against her damp skin and she felt the cool
press of his teeth, she bowed against him so desperately that he pressed on
her abdomen to pin her down.
“Nicholas,” she cried out. “Oh god.”
“Fuck,” he said, in a slightly breathless tone that let her know that he
wasn’t as unaffected as he was pretending to be. “I’m almost sorry to do
this.”
“W-what?”
He pulled away, eliciting a frustrated groan from her as he unzipped his
jeans. His erection sprang out of his pants, the head already swollen and
glistening as it curved towards his belly.
“This.” He slid his fist up his cock, in smooth, quick jerk. “Take your
shirt off.”
She gripped her t-shirt by the hem, trying to ignore the stickiness on
her inner thighs, and the desperate ache building in her belly as she slowly
peeled it off. Her nipples, already hard, puckered under his gaze, and her
breasts felt sore and heavy.
Nicholas prowled up her body like an animal and kissed her so hard
that they both fell back against the couch, making her aware of every dip
and ridge in his hard, lean torso, and the drag of his heavy cock against her
bare stomach. “I told you what would happen if you teased me at work.”
With a final tug at her lower lip, he took her hands by the wrists and at
first she thought he planned to tie them, which sent another bolt of fear
rushing through her like an icy river. But he put the heels of her palms on
her breasts instead, compressing them beneath his own until she understood
that he wanted her to keep them there.
“Nick,” she said, her voice small and uncertain.
The hard pressure of his hips was immobilizing and the unexpected
intimacy of what he was making her do made her suddenly very desperate
not to look at him.
But when she turned away, he put two fingers to her cheek to tilt her
head back.
“Eyes on me.”
It was an addictive feeling, shame. Heady and disorienting, it poured
through her like hot whiskey. She was a moth in a lantern, caged by the
means to her destruction, and god, right now, she wanted to shut herself up
with that flame and burn.
“Did I make you come at your desk?”
His eyes narrowed and he thrust harder, hitting her mouth. “Kiss me.”
Jay leaned forward and covered the blunt head of his cock in an openmouthed kiss. A guttural snarl tore out of him as he ground his hips against
her breasts, pushing his impressive length deeper into her mouth. Jay
tongued him so viciously that he jerked back with a savage breath, his chest
heaving. She wondered if he’d looked this feral when he was in his office,
buttoned into his suit.
“Did you ruin your pants?” she asked.
Nicholas stared at her like she was a stranger. Then his jaw hardened
and he thrust forward again, watching her mouth open as she took him in.
There was fresh tension in him now, and she could sense his resistance in
every fiber of his beautiful, stubborn body.
Who’s not very good at kissing now?
He must have felt her smile because he leaned down, pushing all her
hair back, gathering all those coils in his fingers like it was precious gold,
before holding her face in his hands.
“Are you enjoying this?”
“No,” Jay said, around his cock, and she heard him hiss as she traced
her tongue over the sensitized glans. His eyes rolled back and she saw a
muscle in his throat jump as he tried to fight his response, but his fingers
traced down her jaw until he caught himself and pulled away.
“I don’t believe you. But right now—” He gripped the arm of the
loveseat for better control as he slowly pumped his hips. His gaze began to
drift and a muscle in his cheek tautened. “Right now, it feels so good that I
really don’t fucking care.”
He’s close, thought Jay. She could tell. It was written in the line
between his straight black brows, and the slight hollowing of those arrogant
cheekbones.
When he came, he looked like he was in pain.
“Fuck,” he said again. His eyes swung towards her, and it was like
watching light come in through a gothic window, spearing through all that
terrible, twisted darkness. “Do you want to give me what I really want?
What I fucking crave?”
She gave a short jerk of ascent, her body braced beneath his.
“Tell me you love me.”
It was like he’d slapped her. “No,” Jay gasped.
“But that’s what I want,” he said, withdrawing. “I want you to be all
mine. And I’d be so good at pleasing you, and making you happy. And all
you need to do—is tell me yes.”
Fear wound through her, and so did something else; it was hot and
feverish. This was the most dangerous game they had ever played, and its
potential to destroy enthralled her.
“I d-don’t know how to give you what you’re asking,” she protested,
hating that she was naked and on display like this, when she already felt so
exposed. “I—I don’t know how to love someone. It’s like I’m broken. If I
told you I loved you, it m-might be a lie.”
“Then lie to me.” He thrust again, bruising her ribs. “It’s not like I’m
asking for your soul.”
But you are.
Jay squeezed her eyes shut, unable to look at him. He didn’t seem to
like that. He pinched one of her nipples, and the stimulation made her
groan. “Please . . . don’t make me.”
“Do it,” he said, each word falling like a stone. “Or I’ll show that
picture around the office and everyone will know what you’re like when
you take off your prim little office clothes.”
Oh god. Her head spun, leaving her dizzied by the rush. It was so
familiar, so addictive, that she felt lost in it. She missed the bitterness in his
voice, and with her eyes shut tight, she didn’t see the way he was looking at
her. All she could think was, he wouldn’t really do it, but also, how cruel
that he would threaten to, especially now. I should hate him, she thought,
and not for the first time.
“You wouldn’t do that,” she cried. “I’d hate you.”
“Say it, Jay,” he said. “I won’t ask again.”
The weight of him, the heat, the salty citrus of his skin—she couldn’t
bear it. Her desire for him was like a knife twisting in her belly, as lethal as
it was inevitable.
They had both grown up and yet still, she could deny him nothing.
She craved the knife.
“I love you, Daddy. I’m sorry I was bad.”
The sound he made—Jay shuddered as the seeping heat of his precome spilled over her collarbones and down her throat. That was why he’d
pushed her hair back, she realized. So he wouldn’t get it in her hair. “Fuck,”
he said hoarsely. “Yes.”
The slick head of his cock pressed against her parted, trembling lips as
he fell forward again.
“Say it again.” She could see the strain in his arms, the tendons
popping out along his wrists. His eyelashes were a dark sweep against his
swarthy cheekbones, and through the narrowed slits, his pupils were so
large that his irises were nearly black. “With your mouth on me.”
“I love you,” she choked, struggling to speak around him as he finished
in her mouth. The control must have cost him dearly. She had to shut her
eyes again, unable to look at him any longer. It was like staring down a
blaze from across the dark hallway of her soul.
Her stepbrother. Her demon prince.
The man she couldn’t let herself love.
“I love you,” she said again, sobbing the words. “I’m sorry, Daddy.
Please. I’m sorry.”
His sigh came from somewhere deep in his chest and he thumbed some
of the tears from her damp cheek with an absent affection that pounded
through her body like a stake in the heart.
“I know, little bird,” he said, his voice rough and hoarse. “I am, too.”

Chapter Eight

I love you.
Three simple words. He had forgotten how good they felt to hear,
coming from someone who meant everything. Someone who knew all of
your sins and accepted them—and you—anyway.
Nicholas sighed and worked his shoulders. Her bed was ridiculously
small. He’d spent most of the night with his back against the wall, keeping
his legs bent so they wouldn’t dangle off the edge of her twin. Jay was
curled against him, with her face buried in the crook of his arm. Her hair
was spilling over her shoulder, brushing his nose. It still smelled like her
shampoo.
Her cat was balled up behind his knees, its purring the only sound in
the room.
Can you love me, Jay? He wondered, broodingly. Or is that why you
can never bring yourself to look me in the eyes when we fuck?
Wherever she’d been mentally last night, it hadn’t fully been with him.
Even after he’d gently cleaned her with a damp towel, and combed his
fingers through the tangled locks of her hair, there had been an absent look
on her face. It reminded him of the first time, when she’d frozen him out,
too horrified by what they had done to even look at him.
That familiar coldness took root in his chest. “I didn’t mean it,” he had
said, feeling clumsy as he spoke into the silence. “What I said about the
picture, and the office.”
Jay didn’t respond.
He leaned forward, cupping her throat in his hand, one of his fingers
pressed against her lips. She let out a ragged gasp as he forced one of his
knees between her legs, shifting until she was cradling all of him between
her rounded thighs. “I didn’t mean it. I wouldn’t do that to you.”
“I know.” The words were hollow and far from reassuring.
That icy sensation sharpened, becoming knife-like. “Are you all right?”
It took her a moment to speak. Maybe she wasn’t sure if he meant now,
or before. He wasn’t entirely sure what he meant, either. Only that he
desperately wanted the answer.
He felt the cords of her throat shift beneath his fingers as she sighed
and fell back against him in the dark. “You didn’t let me finish.”
It took him a moment to understand, because for once, sex was the
farthest thing from his mind. But then he did, and then his hips became a
cradle of heat.
“Do you want to?”
“Yes, Daddy,” she whispered.
With a grunt, he leaned over and groped for his jeans, fishing out the
condom he kept in his wallet. She was as smooth as glass when he entered
her, and when he reached around her hips to keep her spread open around
his thrusting cock so he could massage her clit, she was already wet.
The marks she’d left on his arms still stung.
His eyes flicked past her now-sleeping form to his phone, which he’d
set on her “nightstand” of precariously stacked hardcovers. It was on silent
but the screen was lighting up with alerts.
More emails, he thought, threading his fingers through her tangled hair
until they caught while he leaned forward to grab it. Every time someone at
Beaucroft Assets took a shit, someone CC’d him on an email informing him
about it. The CEO of that “family” company had folded, though, just like
he’d known they would.
Everyone always did if you waited long enough.
Nicholas looked at Jay again, her face mostly angled away from him.
He released the lock of hair he’d been toying with and slid carefully over
her hips before vaulting from the bed.
The cat stretched and joined him.
He looked around her room, surprised by how small it was. Halfbedroom, half-kitchen, it wasn’t even half the size of his garage. There was
a line of mismatched fake plants on her dresser and a pile of fake chenille
blankets in the corner. In case she got cold, he supposed.
Impulsively, he snapped one open and draped it over her bare
shoulders.
Walking over to his backpack, he pulled out a pair of shorts. As he
tugged them over his hips, his wandering eye caught on a photo collage,
faded from age. He scowled at the image of a younger Jay with a short
Latino man. The waiter, probably. His arm was draped possessively around
her waist and she was hunching, trying to look shorter.
Did you fuck him with the lights off, too?
Her cat sped past his legs as he walked into the kitchen area. Her fridge
had an ancient box of baking soda that had probably come with this dump
and a few bottles of half-empty vegan hot sauce, but not much else. There
were takeout cartons in the trash and a bottle of wine, but it didn’t look like
she’d been eating much. The only thing in the pantry was a single can of
corn.
He couldn’t imagine living this way, in a room so small that there was
barely room to hear yourself think, dimly lit, filled with the constant blare
of noise from the streets.
It was fucking unconscionable. She’d thrown him over for this?
That’s how much she despised you, that voice in his head whispered.
She’d have rather lived like this, than with you.
Nicholas shook that voice off and yanked on his T-shirt. She wasn’t
going to live like that now. He couldn’t make this place any less of a
shithole, but he could get some decent food into her. He popped in his
earbuds and shoved his wallet into the back pocket of his shorts. It took him
a moment to find her keys. He eventually located them in a small ceramic
dish shaped like a cabbage leaf. The sight of it put a catch in his throat.
She had a life here and I was never intended to be part of it.
There were several grocery stores nearby, according to his phone. As he
walked out of her complex, he nearly hit an older man lurking around out
front. The man looked at him and then quickly away, shoving his hands
deep into the pockets of his blazer as he headed down the street.
Nicholas eyed him frowningly, watching as he disappeared around the
corner.
With metal cranked up in his ears, he jogged along the city streets,
dodging pedestrians. The morning air was clear and sharp, carrying with it
unpleasant smells he didn’t care to know the origins of. Did Jay take this
path—alone? Homeless people were shooting up in the middle of the public
square and every second building seemed to have a dull, tired cast to it.
Most of them had bars over the doors and windows. So did Jay’s apartment.
When he’d first hired that PI, the first thing he’d wanted to know was
whether or not she was living alone. If he could find that out, anyone could.
He slowed as he approached the corner store. It was awash in grayish
fluorescent lights and had a smell like old dishwater. 70s pop was playing
from the speakers overhead. Nicholas grabbed whatever he thought he
might have seen Jay eating before, reading the labels before dropping them
into the basket. The little nerd had harped enough about gelatin and lard that
he felt like he was basically vegan, once removed. As he went down the
health aisle, he picked up a box of condoms.
(I don’t know how to love someone)
He was scowling by the time he dropped his basket on the conveyor
belt and began unloading. The cashier bushed when she scanned his items,
unable to look him in the face after she put the box of condoms in the bag.
“Did you, ah, find everything okay?”
“Yeah,” he said slowly. “Thanks.”
“Have a good morning,” she said, clearly by rote, before making a
panicked face as she clearly realized just how good his morning might be
about to be.
It almost made him smile.
Nicholas slung the bag over his wrist and headed back to Jay’s
apartment. The homeless people were still there, much to his consternation,
and now there was a man playing jazz on a sax. A regular fucking
Broadway, this streetcorner. All it was missing was a siren.
Jay’s apartment was like a bubble of silence after those impossibly loud
streets. She was still asleep, hugging the pillow in a way he found very
sweet. Did I wear you out, little bird? He set a bottle of water on the
nightstand, studying her sleeping face, and wondering what to do.
He had his plan regarding her career. And as for her mother, she had to
be stopped. They weren’t children anymore and they could do as they damn
well pleased. It was his fucking house, not hers, and so was everything
inside it.
Including her daughter.
Whatever leverage Danielle thought she had over Jay was gone.
He’d be the one to take care of her now. And as soon as they got back
to Hollybrook, he was going to make sure Jay knew that.
The only family they needed was each other.

Jay woke up alone.
She wondered, with a sick bolt of dread, if she’d dreamed last night’s
encounter. Just thinking about it—I love you—made her squirm in
discomfort. Groaning, she sat up and realized as soon as she felt the muted
throb in her lower belly that the discomfort wasn’t entirely due to her
imagination.
Shit, she thought.
Her eyes flicked to the other side of the bed. He was gone, but he’d
come back long enough to leave a bottle of Evian on the stack of books that
served as her nightstand. She uncapped it, noticing that there was a folded
shirt on his side of the bed. When she unfurled it, she recognized it as the
one he’d been wearing last night.
She traced the peeling logo on the front—Avenged Sevenfold—before
pulling it over her head. The scent of him suffused her senses; he’d been
wearing the same aftershave since he was a teenager and the sharpness of it
sliced through her thoughts like pith.
(You’ve been a bad girl and now I’m going to fuck you like one)
The sound of her bathroom door opening made her look up sharply as
Nicholas padded out as comfortably as if this apartment was his. He was
sweaty, like he’d been running, wearing mesh shorts and a snug T-shirt that
was nearly sheer where the white material plastered against his skin.
He hadn’t noticed she was awake yet. Music was blasting from his
earbuds and she thought she could make out who it was even at this
distance. She was pretty sure she even knew the song: it had been one of his
favorites to fuck her to.
She watched, incredulously, as he went right to her fridge and began
loading things into it from a plastic bag. That propelled her into motion,
walking across the room so quickly that it nearly left her dizzy as she
tapped insistently at his arm.
He straightened up in surprise.
“What are you doing?”
It came out accusatory. She hadn’t meant it to. Luckily, he hadn’t
seemed to have heard, eyes dropping to her legs in an automatic once-over
as he pulled the buds out of his ears.
“Hmm?”
Jay repeated herself, resisting the urge to step out of reach when he
leaned over the barrier of the fridge door. The front of his shirt was a neartransparent veil. Beneath the clingy material, she could make out the
shadow of his chest hair.
“I asked what you were doing.”
“You didn’t have any food. I went ahead and took care of that for you.”
Drops of sweat scattered from his hair as he shook his head. Wet, the dark
strands had a slight curl to them. “What have you been eating? Your fridge
was empty.”
“I’ve been getting takeout,” she said defensively.
He raised one eyebrow. “Just takeout?”
“Not that I need to justify my purchases to a literal billionaire but I
didn’t see the point in buying groceries when I was just going to be leaving
again.”
She saw his eyes flick to the trashcan and wondered, with a flash of
anger, if he’d gone through it. If he had noticed the empty bottle of wine
and the very discernible lack of takeout cartons.
“You should have woken me. This isn’t the best area and your watch is
expensive. People prey on rich boys like you.”
His face, which had started out stern, relaxed into something
approximating amusement as he closed the door with a decisive click and
sidled closer, propping his fist against the wall over her head. Her eyes went
to his arm, which wasn’t quite barring her escape, and then to his face. A
lock of hair had fallen into his eyes and shifted distractingly every time he
blinked.
“Are you worried about me, blue jay? That’s so sweet.”
Jay hiked her chin up. “You could have gotten mugged.”
He laughed. “Yeah, right.”
“I was mugged. The day you barged into my office, someone snatched
my purse. And then you came in and I—” Jay broke off, not finishing. But
she thought, You brought it all back.
All traces of humor vanished instantly from his face. “You didn’t tell
me that.”
“Why would I?”
There was a leaden pause as he took that in. Then he made a bitter
sound. “I see.”
“I didn’t mean it like that.” Although she had, a tiny bit. When he had
first brought her to his home, she had been determined to give him as little
of herself as possible.
He already fucked her like he owned her; she didn’t want him to walk
away thinking that he actually did. Not when he held so much else over her
head.
From a very young age, this man had been raised to be a wolf in a
room of sheep. Everything about him spoke of power, whether he was in
the boardroom or the bedroom. Part of that was in the way he carried
himself, but most of it was thinking that the world was his to own if he
could open his jaws wide enough to devour it.
A sulky expression was stealing over his face. It made him look less
like an entitled billionaire and more like a pissed off teenager, and she
found herself softening in spite of herself.
Oh, Nick.
She reached up and smoothed the lock of hair that was bothering her
out of his eyes, and he stared at her in a way that would have made her
laugh if she didn’t already want to cry.
“Thanks for doing the shopping, you idiot.”
“I said I’d take care of you.” His eyelids shuttered as she trailed her
fingers down his unshaven jaw and she felt him lean into her touch. When
he looked at her like that, with those downcast eyes, she felt hunted. “I
meant it.”
She flinched a little. “I can’t afford to depend on people.”
“Normal people do, blue jay.” His strong fingers stroked over her
knuckles, coaxing them flat as he brought her hand to the broad plane of his
chest. “It’s like a leap of faith.”
She watched him carefully. “You know, we’ve never really talked about
finances, religion, family. That’s something people usually discuss before
they get married.”
“So?”
“So, don’t you want a family? Your values were always more
traditional than mine and I don’t want kids.”
“I know. That doesn’t matter to me.”
“How would you know that?” Jay demanded. “I know I never told
you.”
“You wouldn’t bring anyone else into a world that’s already broken
your heart.”
Fuck. That stung and tears stabbed at her eyes with a blinding
sharpness. She stepped back from him and hit the wall with a thud that
reverberated throughout her entire body. “How fucking dare you,” she
gasped out. “What do you know about heartbreak?”
He sighed. “Don’t cry, Jay.”
“No. You do not get to say shit like that to me and then tell me not to
cry.” Jay swiped at her eyes, wanting to storm out, to leave, but that was the
problem with a small apartment like this. The only place to escape to was
the bathroom—and he was blocking it with the body she couldn’t let herself
look at, because it would mean having to admit that she wanted to.
“Why is this so hard?” she asked pathetically.
“It doesn’t have to be. It could just be . . . easy.”
Nicholas stepped closer and she froze, breathing a little harder. He gave
her a minute, but it felt more like a cat toying with a mouse when he leaned
in and slid his palm down her back, her hips, all the way to her ass.
“You look good in my clothes.”
Jay eyed him, wanting to be angry. He flicked the hem of his shirt,
giving her a little teasing grin, and it was a tantalizing glimpse of what
normal could look like, for them. No cruel games. No fronting. Just a man
who looked at her as if she were his first glimpse of sun in a world of
darkness.
(You have to come to me in the light)
Her face must have changed, because whatever he saw there made him
put his fingers between her legs. She still wasn’t wearing underwear and he
watched her suck in as he gently traced the swollen edges of her pussy,
dipping just deep enough that there was no denying she was wet.
You hurt me, she thought, her breasts rising and falling beneath the
peeling decal on his faded T-shirt. You hurt me and you made me like it, and
I know you’re going to do it again.
His gaze dropped to her lips, which had already parted, but he was the
first to pull away.
“Did you want to hang around here all day or are you going to show
me the city?”
Jay swallowed around the catch in her throat as he absently wiped his
fingers on his shorts. “Really? You want to see it? I—I thought you were
here to drag me back to Hollybrook after fucking me to my senses.”
That made him frown and she almost regretted saying it. “I rented you
that U-Haul for at least a week.” His eyes passed over her empty cabinets
assessingly. “It looks like you’ve gotten most of it done already. I think you
can afford to take a break.”
Jay didn’t want to admit that she owned so little, she’d barely even
begun. She had already caught him glancing around in disbelief, like he
thought she lived in a slum. “I wasn’t expecting to play tour guide but sure,
I suppose I can think of some places to take you to.”
“Good, because you stood me up the last time I tried to show you a
night out here.”
Jay gave him a harsh look, leaning away. “You were going to fuck me
in your hotel.”
“Yeah, but I was going to buy you a really expensive dinner first.” His
mouth shifted into what she could only describe as an obnoxious fuck-boy
grin. “And lots of shots.”
“Charming.”
“I can be.” Nicholas gave her ass a light swat that had her drawing in a
ragged breath. “I’m sure you’ll be a very satisfactory tour guide. Where do
you usually go to have your fun?”
“Probably nowhere you’d be interested in, if Turkish nightclubs are
your scene.” Jay tugged the shirt down defiantly. “I seem to remember you
partying your way through most of high school, though, so this must be a
natural progression.”
“And you used to do just about anything your friends told you to do.”
His smile had a dangerous edge that made her heart beat faster. “You
pounded the shots back, too, even if most of them did end up being water.
And I remember everyone would stop to watch you dance.”
“Well, I don’t do that anymore,” Jay said sharply, aware of every point
of contact between them. Of the heat pouring off his body like a furnace.
The way the tackiness of his shirt made the fabric mold to his chest,
showing every line of muscle, and—fuck. She took a step back, crowding
against the wall. “I’ll take you to the art museum. Lily said they have an
exhibit on ephemeral art.”
Nicholas watched her with obvious amusement. “I think the last time I
went to a museum was for a fundraiser at the Getty. I was so busy dodging
people with clipboards that I didn’t have time to look at the art.”
“I really doubt anyone’s going to be chasing you with a clipboard at the
SFMoMa, unless it’s me and I’m beating you over the head with it.”
That made him swat her ass again. “We can go to your museum but if I
have to look at a bunch of paint smears for an hour, we’re getting drunk at
lunch and I get to stare at your ass as much as I want.”
“Oh my god, you are such a cultureless swine.”
“What? I have art at home.”
The sheer arrogance of those words made her jaw drop, and when he
started laughing, she realized, with a furious blush, that he was trying to
provoke her on purpose.
“Asshole.”
His smile became less teasing, more rapacious. “You owe me a slutty
punishment dress for making me come down here to get you, by the way.”
“I don’t remember agreeing to that.”
“Doesn’t matter. I’m putting you in something short and low-cut.” He
kissed her, his hand coming up to cushion the back of her skull as he jostled
her up against the wall. “I want to see leg.”
“I want to see leg,” Jay repeated. “Are you serious?”
“Daddy loves it when his cold little bird looks a little slutty.” He thrust
his tongue into her mouth, squeezing the back of her neck. “It gets me hot.”
“What doesn’t?” Jay muttered, turning her face away. “You just enjoy
tormenting me.”
“Just like how you enjoy begging me to do it.” Unbothered, he tugged
at her shirt, making her scramble to hold it down over the front of her
thighs. “Come shower with me.”
God, Jay thought dazedly. Who is this man? “It’s an old shower. You
might be too tall for it.”
Nicholas flicked her tongue against her ear. “Then I’ll kneel.”
Jay nearly fell over when he released her.
Fuck, she thought.

Nicholas had told himself that it was just sex that he wanted, but it was
the moments before and after that he really craved: watching her comb out
the tangles that he’d put in her hair by pulling on it, the feel of her fingers
against his chest when she unbuttoned his shirt.
These little moments of forced tenderness were the closest he’d ever
been to love.
One night when both their parents were out, he let himself into her
room. She had been relaxing in bed with a book, though she shot bolt
upright when she saw him. The way she covered herself, using the book as
a shield, was like an arrow in his chest. The pain made him feel helpless,
which made him angry.
“What do you want?” she asked, in an icy tone that didn’t quite hide
the fact that her bare shoulders were shaking.
“Come shower with me. You don’t even have to fuck me,” he added,
hating how much it sounded like pleading but too desperate to care. “Just
wash my back while I get off.”
He could still remember the look of disgust on her face. He’d told
himself it didn’t matter how she looked at him when her clothes were off.
Not when she belonged to him in all the ways that mattered. But she hadn’t,
not really. When he pulled her in for a kiss beneath the steaming spray, it
was like kissing a statue of a girl. He’d taken everything from her but what
he really wanted.
Nicholas peeled off his T-shirt, blinking away those memories of his
younger self. They clung to his skin like a film as he took in the small
shower stall with its mounted showerhead that didn’t appear to be
adjustable. That was unfortunate. He’d planned to use it on her.
Jay worried at the hem of her shirt before yanking it off in a quick
gesture. Blood immediately rushed to his cock, but he pretended at
nonchalance as he fiddled with the knob of the shower. There was some
kind of paint on it, to make it look like granite, but it was flaking off. Left
for hot, right for cold. He cranked it to the left, lathering up some of her
shampoo and running it through his hair the same way he had when she was
at college and he had stolen into her room, desperate for a piece of her.
It still smells the same.
Jay slipped in beside him, her shoulders up to her ears. She appeared to
be sucking in, like she was trying to make herself smaller, but she wouldn’t
look at him. He could hear her breathing quicken every time his hard cock
grazed her back.
He turned the water warmer, noting the goosebumps on her arms. The
smell of apple freesia was heady as it rose up on soft clouds of steam,
causing the baby hairs around her temples to frizz. Bending, he whispered,
“Hot enough for you?”
Jay turned to look at him with one arm barred over her chest. Water
clung to her long eyelashes, sliding down her cheeks like tears when she
blinked. “It’s fine.”
“You know how I feel about fine.”
She flushed. “I remember,” she said stiffly.
Nicholas pulled her arm away from her body. “Are you sure?”
Her eyes immediately dropped from his and she turned back around to
stare at the wall. His mouth pulled down, dissatisfied, as he took in the
smooth, stiff lines of her back.
She’s afraid.
Jay let out a squeak when he put his hands on her shoulders. He waited
a beat before fanning his fingers out, working his thumbs into the muscle
until he felt her unkink. Standing as close as he was, he actually felt her
shuddering sigh as he smoothed his hands down her arms.
“What . . . are you doing?” Her voice was a little high.
“Playing with you.” He drew her hair away from her nape and she
tensed again as his cock rubbed against her ass. “You’re so skittish. Come
back here.”
He looped his arm around her waist and kissed the back of her neck,
stroking the soft curve of her belly. A shiver wracked her body, causing
water to cascade over them both as he partially unblocked the spray.
“Nick,” she said, sounding frightened.
“Just relax while Daddy has his fun.” His bite had her arching, and her
nipples were tight when he ran his hand possessively over her front.
Playfully, he bumped her ass with his hip, and she yelped again before
covering her own mouth in a way that made him laugh. “I promise I’m not
going to fuck you.”
The breath she let out was unsteady as she reached for the shampoo.
“Stop messing around.”
Nicholas relinquished his hold on her curvy waist, leaning back against
the tile as he watched her lather the soap into her curls, breathing in the
sweet steam. When she tilted her head back, tossing her damp hair over her
shoulders as she rinsed, he said, casually, “Did you ever let your nice waiter
boyfriend fuck you in the ass?”
Her fingers stumbled and she made a strange noise, like a backwards
wheeze.
“No?” he said, satisfied. “Oh, good.”
Jay spun around to glare at him, which was a mistake on her part,
because it gave him an unobstructed view of her body, and he was far from
being too polite to stare.
“You are—” She shook her head angrily. “Unbelievable.”
“You’re not so bad yourself,” he said lazily, watching her angry blush
suffuse her cheekbones with pleasure. “Did you get all the soap out of your
hair?”
Jay folded her arms. “Why?”
“I want you up against the wall.”
“Why?”
“Because I’m going to tongue-fuck that sour expression right off your
cute little face.”
Her mouth fell open. For a moment, she was too flustered to respond.
When he pushed off from the wall, she backed to the other side and began
to stammer, “You c-can’t say things like that in here. My neighbors share a
bathroom wall with me.”
It only took a single step to close the distance. “So?”
“So they can hear you,” she hissed up at him.
“Oh? You think your neighbors might find out how eager you are to
ride my face with my fingers inside you? I think so, too.”
“Nicholas! They have children!” Her blush had migrated down to her
chest. Apple-red and light brown, like polished jasper. Beautiful, he thought,
and then his eyes dipped lower.
“Spread your fucking legs. Now.”
She gave him a defiant look but her legs edged just the slightest
distance apart, and that was all the encouragement he needed to drop to his
knees and shove her thighs the rest of the way open. Her angry little
lecturing voice morphed into a whimper when he pulled her forward by the
hips.
With a satisfied sound, he hitched one of her legs over his back and
sealed his mouth over her. “Oh my god.” Her voice went faint as she canted
towards him. “Nicholas—”
“Look at you, trying to climb my face. You always did love my
mouth.”
She yanked his hair for that. Vicious little bird. He approved, rasping
his tongue over the hood of her clit until the skin of her thighs trembled
beneath his touch and she fell back against the tiled wall, panting, as hot
water dripped over her bare skin like a clear coat of glistening paint.
He moved with her, giving her a fiery kiss that had the tension melting
from her spine as his hand slid up her thigh to cup her ass in his palm.
“Yes,” she moaned, “oh god, right there.”
With a sigh that made her tremble, he slid his fingers into her cunt and
began pumping his hand in time to his mouth: slow strokes that nearly had
her doubling over his shoulder with her arm looped around the back of his
head. Her stomach muscles flexed as she struggled to breathe steadily, and
all those little sounds she was making hummed right against his temple.
“If you keep moaning like that, everyone’s going to know what a slutty
girl you are.” He pitched his voice low. “Your room number’s on your door.
All your neighbors will find out exactly how the beautiful little whore in
215 likes to get fucked.”
“I don’t care.”
She bucked against him, as if for emphasis, and when he finished her
off, she blew apart like one of those exploding stars from the documentaries
that had used to make her cry.
“Fuck,” she panted, head tipping back. “Oh—god—Nick—”
“Yes.” He trailed kisses up to her navel. “You’re so pretty when you
come for Daddy.”
Her fingers clenched and then relaxed against his skull, the tight grip
yielding to a gentle sweep that put an unnamed ache in the back of his
throat.
“Tell me what you are.”
“Your bird.”
“Mine,” he agreed, the word dark and possessive as he pressed his
cheek against her belly.
When she dragged him up by the chin for a kiss, it wasn’t like before;
as he hauled her up against him, crushing her breasts flush against his chest
as he wrested back control, she fit against him like she was made for him—
and she was so responsive.
She broke away, looking up at him with a deer-in-the-headlights
expression while he fought the urge to seize her mouth again. “You’re good
at that.” He tapped at her swollen lip. “I almost never count out my
paycheck stubs when your mouth’s on me.”
Her eyes flashed with anger. Then a look stole over her face that was as
strange as it was familiar, and by the time he placed it as the one from that
photo, she was already on her knees.
Nicholas inhaled sharply as she sucked the droplets of water from his
abs. Oh, fuck.
She gripped his cock in her slender fingers and touched him so gently
that he shuddered, before taking as much of him as she could into her
mouth.
”Fuck.” Sparks burst against his visual field as his head cracked against
the tile. His hips jerked, thrusting into her throat hard enough that she
gagged and pushed him back, pinning him against the shower wall by
pressing hard against his thighs. And dear god, her mouth—
She worked her tongue over the crown of his cock as he fucked the
plush softness of her lips, sucking him off the way she had on her loveseat..
It feels so fucking good.
“What are you thinking about now?” There was an edge to the honeysweetness of her voice and the challenge in it pushed him over, making him
come with a violence that startled them both.
Drool and come slicked his shaft as she pulled away, leaving him prone
to the hard water pressure that now felt like needles on his sensitive head.
Nicholas turned from the spray and nearly hit his head on the spigot
when he saw her looking up at him, watching him with something that
looked a hell of a lot like desire.
“Fuck, Jay.” He reached for her and she jerked back from him, making
a muted sound as she grabbed a towel and fled. Stunned, he watched her
now-towel-clad ass depart through the door at a fast clip like the hounds of
hell were at her heels.
He did bang his head when he turned around a second time and he
swore at the sting, running a hand through his hair as he bent to shut off the
water. He grabbed one of her yellow towels and slung it around his
shoulders as he followed her back into the one-bedroom.
She had thrown her own damp towel on her bed and was buttoning
herself into a dress—a matronly, ruffled thing that made her look like
somebody’s preschool art teacher.
A very fuckable preschool art teacher who gave amazing head and
could set him on fire with a glance.
When she bent to buckle her boot, revealing a slit in the skirt that
showed off just a hint of leg, he cleared his throat. Loudly.
“Oh my god!” Her eyes swung towards him, moved down, and then
immediately away. A blush began to bloom over her cheekbones, which was
fucking hilarious after what she had just done to him in that bathroom.
“How long have you been standing there?”
“Not that long.” Hiding a smile, he knotted the towel around his hips.
“Did you already call the taxi?”
“Um.” She grabbed a purse off her counter. “I thought we’d take
BART.”
“Wasn’t that how you got mugged?”
“I got mugged after I got off the train, actually. While I was walking to
work.”
Nicholas grabbed a pair of boxers out of his backpack and stepped into
them before tugging some slacks over his narrow hips. “We’re still taxing a
taxi.”
She watched him reach for his shirt with an anxious expression. “It’s
going to be expensive.”
“I think I can afford it,” he said dryly.
The fare seemed reasonable enough to him but Jay’s eyebrows had shot
up, which made him wonder if he was being subjected to a tourist tax. He
still tipped the man, mostly because Jay would have, though he didn’t miss
the way the driver’s eyes lingered on the shape of Jay’s legs.
The art museum’s stone façade surrounded a central atrium, looming
over the park across the street and its adjoining mall. They went through a
side entrance, which involved going up a staircase with a big glass window
that reminded him of a racketball court. It looked into a lobby area with
photographs and paintings displayed prominently on the wall.
He studied their reflections in the glass as they made their way to the
big double doors. The bohemian florals swathing her curvy body were a
stark contrast to his own lean solid build and sober colors. Nobody, he
thought, would ever think that they were siblings now.
“Did you come here often?” he asked casually, putting his hand on the
small of her back.
“On free days. And sometimes special occasions, too.”
“What special occasions were those?”
“Um, well. I saved up to see the Magritte exhibit. He’s that Belgian
artist, the surrealist. He painted the man in the bowler hat who had an apple
for a face.”
“And here I thought you’d go for the impressionists.”
“Wow,” she said. “Am I being schooled on aesthetics by the man who
has a mutant jellyfish hanging in his foyer?”
“If you don’t like the Chihuly, I can sell it. We can buy anything you
want.”
She stared at him incredulously. “Are you seriously offering to buy me
art?”
“Yes,” he said. “Why? Do you want a Magritte? We can hang it in your
room.”
Her cheeks colored as someone nearby glanced over at them with
raised eyebrows. “No, Nicholas. Oh my god, I can’t even imagine what that
would cost you.”
“I think I could afford it,” he said, and she stared at him, as if realizing
that he actually could.
He paid for their tickets while she fiddled with the latch of her purse.
He was happy that she didn’t try to pay, although he suspected that she
wanted to. She was so fidgety. Or was she nervous? He’d never seen her
this agitated when she was talking with anyone else.
Once they had their admission stickers, they went to examine a map by
one of the stairwells. “This floor is photography, if I remember right,” she
was saying. “And there’s a living wall and some mobile sculptures. I’m not
that into photography, so we can skip that unless you are—oh.” Some of the
enthusiasm drained from her face. “That’s right, I guess you are.”
“We can skip it. Let’s go to the fifth floor and work our way down.”
Jay nodded tightly and turned towards the elevators. He followed,
regretting the brief moment of ease that had slipped away between them
like sand through his fingers. Knowing she was thinking about the past and
not being able to do anything about it made it feel as if a hot ball of lead
were burning in his gut. Especially when he realized her hand was
trembling in his.
The elevator doors opened, spilling them out into another gallery. Jay
squared her shoulders, giving a nod of acknowledgement to one of the
guards stationed by the wall.
Nicholas tightened his grip minutely, lacing his fingers with hers. He
didn’t recognize any of the artists, and the vast empty rooms with their
reverberating echoes didn’t exactly inspire confidences. “This place is
certainly spacious.”
She eyed him. “Mario Botta is the architect. He designed the Evry
Cathedral in France, too. They both make use of truncated cylinders in their
designs.”
“Sounds hot.”
She swatted at him with her free hand and he gave her trapped one a
squeeze, which she returned after a brief pause. By the time they had made
it into the third room, her shoulders had relaxed again and it was as if the
subject of photography had never been brought up at all. But there would be
other pitfalls going forward. Other mistakes.
Sometimes when they were in bed together he would do something that
would make her freeze and he would see the light in her eyes die, consumed
by a storm of dark memories.
Maybe that’s why she keeps them closed.
Nicholas shoved that unpleasant thought from his mind, burying it
deep, and smiled down at Jay’s too-serious face. “Show me your favorites.”
She tried to hide her enthusiasm but he knew her too well and
recognized the little gleam in her eyes when she turned back to the gallery
as she decided where to lead him. Despite her claims to the contrary, she
gravitated to paintings with bright colors—fantastic dreamscapes, neon
palettes, impressionistic swirls. The colors glowed the way she did, like she
fucking belonged in flower fields and pools of sunlight.
But not with him. No, there in his bed, she closed her eyes and
confined herself to self-inflicted darkness, enduring his demands in a way
that was beginning to make him wonder how much of her pleasure was real.
She wouldn’t look at him until he told her to. He knew she liked his body,
but as soon as he was inside her, parts of Jay became so remote he was
afraid he could never reach them. A fool’s journey, paved by the best sex of
his fucking life.
“Do you like that one? The abstract impressionist?”
Her low voice took him from his thoughts and he blinked, realizing he
had been glaring at a painting. He glanced at the placard dismissively and
said, “No, not particularly.”
“Are you having a bad time?”
“No,” he said gruffly. He wasn’t.
“You look angry,” she said cautiously.
“I’m not angry. I’m thinking about work.”
“You work yourself too hard, Nick.” She sounded sympathetic now,
which was worse than betrayal. He didn’t want to be pitied. “Even Arthur
thinks you are. He told me.”
“Arthur isn’t holding up the company on his shoulders. Of course he
can afford to be cavalier.”
“He’s not cavalier. He just has a good work-life balance. And so should
you.” She ran her thumb over his knuckles and an electric need arced down
his spine. “Try to enjoy the art. It’s supposed to be a reset for you brain.
Like looking at nature, or listening to classical music.”
“I don’t need a reset,” he grumbled. “I just need people to do what I
pay them for.”
“They do.”
We’ll see.
He swept her into another room, no longer wanting to look at that bleak
painting with its dark smears of abstract color. Jay didn’t seem to mind
holding hands but he suspected that was because there was no one here to
see.
It was only when the clothes started to come off that she lost that
outward façade of bossy control and yielded to him the way he wanted,
giving him everything but her heart.
Nicholas darted a wild look at a sculpture made of metal and plastic.
Thinking about her slow, tongue-heavy blowjobs made his knees feel
watery. She was cruel the way she did it, too. Lingering over his stomach as
she kissed her way down to his dick. Teasing him with her very breath until
the anticipation of the act built up to a deep throb in his belly.
They were good at hurting each other. Had perfected it with a lifetime
of careful brushstrokes that demonstrated a mastery rivaling any one of
these framed paintings. But he was tired of coupling their passion with
violence.
He just wanted to be fucking loved.

Chapter Nine

It surprised Jay, how attentive Nicholas was in public. His eyes were
always on her, every time she looked. Or else he was offering his arm, his
coat. Such old-world manners came as a shock from a man who was as
ruthlessly exacting as he was, and it was a little unexpected just how much
she found herself liking them.
In high school, he had been so cruel to the girls he’d been with. They
were never good enough to bring home. He’d meet with them beneath the
bleachers or in other people’s upstairs bedrooms, only to abandon them as
soon as he’d gotten what he’d wanted, leaving them to the ruthless grind of
the high school rumor mill.
Hurting people came to him so easily; it always had. Another thing he
had learned from his father.
When her hand shifted uneasily in his, he squeezed her tighter and
didn’t let go.
They were getting stares as they walked down the corridors. Most of
the stares were directed at him. Nicholas was a very tall man with the sort
of profile that could have been chiseled in marble, as noble as it was severe.
The Cerruti suit he wore was the color of tempered steel, tailored to reflect
both the leanness of his build and the lack of padding required to accentuate
his shoulders. His body, much like his temperament, was a demonstration of
absolute control.
And maybe his manners were, too. Whether you were pulling out a
chair for someone or tying them to it, the intent was still the same.
Ownership.
Possession.
She blushed, and saw his face turn towards hers again, measuring her
responses. They had never walked like this, hand in hand. She could feel
her palm getting sweaty. She hadn’t been this nervous since her teen years,
with her first crush, and feeling that way—with him—was terrifying.
They had reached the special exhibition on ephemeral art and she tried
to focus her attention on that, but it only made her feel worse. As she looked
at the timelapse photographs of the silent audience of melting human ice
sculptures in Chamberlain square, or Yoko Ono’s apple imprisoned in
plexiglass while it began its slow rot, Jay felt tears begin to form in her
eyes.
“Since when did trash become art?” Nicholas asked skeptically,
startling her from her gloomy reverie, which was just so him that she almost
laughed, even though she felt so broken inside.
“Stupid,” she said, sniffing a little. “It’s supposed to show that beautiful
things don’t last.”
He glanced at her then, which she didn’t want. Not while she felt like
this. Not when every single facet of her life was a glaring reminder of why
this wouldn’t work.
Even if she wanted it to.
As if he could read her thoughts, his expression softened. “It’s just a
picture, blue jay.”
And we both know how much damage a picture can do.
She stared at the browning apple until her eyes hurt, aware of the
steady pressure of his hand. It’s just Nick, she told herself but her pulse
wouldn’t listen, and when he ran his thumb along the inside of her palm, it
accelerated to a buzz in her ears.
In the next gallery, an older, European-looking couple were gazing at
paintings. The man was wearing suspenders over his button-down shirt and
the woman was wearing a loose linen dress that looked casual and
expensive at the same time.
Jay kept her eyes on the paintings but her cheeks heated with an alltoo-familiar shame as the man and woman turned to look at them.
Nicholas’s hand tightened further over hers, his fingers lacing with her own
until she felt as if she had been neatly shackled.
“Quel charmant couple,” the woman murmured. “Il est si grand. Et elle
est tellement belle.”
“Plus jolie que moi?” Nicholas spoke up, surprising all three of them.
“Je le pense aussi. C'est pour ça que je l'ai épousée.”
The man and then, more self-consciously, the woman, laughed. “You’re
just darling,” she told him, smiling with dimples. Then she turned to Jay,
who felt like her face was on fire, and said, “What a charming husband you
have.”
Husband?
Husband?
“What did you say to her?” Jay demanded, the moment they were out
of hearing.
Nicholas smirked. “She said you were pretty. I asked if she thought you
were prettier than me.”
Jay suspected this was not the full truth but wasn’t sure how to call him
on it, afraid it would trigger another conversation neither of them were
ready for.
He gave her hand another playful squeeze. “Are you ready for dinner?”
“Yeah,” she said, feeling a flicker of regret that the afternoon was being
cut short. Then she looked at her phone and realized that they’d been here
for three hours. Despite his initial reluctance, Nicholas hadn’t complained at
all.
He called a taxi as they walked out of the museum. The car met them
out in front and took them to the Ferry Building, which was a ten-minute
drive because of all the traffic, even though it was only a couple blocks
away. They exchanged a glance when a sleek Mercedes cut them off and the
driver began to swear.
“We should have taken BART,” said Jay.
“I don’t mind the wait. Did you have a good time?”
“I had a great time.”
This time, the smile he leveled at her—one of his real ones, the one
with the dimples that he never showed anyone—made her stomach flip.
“Good. I’m glad.”
They went to dinner at a Vietnamese fusion restaurant and under the
dim lights, at a table beside a cold glass window that offered a view of the
bay, they had cocktails and pho while the sun slowly sank below the
rippling surface of the water and the fog rolled in on ghostly fingers.
This was a side of the city that Jay had rarely gotten to enjoy: the
sparkling underlayer that catered to the exclusive elite. It was the lifestyle
her mother had dreamed about when she took her clothes off for other men,
letting the stars in her eyes blind her to the trash in the street.
Jay despised herself a little for wanting it, too.
“Is something wrong with your food?”
She looked down at her untouched bowl and smiled guiltily. “No, the
view is just so amazing, I’m trying to take it all in.” Her shoulders dipped as
she looked at him through the flickering candlelight, an accusatory thought
sweeping through her head: you take your clothes off for this man, too.
“This was such an amazing day.”
“We can have more. A lifetime of them.”
She laughed nervously, fingering the stem of her cocktail glass. “You
didn’t even know if I wanted kids. We grew up together but we don’t know
much about each other now.”
“What do you want to know?” The neck of his shirt dipped lower as he
unbuttoned his cuffs and began winding up the sleeves over his forearms,
drawing her eyes to both the agile movement of his hands and the flex of
tendons beneath the skin. “I’ll tell you anything.”
“You told me you didn’t date.” She hesitated, cowed by his intensity
and the curious intimacy of seeing his arms bared in public. When she
finally dared to look in his eyes, his expression was as potent as the drink in
her hand. “Do you know what you want out of a relationship?”
The old Nick would have rolled his eyes and told her that none of that
would have mattered as long as he could provide, before parroting his
father’s sexist bullshit. But the man across from her considered her question
thoughtfully, shifting so the light caught on the watch at his wrist.
“I don’t want to be alone anymore. Coming home to an empty house
year after year—it wears on you. I want to see the world but only if there’s
someone to see it with me. I’m fine traveling alone but I don’t really want
to. I like having someone to come home to. Someone to take care of.”
“Lots of people could give you that,” Jay whispered.
He leaned forward, covering her hand with his. “But they aren’t you.”
The world around her seemed to come to a juddering stop and Jay
could have sworn that part of it broke off and shattered. In the silence that
followed, she could hear the tick of his watch.
“I—” She broke off, struggling to find the words she wanted while he
was looking at her like that. “I didn’t know you felt that way. The first time
you told me you were in love with me, you made it sound like it was all
about sex.”
“I was eighteen, Jay. I was a fucking idiot who didn’t know how to
love you.”
The harshness of his admission made her reel back. Their fingers broke
and Nicholas looked down at his hand before drawing away and taking a
long, deep drink.
“So,” he said gruffly. “I saw the photo collage in your room. I thought
you weren’t into photography.”
Jay blinked, disconcerted by the mercurial change in topic but
perversely grateful for the reprieve. “I don’t really consider that
photography,” she said at length. “It’s more like a scrapbook. I wanted to
remember the good times, because sometimes you don’t realize how good
they are until they’re over.”
“That sounds sad, blue jay.”
“Maybe it is.” She thought wistfully of her middle school friends, the
nice strippers at the Beat and Tease. “I’ve let so many people pass me by
and now I can’t even remember their faces. I didn’t want to forget anyone
else.”
“You’ve never photographed me.”
Because I could never forget you.
Flushed from the alcohol in her drink, Jay considered him from across
the table. The candle was throwing sinister shadows over his handsome
face, giving him a distinctly villainous cast.
Was he jealous?
“What?” Nicholas said. “Why are you looking at me like that?”
Impulsively, Jay lifted her phone and snapped a picture of him before
he could arrange his face. She looked at her screen, and smiled in spite of
herself: frozen in mid-motion, with his eyes widening in shock, and a sullen
tilt to his otherwise inviting mouth, he looked about as real as she’d ever
seen him.
“There,” she said. “Happy?”
“Do I get to look at it?”
“No.”
A glint appeared in his eyes. “Do I get one of you?”
“You have one of me.” She spoke without thinking and his eyebrows
shot up.
“I only get one?”
“You only have the one?” Jay retorted, and he gave her a wicked grin.
“I thought that subject was a sore point.”
“Oh my god, you totally do.” Jay took a bracing sip of her drink.
“You’re such a little creep.”
“I think you actually find me quite charming.”
“What gave you that impression?” she demanded, setting her drink
down hard.
“Because you’re smiling.”
She touched a hand to one of her too-warm cheeks, aware even as she
did so of the fading light, the closeness of the fog, and the exotic blend of
spices permeating the restaurant. It was as if the two of them were inside a
glass bubble, ensconced within their own private world. She had never been
this relaxed with him—partially, because he had never given her a reason to
be.
Somehow, Nicholas had tricked her into going on a date with him and
having a very good time. She had gone out with him before, when he had
blackmailed her into returning home, but when he dragged her to those
places, Jay had gotten the impression that he was only doing it to show her
that he could, leveraging the threat of his power over her. It hadn’t been like
this.
Nothing they had done had ever been like this.
She picked at a cilantro leaf, shaken by the realization that, in his own
manipulative way, he had taken her concerns about their twisted power
dynamic to heart. “I guess I am.”
“Smiling?” he persisted. “Or charmed?
“Both,” she said quietly, wondering why the answer made her sad.
He picked up his own drink, knocking it back. “I deleted the one you
sent me, by the way.”
She didn’t have to ask which one. “Thank you.”
“Don’t thank me. My reasons were purely selfish. I don’t want anyone
else seeing you like that. You didn’t answer your own question, though. Do
you know what you want, Jay?”
Thoroughly off-balance now, and a little flustered, Jay shook her head.
“I used to dream of having this glamorous big city life. But living on my
own cleared that up pretty quick. Now, I’d settle for a quiet life. With
someone kind. Who will treat me with respect and step up when things get
hard and—just . . . love me without any strings attached.”
She looked at her drink as she spoke, not wanting to see his face and
terrified that he’d see the lie in hers and know just how close she was to
giving in, strings or no.
When the waiter came by and asked how what they were doing, Jay felt
as if she’d been woken up from a dream. Nicholas ordered another Old
Fashioned and Jay, feeling uncharacteristically brooding, got herself
another fruity cocktail even though the first one was already going to her
head.
We’ve done it again, she thought, reaching into her bright orange
cocktail and eating the rum-soaked cherry while he sipped his drink and
watched her with the eyes of a tired wolf. We’ve hurt each other and I don’t
even know how.
He drained his second glass in several swallows, shaking himself like
he thought he could cast off his sobriety. “We can go whenever you’re
ready.”
Jay eyed her half-empty glass, noting the fuzzy edges. “I’m ready.”
Desire strobed through her like lightning as they walked out of the
restaurant and he draped his jacket over her shoulders. On the briny
sharpness of the bay breeze, she could just make out the citrus sting of his
cologne suffusing the fabric that pooled around her narrower shoulders.
Walking with him, with the city lit up in fog-muted neon, Jay felt as if
her veins were filled with the sparkling incandescence of champagne.
She would have fucked him, if he’d asked. Hazy from drink and a sea
of warm, dark feelings she didn’t care to explore too deeply beneath all the
wounds, she would have gotten to her knees and blown him until all he
could say in that deep, terrible voice was “yes” and “slutty girl” and “fuck.”
But he didn’t ask, when they returned to her apartment, and as she
changed into her pajamas with the faint beginnings of a hangover blooming
behind her eyes, that was almost as troubling as the realization that she
wanted him to.
The bathroom door opened, spilling light over her face. Nicholas
walked out of it wearing basketball shorts and an old T-shirt. As he swung
onto her mattress, she rolled up against him, and he put his arm around her
with a low chuckle, breathing in against her hair. A stab of pure, raw desire
went through her like an iron spike when she felt how hard he was.
“Are you going to fuck me?” she whispered, feeling braver than she
ever had, filled with alcohol, and shrouded by that dark velvet abyss, unable
to see his face even if she wanted to.
He went very still. “You’re drunk.”
“Mmm.” She nuzzled against him and felt his cock twitch. “Yes,
Daddy. So drunk.”
“Jay—” she had never heard him use that tone before; it thrilled her
“—don’t.”
“Why? You can do whatever you want to me. Use me, hurt me. Make
me be bad.” She clasped his hand and dragged it to her chest, feeling a
surge of satisfaction when he allowed her to press his hand flat over her
breast. “Just make it feel good.”
His chest hitched against her back. When he traced her nipple through
her thin tank top, she moaned, and the sound of it startled them both. “Jay,”
he growled. “No.”
She rolled over to face him and found herself staring at his back. “Oh,
so you’re mad at me.”
“For fuck’s sake.”
“You don’t like it when I’m in control.”
Nicholas laughed at that, which made her angry.
“I like nice guys. I only ever dated nice guys before you.”
“You’re a mean drunk, blue jay. Has anyone ever told you that?”
“I like nice guys,” she repeated, like a dare. “I like the way they fuck
me.”
The mattress creaked ominously. When he wrapped his hand around
her throat, she heard herself make a sharp, thin noise as he leaned over her,
his dark hair throwing his eyes into shadow.
“No.” His thumb stroked over her suddenly frantic pulse. “I don’t think
you do.”
Oh, she thought, head swimming. I like this.
“You like that, Jay?” It was as if she’d spoken aloud. Maybe she had.
He gave her neck a squeeze and she wasn’t even sure she was breathing
anymore, she was so turned on. “Is that what nice girls like when they’re
getting fucked by their nice boyfriends?”
“No,” said Jay.
“No, it isn’t,” he agreed. “Because you don’t want to be fucked by nice
guys. You want to be fucked by me.”
“Yes,” Jay whispered. “Fuck me, Daddy.”
He stared down at her. She couldn’t quite make out his expression in
the dark but she could feel his erection digging into her hip. When his hand
flexed, just grazing her nape, she had to repress a shudder.
“Fuck me. Please. I want you to.”
“Jesus,” he said, taking his hand away with a hiss. “Fuck.”
Jay stared, vaguely incredulous, as he turned back to the wall. Her
heart was still pounding. She could still feel the bite of his fingers in her
skin. Jay put her hand on his bicep and he jerked, as if he were going to
shrug her off. “Nick?” her voice came out small.
He didn’t respond and she felt a lick of fear.
(alone)
“Da—”
“Don’t,” he snarled. “Don’t test my control. Not right now.”
“But I—” Tears formed in her eyes and she let her hand fall. “I’m
sorry.”
“I bet you are.” When he sighed, there was a hint of a growl in it. “Go
to sleep, Jay.”
She rolled on her other side, aware of his big body at her back. It made
her feel safe in a way that none of her first few nights back in the city had
been, and when she dreamed, they were absent of nightmares. Or she
thought they were.
Her eyes snapped open and it felt like the tight knot in her belly had
sprouted thorns that had worked their prickling way throughout her entire
body. Her head was throbbing and the darkness was spinning. Nick, she
thought, looking around wildly. And then, Where am I?
Her half-packed up room popped into recognition just as she became
aware of Nicholas breathing heavily beside her. The bed was moving—that
must have been what had woken her up. He had slipped his cock from his
shorts and was jerking himself off, arching into his own hand with an
urgency that was frightening because she recognized the cadence.
He fucks me like that, when he can’t wait, she thought, and a dull throb
went through her belly.
Eyes squeezed shut, he was making sounds in his throat. They were
guttural and muted. So much so that she didn’t immediately recognize that
most of them were her own name.

Nicholas didn’t bring up what had happened the next morning, which
relieved Jay. She felt terribly embarrassed about drunkenly begging him for
sex, and even though she couldn’t remember the exact exchange of words
between them, she recalled the blind wanting, and how cold his rejection of
her had felt after feeling the weight of his large hand around her throat.
God, the way he’d been touching himself afterwards—
But Jay pushed those thoughts away, the way she did everything else.
Just push it back, push it under. Let the past stay buried and gone. That had
been her motto.
Until the past had come back to haunt her personally.
Seeing Nicholas wandering around her apartment was so odd. Whether
he was parked on the loveseat with his laptop in one of his old T-shirts or
hauling her things out to the curb, muscles straining, the domesticity of it all
made her feel shy with him. She tried not to look too long or too hard—a
hang-up that wasn’t shared by her neighbors. One little old lady circled the
block three times with her exhausted little spaniel, just to watch a shirtless
Nicholas stacking boxes.
Jay walked out to her enclosed balcony and looked down at the UHaul, seeing herself twenty years ago, tossing out all the things her mother
had branded as “too low-class” for their new lives.
(You’re still your mother’s daughter, Justine)
She unlocked her phone, scrolling mindlessly, before sliding it back
into the pocket of her hoodie. No new messages from her mother. Strange.
It wasn’t like her to give up like that.
I guess she doesn’t like it when I fight back.
Nicholas set down a stack of folded plastic dining chairs with a clatter
that made Jay look back down at the street. The chairs were painted teal and
so badly faded that the metal beneath was showing in places. She’d gotten
them for company and then never used them. In this neighborhood, they’d
be gone by the end of the day.
He’d taken his shirt off and now his back was glistening with sweat. As
she watched, he pushed his hair out of his eyes with the back of his wrist.
And of course, there was that little old lady, clutching her poor dog’s leash
like her life depended on it, staring at him like he was a god.
Nicholas noticed the old woman and waved—mean, thought Jay,
recognizing the mockery in the gesture—and then he looked up and caught
her eye. He lowered his arm, and stood with his hands at his hips, letting
her look. Jay’s legs twitched and she gripped the rail more tightly.
“I’m coming up, blue jay,” he called out. “Let me in.”
Jay was pretty sure she didn’t imagine how the other woman’s
shoulders sank dejectedly.
Shaking her head, she went to the fridge and took out one of the bottles
of green juice he’d gotten for her at the store, before going down the stairs
and meeting him at the door. She could smell the sweat on his skin, dewy
and animal, like wet hay. He wiped his palms on his shorts, blinking sweat
from his eyes, radiating heat. “Is that for me?”
“You looked hot.”
He laughed involuntarily as they walked into her room, his chest
hitching with the movement. The bands of muscle along his sides rippled.
“You think I look hot?”
“That wasn’t what I meant.”
“Are you blushing? That’s so cute.” He unscrewed the cap and took a
deep swig before making a face. She wasn’t expecting the wrinkled nose, or
the sheepish grin, which somehow made him even more attractive. “And
that’s the bitterest fucking thing I’ve ever tasted.”
“Sorry. That’s the kale and spirulina. It’s all that’s cold.”
“Don’t apologize.” He took another bracing sip, not quite able to hide
his distaste. “Are you ready to move out tomorrow?”
“I think so.” She leaned back against the chipped Formica counter,
wondering if her landlord would spring to replace it now that she was
leaving. “I thought it would be harder to leave, but I’m starting to realize
that there was nothing keeping me here but memories of things that don’t
really exist anymore.”
“I’m glad to hear that.” He gave her arm a teasing little flick. “I like
having you all to myself.”
“Thanks, Nick.” She pretended to study the box on the counter marked
KITCHEN, trying to force out the thought that she was essentially packing
herself up like a possession, too. “What do your clients think about you
being AFK like this?”
“They have my number if they really need to reach me.” He handed the
bottle to her. “Don’t worry about that.”
She turned the bottle over in her hands. “I’m worried about your job. I
mean, you only just got through sensitivity training. You really don’t want
to upset your investors.”
“Fuck the investors. And fuck sensitivity training.” Nicholas picked up
his shirt from where he’d discarded it on the counter and dabbed his face
with it. “I want you to be happy.”
Happy, she thought. But on whose terms? His? Would he throw his
career away for that?
And would she be expected to throw her freedom away in return?
“I know that look.” Nicholas dropped his now-sweaty shirt back on the
counter, which nearly made her protest until she realized that they wouldn’t
be her counters for much longer. “As soon as we get back to Hollybrook,
you’re going to expect us to keep up the façade that I don’t want you, so
you can feel better about whatever this is.”
He made a gesture, flicking his fingers between them. Jay glared at
him, to hide how badly rattled she was that he had perceived her so fully.
“That is not what I was thinking.”
“You have no game face, blue jay. I can see right through you—even
when you lie.” His voice was nearly seductive, she thought, except for a
mocking lilt of cruelty. “You keep accusing me of keeping you around for a
quick and dirty fling, but I’m not the one who fucks with my eyes closed.”
Jay felt the counter slam up against her back. Her panic, and his
knowing, bitter smile, took her breath away. “Shut up, Nick.”
“Have we moved on to denial already?” He stepped closer, putting his
hands where hers had fled. “That was fast. Usually, I have to fuck you
first.”
She drew in an angry breath. “You don’t understand—”
“No, Jay. You don’t understand. Every time you ask what people will
think, you’re framing our relationship around the fact that we grew up
together. And we did. But then I grew up—and I wanted you. I wanted you
so badly that I used to think it would drive me fucking crazy. It was like I
couldn’t breathe. Have you ever wanted something that much?”
She opened her mouth, but he didn’t give her time to respond.
“If it were up to me, I’d have dragged you to the altar myself. But I
waited—for you. And if your plan is to dick me down before sending me on
my way like some callow pool boy, you should know that I’m not going to
give you up without a fight.”
“I’m not dicking you down.” Jay was aghast at his choice of words, at
the cruel comparison to her mother and her younger lover. Although isn’t it
the same? She hid him away, too. She clenched her fists, wishing she could
fight the voices, and banish the pain that threatened to subsume her heart
every time she looked in his eyes. “You blackmailed me. You took things
from me that I will never get back.”
“Then why,” Nicholas said slowly, “are you still here?”
“Because I live here.”
She knew it was a stupid thing to say, but his laughter still made her
angry, and so did the ripple of muscle contracting along his chest and
abdomen because also, how fucking dare he look like that while she was
angry at him, but this time, when she swatted at him, his fingers shackled
around her wrist.
“Oh, Jay,” he said, and she hated the way he said her name, the way it
curled up around her insides like plumes of fragrant smoke. “You don’t
even realize I’ve got you up against the wall.”
“I’m not going to stand here and be lectured by a—by a walking
Oedipus complex.”
He stepped closer, and the sinuous lines of his body blurred before her
wavering vision as she felt the heat coming off his skin, and the clean smell
of his sweat filled her nose.
“Do you really mean to tell me that you’d leap into my arms if I were a
stranger at a bar? Somehow I doubt that. You like making people work for
it. That’s why you never fucked any of your high school boyfriends. They
didn’t have the stamina to jump through all your hoops.”
“I don’t want to hear this.”
“From the moment that you jumped up my ass about that cat in the
tree, I knew you would be a breath of fresh air from all of the surface-level
bullshit artists surrounding me. You were so authentic, so you. And so
beautiful—my fucking god, I used to have these dreams—” He let out a
harsh breath, which was when she realized that she had been holding hers.
“I wish you had been my first. I wanted you to be.”
“Yes, well, your father took care of that, didn’t he?” The words came
out before she could think better of it.
“Yeah, he did.” Nicholas reached around her to pick up his shirt, and
she felt a wash of guilt when he glanced at her with regret rather than anger.
“That was too bad. I would have waited for you. You could have shown me
how to touch you.” A catch entered his voice. “I would have enjoyed that.”
Maybe she was more like her mother than she’d thought.
Jay side-stepped him, needing Nick-free air. The awful things he was
saying were not nearly awful enough, and she was having trouble
remembering why he could not be hers.
“You didn’t wait. You took.”
“I know.” He knotted the fabric of his shirt in his hands. “But I am
waiting now.”
Jay stared at the peeling juice label. Her restless hands had nearly pried
it free. She wanted to protest, to find the words that would make him realize
that this was wrong, but while Nicholas’s father had never taken him
anywhere near a church, it seemed he’d found another way to practice his
zealotry on his knees. And god, if he had been patient, if he had come at her
like this, he might have been able to wear her reservations like a tide
lapping away at stubborn granite.
“Think about that,” Nicholas said, with a knowing tilt of his head.
“Deep down, you’re still that ruthless little Amazon looking for the one
fight worth winning.”
Goddamn you, thought Jay, as he turned away.

Chapter Ten

Usually, someone was chasing through the house—a man who wanted
to hurt her, his face drenched in shadow, the familiar hallways warped like
funhouse mirrors—but this time, she was trapped in the pool. There was
some kind of party going on, like one of those Golden Age Hollywood
bacchanals, and although people kept walking by, none of them could hear
her screaming. None of them could see that the water was already frozen,
and that beneath that score of big band jazz, her screams were fading as she
drowned.
I’m all alone, she thought. I’m going to die down here.
And then someone grabbed her arm—
“Jay.”
She woke up with a choking gasp, tears running down her face. When
she realized that heavy hand she remembered had been pulled with her from
her dreams, she jolted forward in the dark, a shrill cry escaping her lips.
“No.”
“It’s time to get up.” The owner of the hand leaned forward, more
shadow than man in the dark. But she recognized that silhouette and her
body relaxed before her heart did.
“Oh,” she said. “N-Nick. It’s just you.”
She saw his head tilt, as if he were taking in her expression and
posture. “Did I scare you?”
“N-no. Just a bad dream.” She fell back against the mattress. “I’m
going back to sleep.”
Nicholas yanked the covers off, making her yelp. And then she
abashedly clapped her hand over her mouth, belatedly remembering the
neighbors.
Like they don’t recognize the sound of your screams by now.
“Get up,” Nicholas said, and she was grateful that it was too dark for
him to see her blush. “Or no coffee.”
“What coffee? I packed the machine.”
“Coffee that I went out and bought for you.” He waved a cup beneath
her nose that smelled utterly intoxicating. Where had he gotten that? It
wasn’t gas station swill and Jay didn’t know if any places in this area that
were open before—God, what time was it? She reached for the cup and he
pulled his arm back. “Get dressed and you can have it.”
Jay grumbled but slid her legs out of bed, letting out an involuntary
expletive when Nicholas snapped the light on. He quickly retreated out of
swatting distance, leaning back against the wall with her drink in hand as
she reached for her skirt. He was already fully dressed, she couldn’t help
noticing, and irritatingly awake.
“Do you mind?” she asked irritably.
His smile widened. “Not at all.”
“Dick.”
She turned her back on him to change into the business casual outfit
she had laid out the night before—when she had been so furious with his
head-fucking that she’d burned off her rage by finishing off what remained
of the packing.
Ah yes, now she remembered why she was so annoyed with Nicholas.
Mr. That’s-Why-You-Never-Fucked-Any-of-Your-High-School-Boyfriends
was a fine one to talk, when he’d never dated anyone long enough to even
know her middle name.
Anger made her fingers clumsy, and though she refused to look at him,
she sensed that Nicholas was very amused as he watched her struggle to
hook her own bra.
Finally managing the last hook, she began buttoning up her blouse as
quickly as she could without looking like she was trying to rush, making
sure her skirt was zipped before folding her pajamas into her large purse.
She braced herself before turning around.
“Coffee.” She put out her hand. “Now.”
Nicholas handed her the cup, and then gave her ass a smack that had
her whipping around to glare at him as he grabbed a second drink from the
kitchen counter. “Does anyone else know what a grumpy little bird you are
in the morning, or is that something you save for me?”
“It’s still dark out, you monster.”
“So it’s only Daddy you won’t play nice with.”
“Fuck you, Nicholas.”
“If we didn’t have a plane to catch,” he said, “I would.”
Jay set her teeth. The U-Haul driver Nicholas had hired had left with
her things very early in the morning, and he had booked a red-eye flight
back to LA. Red-eyes were cheaper but money, of course, was no object to
him. He just wanted to get her back to Hollybrook, and his bed, as soon as
possible. The energy surrounding him was so palpable that she could feel it
against her skin.
He’s planning something, she thought. And I’m pretty sure I’m not
going to like it.
She hitched her purse up higher on her shoulder and grabbed her carryon. Carbon had already been loaded into his carrier, she noticed, and was
now caterwauling in the hall. Mildly impressed that Nicholas had managed
to coax him out of wherever he’d been hiding, Jay looked around her empty
apartment and tried to dredge up some sort of emotion. This place had been
her refuge for years; surely, she thought, staring at the blank walls and
scuffed floors, she should feel something.
“Taxi’s waiting,” Nicholas said, breaking into her thoughts.
“Well, let’s not keep him then,” Jay said tautly.
“Considering what I tipped him, we probably could fuck for a good
solid hour and go out for breakfast afterwards, and he’d still be here
waiting.”
“Oh my god.” Jay took a mutinous sip of coffee and headed for the
door. Then she thought better of turning her back on him and reached
behind her, catching his wrist before he could spank her again. “Smack my
ass one more time,” she said threateningly, “and I’m breaking this off.”
Nicholas chuckled and twisted out of her grip. This close to him, she
could read the writing on his cup, which appeared to be a quad-shot latte
with at least six pumps of sugar. Just reading the label made her feel like
she had high blood pressure. When she looked up at him, his eyes were
alight with wicked mischief. “Next time, I’m booking a later flight.”
She didn’t fully get that until they were on the stairs, and then she
missed a step.
The driver only seemed a little grouchy as he loaded their things into
the back and it was a quick drive to the airport. The sun hadn’t even
breached the horizon yet and the sky was a deep midnight blue. Jay
watched the skyscrapers tumble past while Carbon napped at her feet in his
carrier, marveling at how those big glass windows reflected the stars so
clearly.
Nicholas scrolled through his phone, reclining against the seat with his
legs spread. His thigh was resting against hers. Every time they hit a
pothole, the feel of his wool trousers rubbing against her bare calf sent a
troubling current pulsing through her legs. One of his arms was draped over
the back of the seat, and she was aware of his hand, resting mere inches
about her left shoulder. Toying with her hair. Making her skin feel too tight
beneath her clothes.
“Do you do this often?” she asked desperately.
He lowered his phone, circling it to indicate the car. “What, this?
Travel? No, not as often as I used to. Why?”
“I had no idea you were such a morning person.”
“It was all those morning swim meets in high school and college. I got
used to being an early riser, burning off all that extra energy before dawn in
cold, cold water. It turned out to be the perfect boot camp for international
travel.” He flicked her shoulder and goosebumps rippled down her arm.
“Two years ago, I went to Asia and stayed at the fanciest hotel in Singapore.
It had everything—laundry service, five-star restaurants, an infinity pool
that looked out over the whole city. But the whole time I was there—I was
wishing that you were with me. Especially at night, on those ridiculous silk
sheets.”
“Nicholas.” A harsh breath escaped her. “God. The driver.”
“Don’t be such a prude, Jay. I’m sure people fuck in this backseat all
the time.”
“Some of the drunk ones try,” the driver said, making Jay jump. “If see
‘em, I kick them out.”
“That’s the lesson.” Nicholas slid his hand up her thigh. “Don’t get
caught.”
Jay took his hand and flung it back at him. I’m still mad at you, she
reminded herself. Stop it.
“I should take you there,” he mused, looking at her thoughtfully.
They pulled up at the drop-off point and Jay looked away from
Nicholas’s smirk, cheeks flaming. She gauged the traffic instead. There was
plenty of movement but it was far from busy. Nobody was honking or
jockeying for space. Although at this ungodly hour, who had the energy for
a fight? Jay lugged her carry-on onto the curb and heard Carbon let out an
angry yowl.
“Speaking of not getting caught,” Nicholas said, stepping onto the curb
with the cat carrier, “one of our VPs left unexpectedly, so that role should
be opening up soon. And when it does, I think you should apply for it.”
“At your company?”
“Yes, Jay,” he said, with a little laugh. “My company.”
“I don’t know,” she said dubiously. “I’m not sure I have the
experience.”
“I happen to know that Arthur thinks you would be perfect for the
position, too.”
“Really? He does?”
She must not have been fucking up as badly as she’d thought, if Arthur
was talking her up like that to Nicholas—although how had the subject of
her future with the company come up? After the dinner invitation? Before
it? She glowed at the approval, but wasn’t sure about how to feel about
Nicholas’s involvement.
She tightened her grip on her suitcase. With his penchant for
overstepping, probably alarmed. “How would that work? Most people want
decades of experience.”
“We promote based on merit, not tenure. Otherwise, people think they
deserve a raise just for showing up.” A harsh edge snaked into his voice.
“Wouldn’t I be working directly under you then?”
Nicholas paused, and Jay cringed inwardly, her eyes instinctively
scanning to see who was going to be around to hear the filthy joke he was
undoubtedly about to make at her expense. But he just slung his backpack
down on the counter and began to undo his belt and then his brogues.
“Technically, no. You’d be working under Arthur—” God, thought Jay “—
but you would also continue to report to me. Because everyone eventually
reports to me.”
Jay dropped her necklace in one of the bins with her shoes and purse.
“That sounds like the sort of job where one of the implied prerequisites is
‘don’t sleep with the CEO.’”
“Secretaries also aren’t supposed to fuck their bosses,” Nicholas
pointed out. “If you’re going to be fucking me either way, why not take the
pay raise and fuck me as a vice-president? RSUs, equity, a six-figure base
salary—Jay, I thought you were a feminist.”
“That is not feminism. That is like some sort of morally bankrupt
welfare capitalism.”
Nicholas chuckled. “I suppose that’s one explanation for sticky wage
theory.”
“Oh my god, Nicholas,” said Jay, and he laughed hard enough that
several people looked over.
“But seriously, Jay, the role is perfect for you. Give it some thought, at
least. Arthur will be reaching out shortly, but I thought you’d appreciate a
warning. You always did like to overprepare.”
One of the TSA agents beckoned him over impatiently and Nicholas
walked in that direction unhurriedly, tossing over his shoulder, “Just
between you and me—you’d probably get it.”
Would I? She thought about that as she toed off her shoes so they could
dust for explosives or whatever it was that they looked for in shoes. She
took pride in the quality of her work but it was true that people often
dismissed her role out of hand—like Annica said, Nobody wants to be a
secretary forever, right? There were too many Harlequins and old pornos
about secretaries who had fallen by the wayside. She distinctly remembered
a fashion spread that she had seen in one of her mother’s magazines back in
the 2000s, advertising office clothes by showing a woman seducing her
boss in varying states of undress.
It would be nice to have a job where people actually took her seriously.
Even if they should be doing that now, in her current role, she had accepted
it as an inevitability a long time ago, and she was tired of defending the
necessity of what she did to people who couldn’t even begin to understand
the skills required for her job and didn’t even want to.
God help her, she was tempted.
They got through the rest of security without a hitch and boarding was
the fastest she’d ever experienced. There were so many empty seats. When
the flight attendant walked them to the front and asked them if they wanted
to have anything to drink, Jay shook her head.
“Champagne for me.” Nicholas swung himself grandly into his seat.
With the second course of his liquid breakfast brought to hand,
Nicholas pulled out his laptop and immediately began fighting with people
over email.
Jay shook her head and leaned back in her seat. The frenzied typing,
peppered with the occasional editorial grunt, was oddly soothing. It was
nice not to be alone. Undemanding companionship—that’s what they had
when they were young, occupying the same shared space like two small
doomed planets revolving around a pair of unpredictable suns. Molten fire
and icy darkness. It made her think of that documentary that they had
watched together before everything had grown so muddled.
Back when she had been his prisoner, and none of this had been her
choice.
But I don’t feel like his prisoner anymore.
Very distantly, she was aware of Nicholas declining the offer of an inflight breakfast. “Can I get a blanket?” he asked, and Jay thought, Mm, a
blanket sounds nice.
When she felt something soft drape over her bare legs, she thought she
was dreaming.
She cracked open her eye and saw Nicholas adjusting the blanket over
her lap. He had the softest expression she’d ever seen on his face, so
vulnerable and open that it just about broke her heart. She didn’t dare move,
the weight of his eyes like a physical stroke. When he reached up to smooth
the hair back tenderly from her face, she nearly jumped.
(I’m not the one who fucks with my eyes closed)
His fingers stroked down her cheek, lingering like he couldn’t bear to
stop. Oh, Nick. She struggled to remain still, unwilling to betray herself and
end this prematurely and wondering if he could feel her fluttering pulse.
Please don’t.
Feigned sleep must have turned into real sleep because when she
opened her eyes again, Nicholas was shaking her and his touch wasn’t
gentle at all.
After another parade through security and a much shorter wait for their
taxi, followed by a much longer drive, Jay was back to where she had
started: at his big house with the ridiculous colonnades that still made her
heart skip when she saw it rising up on the hill like a mirage because it
looked so much like a cage. The sun was rising, filtering through the leaves
of the mulberry tree she had once climbed as a child, and the fragrant smell
of jasmine and roses drifted on the morning breeze like a balm. What a
pretty cage it is, she thought. And what a seductive jailer.
There was just enough time to shower and change. The Chihuly
sculpture swayed menacingly overhead from the current they’d let in,
making her remember the night that Nicholas had taken her beneath it on
the stairs like some sort of satyr the night he proposed, and how it had
turned the moonlight on their bodies a ghostly blue.
She would never be free of him.
And she wasn’t sure she wanted to be.
Unable to do her hair the way she wanted, Jay worked mousse into her
curls and scrunched them up with a t-shirt between blow-drying after her
shower. It felt very high school, back when everyone had wanted those
loose waves that looked wet. Her mother thought it was wasted effort.
“Why don’t you just flat-iron your hair?” she said, and so for several years,
Jay had.
Jay thought her blouse was looking a little rumpled, so she changed
into a black blouse with translucent sleeves, and a sweetheart neckline that
melted into more that same sheer tulle that fluted around her neck like a
ruff. When she got to the door, she saw Nicholas had changed, too, with his
shirt left open to reveal a hint of his collarbones.
He didn’t talk much as they drove to the office, turning on his music
instead. More fuck-boy rock. She watched his steady hands on the wheel.
Did he dream about the past, too?
“I missed you,” he said, when they pulled up in the parking lot and he
had cut the music. “The house didn’t feel right while you were gone.”
She looked at him.
“I meant what I said before, too.” His eyes flicked from hers. “On the
phone.”
It took her a moment to remember, and then she did, and it felt like
going into freefall.
Jay pulled him back when he reached for the door and kissed him. He
groped her through her blouse while they gasped and panted like teenagers
and she let him tug and pull at fabric, until the ache building between her
thighs was almost as desperate as their kissing.
“That’s enough.” Nicholas sounded breathless as he pulled her hand off
his chest. A slight hint of mockery entered his voice. “Someone might see.”
“Oh god.”
“Go.” He popped the locks. “I need a moment.”
She glanced up at the second floor as she got out of the car, smoothing
back a lock of hair. The parking lot was empty, but she hadn’t known that in
the car.
What are you doing, kissing him like that?
The breeze felt like ice on her too-hot face.
Arthur and Annica were chatting in the kitchen when she came in. They
went quiet when they saw her, which she told herself was fine.
“Jay!” Arthur said. “Welcome back.”
“Welcome back,” Annica echoed. Jay hazarded a look at her face: it did
not look very welcoming.
“It’s good to be back. I don’t think I could stomach another red-eye.”
Arthur looked aghast. “Don’t tell me you flew in this morning.”
“It was—” Nick’s idea, she almost said. “No big deal,” she finished
awkwardly. “There was more to do in San Francisco than I thought. I
needed the extra time. It’ll be fine.”
“If you’re sure,” Arthur said, not looking convinced.
“I was actually just about to get a second coffee, if you’d like one.”
Annica shook her head, even though Jay hadn’t exactly been offering to
her, but Arthur’s eyes lit up. “I think I’ll take you up on that. A flat white
would be great, as well as whatever you’re getting for yourself.”
“No, it’s okay,” Jay said, rejecting his proffered card. “My treat.”
“Assistants treating their bosses,” Arthur said. “What is the world
coming to?”
Annica looked as if she thought it were coming to a very bad place,
indeed.
Jay looked up at Nicholas’s office and wondered if anyone had ever
treated him. He seemed to think that everyone wanted him for everything
but who he was. It would explain why he had so much antipathy for
intimacy, and why he was constantly trying to court her affection with gifts.
His head turned her way and Jay whirled around, conscious of the
many office cubicles all facing her way. “I’ll just go get those coffees then,”
she said, too-brightly, as Arthur came out of the kitchen and headed towards
the stairs that took him to his corner office.
He gave her a little puzzled wave.
Bravo, Jay. Very smooth.
It was a nice day, so Jay decided to go a little further than her usual
Starbucks stop, heading to a little indie place with a curated photo wall and
gently-used thrifted armchairs. The menu was handwritten in chalk, very
fancy, though she had to squint to read the cursive.
“What’s the sweetest drink you have?” she asked the barista, who
pursed her lips.
“The sweetest? Probably the white mocha frappe. I’ve been told it
tastes a lot like white chocolate candy.”
“Do you have sprinkles you could put on it?”
“We use them for the donuts, but sure, I can put some on the whip and
charge it like a topping, if that’s okay with you?”
“That would be great!” said Jay. “I’ll have that and a flat white and an
oat milk latte. Make the white mocha and the oat milk decaf, please,” she
added, remembering Nick’s quad shot from that morning.
The man behind her stepped up in line, forcing Jay to squeeze out of
the way and off to the side with a little hop before he could press up against
her. Ugh. She felt a flicker of impatience and unease, which she quickly
suppressed, knowing that if either showed up on her face it would be worse.
She studied the sparse remnants in the pastry case instead, keeping an ear
out for her order.
She heard the man pay, noting that he didn’t say thanks. Jerk, she
thought, her frown deepening when he approached to join her at the case.
There was something familiar about the way he held himself. She stiffened
and pulled out her phone.
There were no good reasons that she would remember a man of her
stepfather’s age.
“Are you a fan of sweets?” he asked, looking at her boldly.
“No, not really. My boss is.”
“Oh? Where do you work?”
Little alarm bells went off in her head. She’d heard this line of
questioning too many times before when listening to how men talked to her
mother.
“Not that far,” she said evasively. “I’m just doing a coffee run.”
Tweed Creep smiled. “My wife doesn’t drink the stuff. Doesn’t see the
need to get a coffee machine, either. I have to sneak out of the house to get
my fix.”
Jay smiled tightly, doubting if there even was a wife. She hadn’t missed
the once-over he’d given her in the reflection of the glass case when he
thought she couldn’t see, or the casual way he’d fished for her place of
work.
“Enjoy.” She kept her tone brisk. Not friendly but not annoyed, either.
Men seemed to take both of those things as invitation. In the corner of her
eye, she could see her order being placed in one of those drinks carriers and
hurried over, waving her receipt before they could call out the name that
was on her credit card. “That’s mine! Thank you.”
She slid a tip into their jar as she hurried out, clutching the carrier to
her chest. The man wasn’t following—yes, she’d checked—but her heart
was still going a mile a minute, the way it did whenever she thought of
Damon.
Maybe you’ve forgotten how to talk to people, that voice that sounded
like her mother said. All you do is hang around with Nicholas, and he’s not
exactly Mr. Social.
And that was true. But after spending seventeen years traumatized by
her stepfather’s attempted grooming, Jay had learned to trust her gut
whenever her gut said “run.”
She sagged into the office, giving a tired nod to the receptionist as she
flashed her lanyard. “Thanks, Jay,” Arthur said, when she handed him his
coffee. “You’re an angel.”
(pure little angel)
Setting her shoulders, she walked down the hall to Nick’s door. It was
open for once, but everyone was giving it—and him—a wide berth.
He looked up when her shadow fell over his desk, and that stern glare
melted into a slight half-smile when he saw that it was her. Turning
sideways in his chair, he propped one arm up on the desk to lean on his
chin.
“And what can I do for you, Ms. Varens?”
She found herself looking at his fingers drumming on the armrest for a
beat too long. “I brought you a coffee,” she said stiffly. “It’s half-chocolate,
all sugar. You’ll love it.”
Nicholas blinked.
Nudging aside his empty mug, she placed the cup on his desk. Some of
the whipped cream had melted on the walk over and the sprinkles had made
it a runny rainbow mess, but he looked at it with the same bewildered
expression he’d given her when she had brought him the cupcake from Just
Avocados.
“Thank you, Jay.”
That was when it clicked—the man, the one from the coffee shop.
Tweed Creep. He’d been the photographer at the farmer’s market—the one
she’d seen while buying the cake.
She hadn’t recognized him without the bulky camera around his neck.
Maybe his interest in her hadn’t been prurient, after all.
Nicholas cleared his throat. His eyebrows were raised. “Was there
something else?”
“Yeah.” Jay bent towards his neck, and he sucked in an anticipatory
breath that made the seams of his suit audibly strain around his shoulders.
“Wash your disgusting mug before it gets mold in it,” she whispered in his
ear, before taking a quick step back. “Enjoy the coffee.”
She walked back to her desk with a swing in her step, feeling his eyes
hot on her back. Annica stared at her with obvious judgement and Jay,
uncharitably, found herself thinking, Oh, go cry to your sad little group
chat.
Her phone buzzed. She glanced up at the mezzanine where Nicholas
was leisurely sipping his coffee in a way that looked downright indecent.
It tastes almost as sweet as you will later.

For the fourth time in her life, Jay found herself moving things into her
old childhood bedroom. It was surreal, shoving aside bubble hem dresses
and skinny belts to make room for her adult clothes as she sidestepped her
agitated cat. He raced around the room, alternating between sniffing at the
boxes she was unpacking and yowling his unhappiness.
Jay felt sorry for him. Change upset her, too.
Perhaps it would have been smarter to insist upon her own apartment,
but her heart wasn’t in it. It would feel too much like him setting her up as
his mistress, and she knew he would fight her on rent, which would defeat
the whole purpose of having her own place.
Nicholas may have freed her from her imprisonment, but now, in the
absence of those barred walls, she felt as if she’d lost all the hard edges that
had defined their relationship in this place.
And then there was his confession: he loved her, and wanted to marry
her. If she left again, she knew beyond a shadow of a doubt that she would
be taking his broken heart with her. She didn’t want to hurt him but staying
here was a tacit promise of the very sort of possession that he had initially
tried to obtain by force, and she wasn’t sure how to navigate that, either.
It didn’t help that part of her wanted to be here. The cruel boy who had
used to fling her own confused desires back into her face like a knifethrower at a carnival had become a man who could charm her into holding
those selfsame blades at her own throat.
Things were different now, and he seemed to sense that, too. He hadn’t
even come to her room and she had been listening for him, braced for the
familiar tread of his footsteps outside her door.
It won’t last, she told herself. He’s not patient, he’s never had to wait.
But he didn’t come to her, and when she dragged herself down the
stairs, poorly rested and haunted by the nightmares of a not-too-distant past,
she felt hunted by the way his eyes tracked her through the kitchen, and
how they lingered on the engagement ring she still wore at her throat.
She owed him an answer and could feel the unspoken deadline drawing
nearer and nearer. For the first time in her life, she had control, and the
thought of giving it up was terrifying.
Work was her only normal. From the moment she stepped out of his
car, to the moment she walked over the threshold of his mansion, she was
simply Justine Varens, administrative assistant. Not her stepbrother’s
mistress. Not a stripper’s daughter. Not a member of the deposed elite,
shaded and scorned by her betters. She was Jay. Just Jay.
And she was good at being Jay.
She just had to figure out the rest of it.
A calendar invite popped up on her computer screen with a cheerful
chime. Jay looked away from the bullet points she was putting together for
one of Arthur’s upcoming presentations to the Finance team. A meeting?
Quarterly evaluations weren’t until next month and they only met every
other week or so to discuss tasks and projects too detailed to fit into an
email.
Hey, did we have a 1:1 that I forgot about?
No, Arthur responded. Are you available for a quick chat?
There were few words in the English language as terrifyingly
euphemistic as “a quick chat.”
A cold feeling washed through her as she mentally sped through her
performance over the last month and all the ways she could have failed.
Okay, sure, I’ll be right there.
She was being fired, clearly. They knew about her and Nick and this
was the final straw. And it wouldn’t be sensitivity training for her, no. She
wasn’t important enough to rehabilitate. They would just replace her with
another assistant and she would be back to where she was before, living off
of Nicholas’s charity and having to see the awful triumph of having her at
his mercy in his eyes.
Arthur was waiting for her in one of the conference rooms on the
second floor. She had to walk past Nicholas’s desk to get to it and was
aware of his head turning to follow her shaky progress. In a company this
small, word spread like wildfire. God, that fucking woman in Acquisitions
had noticed that Nicholas waited for her inside his own parked car.
With a trembling hand, she closed the door behind her until it latched
with a little click. This is the end, Jay. The privacy is just a formality in case
you cry when you’re fired for being a whore.
“So,” Arthur said, in a voice that did not contain nearly enough disgust
for how shameful she felt sitting in front of him. “Nicholas tells me that
you’re very interested in the VP role that just opened up, which I have to
admit was a bit of a surprise.”
Jay gaped at him, trying to understand. I’m not being fired collided fullforce with Nicholas told you WHAT? It felt like her brain had just shortcircuited and was shooting off sparks.
“Why don’t you tell me a little bit about what prompted your interest in
the role,” Arthur suggested, when she continued to stare at him stupidly.
“This isn’t a formal interview, of course, but I’m curious what made you
want to apply, and also how you envision your future at this company.
You’ve been here for a while and we haven’t yet discussed the prospect of
growth.”
Arthur thinks you would be perfect for the position, Nicholas had said.
Apparently that meant, I think you’re perfect for it, and I always get what I
want so I’m going to meddle in your life.
Her fingers dug into the armrests as she forced herself to smile and
nod.
I’m going to kill him, she thought.
Not now, though. Later, at home. In private. She might have wanted to
wrap her hands around his big stupid neck and squeeze, but she didn’t want
to get him fired. Between the near miss of the lawsuit and his total disdain
for workplace harassment, something like this could well be the breaking
point.
“I like it here,” Jay said, though this didn’t feel very true at the
moment. Her mouth was dry from fear and she could hear her heart
pounding in her ears like a timpani drum. “And it seemed like it would
mesh with my current skillset. I have experience in overseeing projects and
delegating assignments. And I work well with people—even if they’re
difficult to work with.”
Even if I’m going to kill them later.
She glanced at Arthur’s face. It gave away nothing.
“I, um, also enjoy a challenge?”
“Directing is quite different from providing administrative support,”
Arthur said.
Hearing her own doubts spoken out loud by someone else, no matter
how gently, was devastating. Why had Nicholas done this to her? It was just
another way she was going to fail.
“I know I don’t have a lot of experience but sometimes that can be a
good thing,” she said, a little desperately. “When there’s no expectations,
there’s no bad habits to break. You can just grow naturally into the role and
pick up all the new skills like it was made for you.”
“I suppose that’s true.” He considered her, not unkindly. “Assuming
one can step up to the task.”
And I’m not. Her shoulders sank despairingly. She was reading that
loud and clear.
They discussed the role a little more. It was a very polite rejection. He
kept emphasizing the word “expectations,” as if to drill in the fact that she
wouldn’t be able to fulfill them, while Jay nodded and smiled and longed
for nothing more than to flee from the room.
By the time the “quick chat” petered out into actual small talk, she was
exhausted. Arthur asked her questions about San Francisco, and though she
answered, she couldn’t remember anything she actually said. She thought
she might have heard herself telling him about crying at the apple picture,
which would have been even more humiliating, but at that point it was hard
to be sure what she was saying because her brain had shut off from panic
overload.
“I’ll reach out with next steps, Jay,” he said, concluding both the
meeting and her silent torture. “But I really do appreciate you raising your
hand for this role. I always tell people that you have to be your own
advocate. Nobody else will make that push for you.”
I know one person who would. Right off a cliff.
She looked hard at Nicholas as she stumbled out of the room. He was
on the phone but making no attempt to pretend like he wasn’t watching. If
he even was on the phone—she knew that he faked his own phone calls
when he didn’t want to be bothered. Evil, meddling bastard.
What the fuck? she mouthed at him, and he gave an insolent shrug,
pointing to the receiver in a way that made her absolutely certain that he
was not taking an actual call.
Even Annica looked over as she walked back to her desk, unlocking
her computer one-handed and typing in her password, while scrambling for
her phone.
Too busy to answer me, huh? But not too busy to mess around with my
employment. How DARE you go over my head like that to Arthur. I don’t
need you to micromanage my career. Not when the one you SHOULD be
worrying about is your OWN.
She opened the list of bullet points and began line editing furiously.
Her phone lit up.
You said you didn’t want to be a kept woman.
I fail to see what that has to do with this situation.
Nicholas hung up his phone, putting an end to the charade.
If you’re a VP, you’ll be an executive.
Jay stared at her phone incredulously. And you think handing me the
job like I’m one of those nepo babies is the solution? People are still going
to think I fucked you for it.
I’m not handing it to you. You have to earn it.
Unbelievable. She shook with anger, and a deep, deep sense of
disappointment. I can’t believe you.
Why is it unbelievable? You went to one of the best colleges in the
country. The only reason you didn’t get snapped up after college like
everyone else was because you allowed my father to make you think you
were nothing without his name. I could put you in any position at this
company and you would be too stubborn to fail, because that’s the kind of
woman you are.
Jay stared at her phone.
In his twisted mind, he wasn’t meddling. He was removing barriers
from her life to clear the road to—what, exactly?
Himself?
She could feel her anger rapidly draining away, even as she struggled to
hold onto it. He really thought he was doing her a favor.
I’m a grown woman, she wrote. I don’t need you to manage me.
She glanced up at his office, but he didn’t respond.

Not all transactions were quick and painless. How many times had he
been absolutely certain that the deal was closed, only for the other party to
get cold feet? Or worse: greedy. There were always more demands to be
made, more money, more time, more everything, and he had gotten very
good at saying “yes, and?” or “no, but.”
Regardless of what Jay thought, the interview with Arthur would work
to her advantage. If his own conniving secretary could harbor such
ambitions, why not Jay?
Her anger had lost its edge already. They had driven home in cold
silence but she had grumblingly accepted his apology before disappearing
into her room and closing the door—a dare, he thought, amused. He invited
her to go out wine-tasting with him instead. The museum and dinner date
had been a success, and he had enjoyed himself. She had, too. He could tell.
And that was good. He wanted Jay to enjoy spending time with him; he
wanted her to need it.
When she had drunkenly begged him to fuck her after that date—to
hurt her and make it feel good, god, did she have any idea what she did to
him?—it had been hard to refuse. But he had, because he understood now
what he hadn’t when he was young: that Jay was so married to her morals
that she would destroy her own happiness as long as she got to believe she
was good.
She would fuck him, and be his slutty girl for the night, and then she
would accuse him of wanting her for her body and things would devolve
into the same tired argument that they’d had so many times before because,
yes, of course he fucking did, but he also wanted her.
And Jay did not think she was good enough to be wanted.
Birds chirped in the trees overhead and a breeze rifled through his hair.
The picturesque vineyards and rustling cypresses formed a pastoral
background that could have belonged in a children’s book, which was
ironic, because his thoughts right now absolutely could not.
Jay was on the fourth wine in her tasting and he was watching her get
increasingly flustered and silly and hoping she wouldn’t notice that the
sleeve of her sweater had slipped down to bare her shoulder and the very
low-cut neckline of her top.
“I forgot what I’m supposed to be drinking right now,” she said, “but it
tastes like cherries.”
“It’s a rioja.” He took a sip from his own wineglass. “They all taste
like cherries.”
“Not the one before,” she protested, a flush in her pretty cheeks. “That
tasted like pears.”
She tilted her head back to watch the birds in the branches. One of
them, drawn to their charcuterie board, got bold and fluttered right down on
the table. He started to shoo it away, but Jay grabbed his bicep with a look
of pure delight.
She just fucking lights up, doesn’t she?
“Oh my god,” she said. “Look how cute. It’s right there.”
“Yeah,” he agreed, focused entirely on the press of her fingers through
his sleeve and the soft weight of her breasts through that lacy camisole. It
looked like the one she’d been wearing beneath her sweater in San
Francisco. When I made her cry. Guilt flared through him, hot and stinging.
“So it is.”
“I think it’s a pygmy nuthatch,” she said. “I used to see them at the
school. I missed them.”
“Give it a nut or something.”
“Okay!” She leaned over him to grab one of the seed-studded crackers
and crumbled it, giving him a look down her top that had him taking a deep
drink of wine while she flicked a few morsels the bird. It hopped back and
eyed them both with a head tilt before plucking up a piece with an editorial
chirp and flying back into the trees. “Off she goes.”
“You need to eat.” He slid the wooden board towards her. “You’ve got
the voice.”
“What voice?”
“The one you get when you’re wasted.” The one you had when you
begged me to fuck you. “And you’re losing your sweater.”
“Shit.” She yanked the sleeves back up her arms in a show of defensive
prudery that made him chuckle.
“A little bit of tasteful cleavage isn’t going to get us kicked out, you
know.” He slid his arm around her waist and squeezed. “I like it better when
you’re not quite so buttoned up. Even when you’re mouthing off to me or
talking about birds or cylinders.”
Or driving me insane.
“Mmm.” She let her head fall against his shoulder. Letting go of the
sweater, he noticed as he traced his fingers over her soft stomach. “Mom
always said I talked too much.”
“I think you talk just the right amount.”
She smiled at him. Then her face clouded. “I don’t think she ever loved
me. I think all the things she said to me were just reasons she made up for
herself for why she couldn’t.”
He forced his hand to relax as he reached for his wineglass, letting his
other hand fall flat over the slight swell of her belly. “Well, she would
know.” He kept his voice toneless. “No one was more unlovable than her,
except for my father.”
Jay shuddered. “I never understood how you could stay with him. It
was like he wanted to snuff out everything that was good in you and make
you more like him.”
“I stayed because it was easy,” Nicholas said. “And then, later, I stayed
because I liked seeing him slowly realize that I was going to take
everything that he had built and destroy it.”
“Including who he wanted you to be,” Jay murmured. He looked at her
sharply.
Oblivious, she stared up at the trees. “Michael took me here once. He
kept telling me how pretty I was, and how perfect we were—like it was my
face and your father’s money that made us work as a couple, and absolutely
nothing else. And I hated him a little that day, Nick. I really did. Because
the person he kept describing to me, the girl he thought he was in love with
—the person he wanted me to be, who was uncomplicated and easy—
sounded so vain and shallow.”
“Don’t take it personally. He only sees what his father tells him to see.”
Nicholas set his glass down, still disturbed by what she’d said about him
and his father. “I know where he works. We could run him over with my
car.”
She laughed uneasily. “You’re such a bad person, Nicholas. You
shouldn’t joke like that.”
“I’m my own person. Good or bad—it’s all subjective in the end.
We’re what we make of ourselves.”
“Uh-huh,” said Jay. “That’s why you run your father’s business from
your father’s house.”
“Let’s not talk about our parents.” He poured the remnants of her wine
into his glass while she was distracted. “Tell me more about you.”
“Oh, you’re going to be like that?” Jay picked up a date and growled
when he tried to take it from her. “Get your own.”
“Those have honey on them, you drunk nerd.”
“Honey’s not so bad. It helps the bees. Agave is bad for the rainforest,
anyway.” She began chewing it, looking at him through narrowed eyes. “I
forgot how you can be.”
“What?”
“I mean, you were always smart—that was clear in the way you used to
lead your little group of friends around. But I didn’t realize you could be
like this.” Her face shifted to a soft, sad expression that turned the wine
bitter on his tongue. “It makes me want to say yes.”
His heart pounded. “Yes to what?”
“How are you doing over here?” their server interrupted, and he wanted
to strangle her. “Are you ready for the next pour?”
Jay frowned and looked for her glass. Nicholas gave a brief shake of
his head, letting some of his irritation show.
“Oh, uh, actually, I was wrong,” she stammered. “Looks like there are
no more pours. But I can give you a small taste of dessert wine.”
“I thought there would be more,” said Jay.
“Not for you. Tell me more about what you were saying before.”
“I don’t remember.” She wiggled against him, like she hadn’t just
fucked with his head and heart as casually as one might say the sky was
blue. “Did you know that the barnacle has the biggest dick-to-body ratio of
any animal on earth?”
Nicholas paused. “No.”
“Up to eight times their body length—that would be forty-eight feet in
humans. Imagine that.”
“I am,” Nicholas said, in a warning tone she cheerfully did not heed.
“How many inches is that?”
“About five hundred and sixty-seven more than you’d know what to do
with,” he growled, and she gave a little yelp as he pulled her onto his lap.
“Stop teasing me.”
“Here’s your wine.” Their server blushed and looked away. “I’ll, uh,
just set these both here on this side then?”
Nicholas wrapped his arm more firmly around Jay’s waist. “Perfect.”
When the other woman walked away, Nicholas leaned in to Jay’s face
and kissed her pretty, wine-stained mouth hard enough that she squeaked.
“You need to eat something before I take you home and sober you up.” He
layered a piece of dried fruit over the crackers and pressed it against her
lips. When they parted for him, the graze of her teeth against his thumb sent
a shiver arcing down his spine, and he found himself watching her mouth
with a frozen fascination.
There was no way she couldn’t feel what she was doing to him, sitting
where she was, but she didn’t seem to care. And even though they were far
from alone on this vast patio, she seemed content to remain on his lap with
his cock nestled against her ass.
His throat grew tight and he knocked back his port, letting its fiery
sweetness consume him and hoping it would wash away the images of
things he could not do with a drunk Jay.
“Here,” he said, passing her the second, smaller glass.
“Oh my god, that’s so good.”
I know. And I want it all.
When the server came back, he handed her cash for the tasting and the
tip, before asking for a bottle of water.
As they walked along the dirt road that led back to his car, Jay had her
cold bottle pressed against her throat. Her other hand was in his. “That was
nice,” she said guilelessly.
“I’m glad you enjoyed it.”
Trees formed a living tunnel over the path leading back to the crude
parking lot. A dirt shoulder separated the tarmac from the property itself,
though the owners had allowed it to become overgrown. Her sweater was
dangling around her elbows, and the leaves were making patterns on her
bare arms as the wind made her curls bob around her face in a way he found
enchanting.
Jay’s head whipped towards the shrubs and bracken when a highpitched whine filled the air, the satisfied, slightly sleepy smile disappearing
from her face.
“There’s something in those bushes.”
“Probably a snake or something.” He tugged on her wrist and she
lurched unsteadily in his direction. “Let’s get you to the car.”
“It sounds hurt.” Before he could stop her, she dropped her water and
stumbled for the greenbelt.
Nicholas stared after her incredulously—“fuck”—before giving chase.
Drunk Jay was surprisingly agile, and although he was faster than she was,
she had a head start. By the time he caught up to her, breathing lightly with
exertion, she was already stooping down, offering her hand to god-knowswhat. “No,” he barked, making her jump. “What the fuck are you doing?”
“It’s just a baby.” She bent to scoop up what appeared to be a mound of
brown and black fluff. “It’s not even running away.”
The fluff uncurled, and he saw a face, two eyes, and a pink tongue.
Somebody’s dog, he thought, though it looked too matted to be newly
escaped. A stray dog, he thought, eyeing the puppy’s grotesquely large
paws. And it’s not going to be a small dog.
Jay looked at him with a pleading expression that was so similar to the
puppy’s that he almost laughed, but he’d just had his car detailed and
getting a dog was not in his plans.
Jay lifted up a dirty paw and waved it at him.
“Please?”
(it makes me want to say yes)
His no died in his throat as he realized he couldn’t remember the last
time she had directly asked him for something that he would be able to give
her.
“Fine,” he said tightly. “Hold onto it. Both hands.”
He remembered his father saying, There are two types of women in this
world. Those who will demand the world from you and those who will sit
back and quietly accept their lot in life.
But Nicholas had never seen any woman smile at his father the way Jay
smiled at him.

Chapter Eleven

Nicholas walked her in through the door, one hand planted on her
lower back. After settling her on the couch, he disappeared with the dog.
“Where are you going to put it?” she asked, kicking off her shoes, and
Nicholas answered, a little grimly, “I’ll find somewhere.”
To anyone else, the words would have been alarming, but the dog’s tail
had been wagging as the two of them walked away, and she had seen the
way he’d looked at her when she’d been holding the puppy. It made her
remember a time that felt very long ago now, when she had walked past
Damon’s office and heard Nick asking for a dog and his father telling him,
no, that pets were a lot of work and wasted time that he would be better off
spending elsewhere.
Still a little buzzed, Jay picked up the remote and tapped a few buttons.
The landing page was full of nature shows and she landed on a live-feed of
a camera somewhere in the deep ocean, with murky green water the color
of a raw aquamarine.
She paused, transfixed by the sight of a shark weaving its way above a
coral reef.
“This is all the algorithm shows me now, because of you.” Jay jumped,
clutching the remote guiltily as Nicholas pushed off from the wall. His
sleeves were rolled up and as he got closer, she saw little marks that must
have been from the dog’s scrabbling dirty paws. “What’s this one?”
“It’s one of your ancestors. Cold-blooded, predatory, and always on the
hunt.”
His eyes narrowed and then his shoulders twitched. She screeched
when he vaulted over the back of the couch, causing the whole thing to
shake so alarmingly that she felt a flicker of real fear when the springs
shrieked beneath them as he tackled her.
“Nooo! Nick!” She half-gasped, half-laughed as she brought her legs to
her chest, shoving at him ineffectively with her bare feet. He pinned her
wrists down, despite her protests, and started biting at her face and throat.
“Stop it! What are you doing?”
“Marking you for later.” A dull ache rocked her to the core as his teeth
grazed the skin beneath her ear before he closed his lips over the base of her
throat and sucked hard. Gripping him the way she was, she felt the low
rumble of his laugh like a caress. “So I remember to eat you.”
Oh my god. Her hips suddenly felt as if they had been filled with hot
lead. Giving her a slow, seductive smile, he tugged her sweater off her
shoulders and bit her just above her left breast. Jay jerked with a gasp, her
eyes swinging instinctively to the low wall over their heads.
“Is there a bird fish?” he whispered hotly.
“There’s a bird wrasse.” She pushed at him nervously and he growled.
“Nick, seriously. I can’t go into the office with marks all over my throat.”
He gave a tug at her top. “Who said anything about your throat?”
“Stop it now.” She grabbed his wrist as she sat up, and he allowed her
to push him backwards so that he was leaning against one of the arms,
sitting sideways. “Where’s the puppy?”
“I put him in the garage.” His eyes kept flicking over her, like he found
it impossible to stop. “I’ll take him to the vet tomorrow. They’ll see me
without an appointment.”
Jay shook her head at the arrogant tone. His eyes were softer in this
low light, though, and framed by those dark sable lashes, that icy gray
almost looked warm enough to melt. “Are you sure he’ll be all right in
there?” she asked worriedly. “There’s chemicals—and he might get lonely.”
“There’s no chemicals out there. Just a bunch of old Christmas shit. I’ll
bring him into the house after he’s chipped—and washed.”
She put her hand on his chest. “Thank you.”
“Saying no to you wasn’t really an option.” His torso rose and fell
beneath her palm. When she moved lower, he sucked in. “You have a
history of picking up the strays.”
“Does the cold, ruthless millionaire have a heart, after all?”
“You tell me.” His lips parted as he watched her trace over his
abdomen. Still stained faintly with wine, they were all the more tempting
for their chiseled cruelty. “You’re the one who told me I didn’t have one.”
“I was wrong.” She leaned closer, bracing herself against his arm as she
leaned up towards his mouth. “You weren’t what I thought you were.”
Jay felt the flinch of muscle through the thick waffle-knit and then he
pulled away, sliding off the couch completely. She stared up at him, with
her hands braced between her legs, confused and a little hurt. His face was
unreadable.
“I’m going to make some coffee.”
Jay grabbed the throw blanket off the back and wrapped it around her
shoulders. “I thought you didn’t know how to use the machine,” she called
out, feeling vulnerable and small in the silence of the empty room. Her eyes
darted warily to the wall where that spider sculpture had once sat. It was
gone now—sold, she imagined. Or destroyed. “Wasn’t that why I had to
make it?”
“I printed out the instructions in French.”
He was holding two full mugs when he came back. They smelled like
the honey whiskey he had kissed off her body, and that realization nearly
made her drop her cup when the scent hit her nose. “I’m not trying to get
you drunk,” he said, a little coolly, watching her reaction.
“I didn’t say anything.”
“You didn’t have to. I know that look.” He leaned back against the arm,
stretching out his long legs. “The last time we drank out here, you accused
me of trying to drug you.”
Jay took a defiant sip of coffee and the warmth spread down her throat
like a hot blush. “The things I say and do don’t just occur in a vacuum, you
know.”
“I know.” Nicholas set his cup aside and her stomach flipped when he
put his arms around her waist and hauled her up against his chest so she was
sitting between his raised knees. Reaching down for his mug again, she
heard him take a sip. “But I want you to feel safe with me.”
Jay froze.
They had cuddled like this when they were younger, but it had been
different then. Innocent. The way her body reacted when he ran his hand
down her arm before pressing his mouth to the back of her neck was not
innocent. Nor was the way that she clutched her mug in white-knuckled
hands, struggling to maintain easy breathing as he slid the straps of her top
and bra out of the way to kiss across her bare shoulders.
“I missed this.” The words were so quiet that if it hadn’t been for the
rumble of his voice against her back, she could have convinced herself that
he hadn’t spoken at all.
She shivered a little. Me, too, she thought, swallowing hard. “I was
always a little surprised that you never came after me.”
He made a soft sound as he traced small circles over the soft skin
beneath her navel. It felt almost as good as it did when he kissed her there
while he was on his knees. “Why were you surprised?”
“You were so obsessed with me. I couldn’t believe you’d let me go.”
“Would you have come back?” She felt his hands lace over her
stomach, as if even now, he was driven by the urge to claim and possess. “If
I had tracked you down and shown up at your door five years ago, six years
ago, would you have returned here with me?”
“N-no,” she admitted shakily. “I would have run.”
“That’s why I didn’t.” His fingers dipped beneath her top. “I don’t like
to rush and I didn’t want to scare you.”
“No, you just sent a private investigator to take photos of me that you
did god-knows-what with.” Jay twisted around to look at him. “What if I
had been seeing someone?”
“I would have persuaded him to give you to me instead.”
“And you think that’s rational? You think that’s something ordinary
people just do to other people because they feel like it? Trade them like
fucking stocks?”
“Anyone who would give you up either doesn’t deserve you or can’t
afford you, and since supply informs demand—” He flicked his fingers over
her bare hip, each touch a sparkling constellation of fire and heat. “It looks
like I control the market and the supply.”
“I find it insulting that you think I would have just stood around
passively and let you do this absolutely insane thing you just said.”
Nicholas laughed. “You just told me that all your exes liked you
because they saw you as pretty and uncomplicated, and how much that
pissed you off. But that’s not why I like you, Jay. And you’ll never have to
fight against your own happiness to prove yourself to me.”
I don’t even remember the last time I was happy, thought Jay. Except
that she could, and it had been today.
With him.
She shoved against that thought so viciously that she physically
recoiled. “I didn’t realize I was being publicly traded.”
“You traded ten million for me.” He flicked the snap of her jeans.
“Turnabout is fair play.”
Fuck. She squirmed again and this time, his arms tightened, holding her
firmly within the cradle of his spread thighs. “You put me on a pedestal,”
she said haltingly, feeling much too hot under these too-bright lights.
“Maybe you can’t help that. But the way you love me—I’m not perfect. I’m
nobody’s angel. And you’ll begrudge me for not being the person you want
me to be when public opinion of me drops.”
“It doesn’t work like that.”
“Nick—”
“No, Jay. I’m telling you right now, it doesn’t work like that.”
He nudged at her shoulder, making her look back at him, where she
was greeted with a kiss so thorough that the alcohol coating her tongue
seemed to catch fire. When he lifted his hips, she was forced into an
ungainly sprawl, and when she rolled over to steady herself, she kicked the
blanket to the floor and nearly knocked over her mostly-untouched coffee.
Nicholas looked up at her heatedly, and the flexing of his thighs
beneath hers caused a ripple of sensation that pooled like ice between her
legs and made her breath come shorter.
“You’re perfect,” he breathed, “for me.”
“No,” Jay said. “I’m not.”
Both his hands were under her top now. Slowly, he drew his thumbs
over the tips of her breasts, his eyes firmly trained on her face. “Too bad. I
want you anyway.”
“Nick—” It came out as a gasp.
“That’s why I said you could hurt me.” He sucked hard on her neck,
stroking her nipples until they began to feel tender. “Nothing you could do
to me would hurt more than leaving.”
“I want to stay,” she breathed.
The realization hit her like a slap, and so did this strange rush of power
when she saw the desperation in his face as she got to her knees.
I can make him do what I want.
It was an ugly thought—her mother’s thought—and she winced from it,
peeling her top off and unhooking her bra. “I want to stay,” she repeated.
“You love me, don’t you?”
She felt Nicholas start beneath her, his eyes taking in her body. And
then with an almost mocking gesture, he crossed his arms and tugged off his
own shirt. “I can’t get you out of my fucking mind.”
When he fisted her hair, she felt an answering clench in her lower belly
as her eyes swept over his lean and powerful build. He pushed up with his
hips and the exquisite pressure between her legs, and the eagerness of his
rough, biting kisses made her moan into his mouth.
“That’s why I was willing to pay so much to watch you come,” he
whispered.
That should have terrified her. But she was so tired, and her resistance
was no match for his desire. It had pulverized into fine dust. He pushed her
hair back and kissed her jaw, his fingers spanning over her face, her throat,
and she wondered if he would at least be gracious in victory.
Or if he would just consume her whole.
Nicholas growled when he felt her sag towards him. Then his lips
seized hers again and there was something desperate about his kissing, an
aggression that nearly felt anxious. She wondered if he’d ever kissed any
other woman like this. And if so, whether any of them had ever suspected
that they were trying to free a man who wanted to sink deeper into his
obsession like a stone plunging into a dark sea.
“Open your eyes.” He breathed in harshly against her skin, every point
of contact between them like a heated star in a fracturing constellation.
“Look at me.”
“I can’t close my eyes?”
“If we’re going to do it with the lights off, I want to know you’re there
with me.” Forehead resting against hers, he breathed, “I feel like I’m always
chasing you through the dark.”
Jay felt her body flush from hot to cold and back, as if her nerve
endings were breaking.
“Why won’t you look at me? Is it because it hurts?” She felt him run a
hand down her spine, tender and possessive and so, so familiar. “Do you
want me to be gentle?”
“No.”
The harshness of her voice made him blink at last.
“I don’t want that.” Jay looked away from his penetrative stare,
clutching at her bare arm. “I don’t want gentle. I told you. I like it . . . when
you’re rough with me.”
His hand closed over the back of her neck and he pulled her in for a
possessive kiss that had her shifting in his lap. His eyes went to her face,
seeking confirmation.
“Rougher,” she whispered.
Nicholas relaxed his fingers, tracing along to the front of her throat.
She wasn’t expecting him to yank her forward by her necklace. The chain
bit into the back of her neck and her eyes flew open as his mouth fiercely
covered hers. He put his hand on her back to keep her pressed against him,
even as the force of his kissing drove her backwards.
“Oh god,” she said, struggling to catch her breath. “Nick—”
She reached for him and he brought her hand up behind her back.
“Beg for it.” He bent his head to kiss his way down her ribs until she
hissed. “Tell me you want it.”
“I do.” She choked on the words. “I want it. I want you. Just you.
Please.”
He let go of the necklace, letting it swing back against her collarbone.
And now his free hand was touching her everywhere, and his surprisingly
callused hands painted her in swirls of fire with each caress, causing her
desire to unwind like a molten cord in the pit of her belly.
“You’re so beautiful.”
Touch me, thought Jay.
“Daddy’s little bird.”
A desperate sound escaped her as his hand slid down her hip.
“Did you have a good time today?”
“W-what? I—yes—” She barely got the word out, distracted by his
mouth, and the gentle slide of his fingers as he put his hand inside her jeans.
“I mean, yes, Daddy.”
“You had fun?”
“Yes, but—”
“I want to take you out again tomorrow.” He was almost touching her
where she needed him to, and Jay set her teeth to bite back another gasp,
squeezing her eyes shut even more tightly at the sudden rush of pleasure.
“When I come back from the vet, let’s go for a hike. And then we’ll grab
lunch from some hole-in-the-wall. Wherever you want.”
“Whatever . . . I want,” Jay panted, feeling increasingly desperate as he
dropped a featherlight kiss on one of her nipples while his fingers just
skirted her clit.
“How does that sound?”
“Sure, but—” She blinked in foggy confusion when he pulled away,
sober enough that she sensed a trap. “You—”
“What?” His full mouth parted into a predatory grin. “Oh, you thought
you were going to get to fuck me? You should have kept your eyes open
like I told you.” His eyes flickered over her as he leaned back on the couch.
“I’ll still let you suck my cock.”
“Oh my god, you’re such an arrogant—” Jay broke off irately, grabbing
at her top and pulling it back on. “Asshole,” she said. “Why am I even
surprised? Everything’s always a game with you.”
“Poor little bird. I’d feel sorrier for you if I didn’t know you’d be
getting off in your room later with the door closed to that picture of me you
still have on your phone.”
“Fuck you for going through my phone.” Jay rose on shaky legs,
breathing far too hard, while he leaned back to watch his effect on her with
obvious amusement. “I know what you’re doing.”
He picked up his shirt and pulled it back on, rolling the fabric over his
magnificent torso. She looked away, but not fast enough. His grin widened.
“Don’t worry, Jay. I’m sure you can work off all your frustrations on
tomorrow’s uphill climb.”

Nine years of scouring the internet for any traces of her presence.
Five years of fighting with his father until the old man obliged him by
dropping dead.
Four years of living in this fucking house alone.
So many sleepless nights. So much pent-up rage.
Sometimes Nicholas tallied up all that lost time until he thought it
would drive him mad.
He’d murdered his father in effigy when he turned this mansion into a
soulless shell of its former glory, but that wasn’t enough. No, what he really
wanted to destroy was whatever it was that still made Jay look at him like
he was the monster from her dreams.
If he could reach inside himself and pull it out, he would. He’d offered
her the chance to do it herself, though the rot had burrowed deep. Long
before he’d resorted to blackmail, he’d spied on her, photographed her, and
raided her room, desperate to find any keys that might unlock her soul.
She would hate him even more if she knew all the depraved things he’d
done. The fantasies, the stalking, the fucking obsession. That he had used
her shampoo to jerk off and stolen her clothes, her lipstick. That when she
wasn’t around, he had sometimes lain in her bed and imagined what it
would be like to touch her the way she said she’d wanted to be touched in
her journal.
And of course, he had watched her touch herself. Every catch of her
breath, every discreet rustle of fabric, every teasing glimpse of brown skin
—he had seen it all, and taken it as a sign that not even Jay was immune to
pleasure. And, more importantly, that he could give it to her.
He could be the one to make her come.
The first time his stepmother had called him to beg for money, he had
been thinking of Jay. She was in his thoughts constantly, like a fluttering
dark moth drawn to the bright flame of his obsession. The sharpness of his
rage at finding her gone the night of his father’s party had slowly dulled
over the years, and in that well-lit gnawing emptiness, a lead-like desolation
had begun to form that sometimes felt like it might drag him down to his
knees. Nothing could fill that sucking void.
Desperate, he had set up a Google Alert for every variant of Jay’s name
that he could think of but it hadn’t turned up much. Just fleeting ghosts of
the past turned up by old web trawlers. One day, he’d got an email
notification about one of her old high school awards. But then a Livejournal
post written by one of her little hipster friends had allowed him to trace her
to San Francisco, and he had felt a surge of victory chased by frustration
and thwarted rage.
So close, he had thought. Just over an hour away by plane.
It had seemed a crime that she had been so close after all this time. A
taunt. How fucking dare she.
He had no way of contacting her then but the private investigator had
been able to provide him with some more leads: a list of her favorite places,
the business where she worked, and photos of her looking impossibly,
devastatingly beautiful.
She could be seeing someone. Nicholas had studied her large dark eyes
in the photograph he liked best, the one of her in the café, and remembered
their once-defiant glitter. I’ll tear him apart if she’s fucking him.
Hearing Danielle’s shrill voice had made all those violent impulses
resurface, and he was perversely that his loathing for his stepmother was
almost enough to distract from the thoughts of Jay spread out like a feast
beneath another man.
“Nicholas, don’t hang up. Your secretary put me through.”
He let out a hoarse, disbelieving laugh as he toyed with the pen in his
hand. “What the fuck do you want?”
“I’m broke.” Her nasally voice was like the whine of a mosquito. “I’m
about to lose my apartment.”
“I’m not running a charity. And even if I was, you’d be the last person
to benefit.”
“Would you be willing to talk to Jay?”
His fingers hovered over the “end call” button. “Is she there?”
“No, but I can give you her number.” She sounded smug now, but still
spoke quickly, as if she thought his interest might wane. “Her address, too.
For ten grand.”
“You think I’m going to pay you to have my estranged older sister give
me a talking-to? That’s really how you want to play this? I’m not ten years
old.”
“I know you’ve been looking for her.”
The words fell into a silence that was a little too telling on his part. She
must have heard the rumors. “After what you did, I’m surprised she’s still
talking to you.”
“I’m her mother,” Danielle said haughtily. “She trusts me.”
“And you’d sell her to me for ten grand.” Not bothering to keep the
disgust from his voice, he said, “What if I hurt her?”
“You wouldn’t.”
“Would you care if I did?” Suddenly, he was furious, blinded by his
loathing for this woman. “No, I don’t think you would. You’ve been jealous
of her your whole fucking life. You’d love it if she got what was coming to
her, you fucking Judas cunt.”
“Don’t talk to me like that—you—you oversized brat!”
“I can talk to you however I want,” Nicholas countered. “You want my
money, you dance to my tune. You want to sell Jay to me? Do that. But call
it what it is when you give me her information. You’re not her mother,
you’re her pimp.”
“How dare you.”
“I’ll write you the check as soon as I’ve determined both are valid.
Forgive me,” he added coldly, “for not trusting you.”
He hung up on her while she was still swearing at him, which normally
would have been good for some amusement. But as he stared at the wall
with his framed Stanford diploma, all he could think about was that
photograph of Jay in the café with that lock of gray hair dangling in her
eyes.
I’m going to possess you, my little blue jay. And I’m going to make you
love it.
Nicholas had to hand it to the old step-bitch. She’d waited a full week
after that initial phone call before hounding him for more money (after he’d
told his secretary he didn’t want to talk to her, no less), and then threatening
to sue him for all he was worth if he didn’t give her what she wanted. As if
he’d been the one to get her disinherited. She’d violated her own fucking
terms by cheating on his father.
Nicholas ran his hand over the desk in what had been his old bedroom,
shaking the memory of that day from his head. Perhaps he had her mother
to thank for making Jay into what she was: a woman who ran from her
potential because she thought the spotlight would burn.
“Dried up old whore,” he muttered, and then laughed.
Oh, the fucking irony.
He knew exactly how he was going to make her pay.
Nicholas left the converted office, taking care to close the door behind
him. Jay’s room was still shut, so he headed out through the sun room to the
detached garage. The weather was fair, with puffy clouds rolling slowly
across the cornflower blue sky. He could see them reflected in the serene
surface of his pool.
The puppy had been waiting for him. As soon as he had the door open,
there was a whine, followed by several high-pitched barks. A shiny black
nose appeared in the gap.
He bent down and scooped up the dog. It immediately began to wiggle.
The sight of those comically large paws cycling at nothing in the air made
one side of his mouth turn up as he headed back into the house. Carbon’s
carrier was still in the front hall, and he eased the reluctant dog inside.
Whines drifted from the crate all the way out the front door and into his
car. Nicholas tried to put on music, but Puscifer turned the whimpers into
anguished howls so he shut off the radio with a sigh. “You have shitty taste
in music,” he told the dog.
The receptionist at Hana Vet Clinic wanted to be chatty, asking him if
he had any plans for the day, but he wasn’t in the mood to play nice. He
answered her questions with clipped answers while looking at his phone,
knowing he was being rude and not caring.
“I’ve entered you in the system,” she said, sounding cross. “It should
be a short wait.”
He wasn’t seated for five minutes before the door opened and a woman
in scrubs poked her head into the waiting room. “Mr. Beaucroft, wasn’t it?
I’m Dr. Jennifer. You had that charity dinner last year, didn’t you? For the
city?”
“I just sign the checks,” he said, standing to follow her into the
examining room.
She lifted her ponytail to loop her stethoscope around her neck. “Don’t
be so modest. Some of that money got us new surgery lights and an
ultrasonic scale. We’re very grateful.” When he didn’t reply, Dr. Jennifer
bent down to the crate. “Who’s this handsome little fellow?”
“Maynard.”
“What an unusual name.”
“Mhm.” He looked away from her hunching backside, walking over to
examine a sign on the wall that said, CAN DOGS EAT HUMAN FOODS?
No nightshades, it said underneath. No xylitol.
“Is it French?”
“No idea.” Nicholas looked over his shoulder. The vet was looking into
the twitching ears, the nose. Even lifted the tail for a quick look. “Is he all
right?”
“He’s a healthy boy.” She ruffled the dog’s ears. “It looks like he’s
already been neutered and chipped but his coat suggests he’s a little
malnourished. Was he a rescue?”
“I found him in some shrubs.” He paused. “That is, my girlfriend did.”
“Oh.” Her smile dimmed a little as she gave the puppy another pat.
“Well, that’s not uncommon, I’m sorry to say. Sometimes people fall in love
with the idea of a puppy more than they do with the actual dog. Then it
grows up and becomes too much of a handful. Especially with big breeds
like this.”
Nicholas thought again of Jay’s mother. His jaw tightened. “What
breed is he?”
The vet glanced at the dog. “Without genetic testing, it’s hard to be
certain, but at a glance, I’d guess he’s a king shepherd, or a mix.”
“Does he need any shots? I’d like to get him all taken care of today, as
well as a new chip.”
Dr. Jennifer seemed a little taken aback. “Generally, you’d need to set
up another appointment for that. This is just a check-up.”
“I’m sure other parts of the building could use new surgery lights,”
Nicholas said.
An hour later, and a few grand lighter, Maynard was back in his crate, a
little dopey from his chipping, and Nicholas was back behind the wheel of
his car. He stopped by the Afghan place again to pick up some takeout
before their hike. Thankfully, the nosy owner hadn’t been there.
Knowing Jay, she was only just starting to get up.
He thought of how cross she’d been in her apartment, how it colored
her cheeks and gave her eyes a vicious glint, and made her stand just a little
taller when she faced up to him.
Grumpy little bird.
A satisfied smile curled his mouth.
He was looking forward to it.

Chapter Twelve
It was getting harder to remember why she wanted to push him away.
Last night, when she heard the creak of his footsteps outside her door
while she was getting herself off to the memory of his touch on her skin,
she had decided that maybe she didn’t care if he heard her. Maybe she even
wanted to moan a little louder, so that he would hear.
The footsteps stopped and Jay had waited, but he hadn’t come in.
She knew he was listening, though, and no, she hadn’t been quiet.
All those poor nice boys she had dated couldn’t hold a candle to what
she really wanted. Who she really wanted. A man to take her by the hand
and hold her tight as they walked along the edge of what was safe and what
was threatening.
A man would never let her fall but still made her want to.
Jay rose from her bed, folding her arms as she stood in front of her
closet awkwardly. All of her things were here now and she had no shortage
of clothes to choose from. After a moment of deliberation, she pulled a pair
of galaxy leggings off a hanger that she still unironically liked, and a
stretchy purple spandex crop top.
Since her hair was still damp from her shower, she tied it up in a high
ponytail, using one of those soft satin scrunchies that were supposed to keep
her from pulling her own hair out. The wet curls fell to the top of her spine
as she released it.
She made herself her morning coffee, noting Nicholas’s absence from
the kitchen. Was he in his office? Working? The door was closed and she
wasn’t sure if she should knock.
(Men don’t like women who cling, Jay)
An image of her mother standing in front of her mirror popped into
Jay’s head. She had been about nine or ten and it had been another one of
those nights when her mother hadn’t come back at all. Upon her return, a
younger, smaller Jay had wrapped her arms around her mother’s waist and
begged her in tears not to leave her alone again.
But she did, Jay thought morosely. Every time.
A key rattled in the lock. Then she heard footsteps, followed by a
familiar whine. Nicholas appeared, holding a brown bag in one hand. The
other was clenched around Carbon’s old carrier, where the puppy peered out
balefully.
“Oh, wow,” said Jay. “I thought you were in your office.”
“Have you eaten?”
“Not yet. I was literally just about to make something.” Jay got to her
knees as she bent down to the crate. “Poor baby, wearing the cone of shame.
You took him to the vet?”
“Vaxxed and chipped. They managed to squeeze him into their very
busy schedule.” A strange smile flickered over his mouth as he leaned over
to unlatch the carrier’s door. “They think he’s a king shepherd, which means
he’s going to be huge. His name is Maynard.”
“But he’s so little now.” The puppy bounded immediately for Jay, who
lifted the dog aloft and laughed as it immediately began trying to lick her
face. “I don’t remember agreeing to Maynard.”
“I paid for him.”
Jay scratched the puppy’s ruff, watching the dark brown eyes roll back
in exuberant joy. “So because I wasn’t there, you named him after your
favorite metal angst lord?”
“You remember?”
“Of course I remember. You’re always blasting Puscifer in the car.”
“I’m pretty sure I used to fuck you to it, too.” With his back to her, he
opened one of the containers and began ladling out golden lentil soup.
“Rev. 22-20 was practically our song.”
Flustered, Jay abandoned the puppy, who began to chew on the door of
Carbon’s cage. She hovered uncertainly, watching Nicholas dish food out
onto plates. Our song, gave her a funny feeling in her gut. What they had
been doing back then hadn’t been romantic. He’d put the music on so their
parents wouldn’t hear what he was doing to her in his room.
“You always did have bad taste,” she said lightly.
“Better than your 90s strip mall college rock shit.” Nicholas swung
over the stool and patted the one next to him. “Come here.”
Jay sighed and stepped forward, grabbing a plate and a bowl. Even
though her stomach was doing flipflops, she made herself eat, aware of his
heated glances streaking across her skin like meteors. “If you don’t like
Spiderbait and The Sundays, there’s something wrong with you.”
Nicholas chuckled, but it lacked the usual hard edge that his laughter
frequently contained.
She wondered what it would be like when he came to her again. When
she told him in the den how she liked to be touched it was as if she had
unlocked a door inside herself and now that it was open, any manner of
things could come tumbling out.
They talked a little while eating but Jay got the sense that Nicholas was
intentionally skirting certain topics. When they were done with their meal,
he pulled his mirrored shades out of his pocket, popping them on his nose
with the same careless gesture that he’d been practicing since high school.
It was much smoother now, but so was everything else about him.
But it also meant that she couldn’t see his eyes.
“It’s a nice day.” He cranked the air on, to cool down some of the
midday heat that had built up in the car. “Maybe we can walk the dog later
when the sidewalk cools down.”
Jay looked up from her folded hands, curiously touched that he’d
thought of the dog’s soft paws. “You got him a leash already?”
“I got him everything. I’m thinking of taking him on my morning
runs.”
Jay grimaced.
“What’s with you and running, Jay? I thought vegans were supposed to
be health nuts.”
“I like hiking,” Jay said. “I just hate how I feel after a run. I’m all
sweaty, and I get stitches in my side—” She shook her head violently. “I’d
rather use the pool.”
“One of these days, I’m going to use that knowledge against you, little
bird.” He made a low sound, as if whatever he was imagining pleased him,
and a little frisson of not-quite-fear trickled through her. “Use the pool, all
you want. I might join you. I could help you with your form.”
“You haven’t been swimming lately,” she pointed out.
“I do it early. Before you wake up. I like it when the water’s cold.”
“God, why? You used to swim in the afternoons like a normal person.”
“Well.” Nicholas shifted his grip on the wheel, looking almost selfconscious. “You would read out by the pool in the afternoons.”
“Oh.” Jay stared out at where an old gas station had been, remembering
how she had used to lie out by the water, desperate to get out of that house
and her stepfather’s oppressive gaze. She’d barely noticed Nicholas was
there at all. “God. I was so fucking blind.”
“We don’t have to talk about the past.”
But we can’t avoid it, either.
They pulled up at the dirt parking lot with a crunch of grit beneath the
tires. Despite the late start to the day, they were still there early enough that
some of the good spots were still left.
Sunlight speared through the live oaks, catching on silvery motes of
dust. This time of year, everything was still mostly brown and dry, but there
was still some residual green from the too-brief rainy season when the heat
made plants hoard their moisture as jealously as any miser.
Looking out the car window, Jay spotted a manzanita, which made her
remember the last time she had hiked down this trail. She and Nicholas had
had a big fight, after which she had cried like a baby in his arms. Both of
them were so broken that their edges had turned sharp; and just like that
California boxthorn withering in the blazing heat, it seemed like every time
they got close to each other, someone always drew blood.
She slid out of the car as the door opened—Nicholas holding it open, of
course. The chime of the locks engaging sounded overly loud in the silent
space, broken only by bird calls.
“How did the interview go?” Nicholas shoved his keys in the pocket of
his shorts. They nearly hit his knee, revealing well-muscled calves sprinkled
with coarse dark hair. Oblivious to the dark yearning of her thoughts, he
said, “You were so cross, I wasn’t sure I should ask.”
“It wasn’t an interview, it was a meeting. And I was cross because you
arranged that meeting behind my back by throwing your stupid weight
around.” Jay kicked a big rock out of her path and then felt bad when she
startled a little lizard into darting into the brush. “You’re such a bully.”
“So you’re not going to tell me?”
“I think that would be a conflict of interest.”
“I could ask Arthur.”
“Then ask him.”
Nicholas gave her a dry look. “Don’t you want a promotion?”
“I want one, yes, but so do a lot of people. Some of them have been
working at your company for years. It feels wrong to get one just because I .
. . know you.”
“That’s not why.” His mirrored shades flashed as he studied the
landscape, a hardness to his mouth making her wonder if he had seen the
manzanita, too. “I was given everything I had but I still had to work for it.
That doesn’t mean I’m not worthy. It doesn’t mean that you’re not worthy.”
“It’s not the same.” Jay tugged on the brim of her hat with her free
hand, shielding her eyes from the glare of the sun. “Listen, when I
graduated from Cal, I thought I’d get a job right out of college. That’s the
promise, right? Go to a good school, get a good job. But I had zero work
experience and nobody wants to hire someone who majored in Sociology,
even if it was at UC Berkeley. I ended up going back to school to get an
administrative assistant certificate from a community college just so I could
have a fighting chance in the job pool I wasn’t even qualified for. And I
kept thinking, your father would have laughed to see me fall so hard. The
girl everyone voted as ‘Most Likely to Succeed’ filing office memos for a
company that sells soap.”
“It doesn’t matter what my father would have thought.” Nicholas’s
voice was sharp. “He’s dead. What does any of that have to do with my
promoting you?”
“Because you don’t really think I’m qualified for this job. You made
fun of my previous one—you called me a cute little secretary who worked
in a soap shop.”
“You are a cute little secretary who worked in a soap shop.”
Jay watched a ruby-crowned kinglet flutter by as it scanned the
chaparral for insects. The orangey-red crest on its head looked like a dyed
mohawk, and it looked so silly that she drew in a deep breath, her anger
spiraling away as she remembered their winery date and how sweet he’d
been with her. It gave her something to hold onto while he was pissing her
off now.
“Why do you think I need help from you?” she pressed. “Why are you
so busy trying to assign me extra value if you think I’m already worthy?”
“Because I think you’re fucking exceptional. Everyone in our family
got to where they were by pretending to be something they weren’t. But not
you. You never had to pretend to get people to love you. The only thing that
ever held you back was you thinking you weren’t good enough.” His jaw
set. “You might be content to sit and play the long con, but I’m not. Think
of it as me accelerating the process so you don’t get stalled by your
devaluation of yourself.”
“You told me it didn’t matter.”
“It didn’t then. Our parents were never going to let us outshine them.
But things are different now. I can help you and I want to.”
A warm breeze ruffled their hair. Jay could smell the dusty sweet smell
of the sun-dried grass and the crisp mineral bite of the earth itself. “Why?”
she asked, suddenly needing to hear it.
“Because I love you.”
Jay stopped walking. His face was solemn—at least, she thought it was.
She reached up and carefully removed his sunglasses, folding them into the
neck of his shirt as she looked up into his familiar eyes with their shrunken
pupils.
“I’m not sure I’m a good fit for this position.”
He stepped closer, and Jay felt the rough bark of a tree dig into her bare
back. She wasn’t sure which of them initiated the kiss, but it was her hand
fisted around his shirt, and in the thin, galaxy leggings, she could feel just
about all of him riding up between her thighs.
“You’re a great fit,” he said.
“Nick.” Her forehead rested lightly against his as she spoke
reproachfully, willing him to understand. “You can’t fuck me into this job.”
“I can coach Arthur on what to say.” He pushed back against her,
driving her back against the trunk with his hips. “I can coach you, too. And
I still have enough influence with this company that if I make my
preference known, the hiring team will pick whoever I want to keep me
happy.”
Jay took his hand off her hip and felt a flicker of defeated amusement
when he pinned it over her head instead. “This is so fucked up.”
“What?” The words burned against her lips.
“Us. This. You trying to twist the arm of your hiring managers to get
me promoted, and us LARPing through our parental abandonment issues
with sex.”
“But it’s such good sex.”
Jay shoved at him with her elbow. “I call my stepbrother Daddy. That’s
not normal.”
“So? Embrace it. Send me a father’s day card next time you fuck my
brains out. ‘Thank you, Daddy, for always giving me that good dick. I love
taking your big cock until I’m sore. Thanks for all the orgasms. Love, Jay.’”
Jay stared at him in horror, a rusty sound escaping her before she
doubled over, laughing so hard that it almost hurt because she couldn’t stop.
She was aware of Nicholas releasing her arm as she bowed forward, her
face pressed against his chest. She felt it heave in surprise.
“Jay, it was just a joke.” He sounded concerned.
“No.” She pulled back, still wheezing. “Oh my god. No, that’s . . . so
sick. Not funny.”
Nicholas studied her face, his smirk slowly returning. “Seems like you
thought it was pretty fucking funny.”
“Only because it’s so awful.” Jay straightened her clothes and wiped at
her eyes. “God. Why do I end up crying every time we come out here? I
hate it.”
“Because you’re so used to being everyone’s perfect little angel that
you hold everything in until you break.”
She eyed him. “I’m not perfect, Nicholas.”
“Yeah, I know. But that doesn’t stop you from throwing yourself up
against that wall. In case you hadn’t noticed, that’s kind of your thing, blue
jay. Punishing yourself.”
A branch snapped somewhere nearby. Jay hopped back unsteadily,
breathing in a lungful of dusty, pollen-laden air, not realizing how stiff all
her limbs had become. “I don’t punish myself,” she said hotly.
“Yes, you do.” He swatted at a horsefly. “You set yourself up for failure
on purpose so you can tell yourself you never had a chance when you’re
disappointed.”
“Thanks, Dr. Nick. What about you? You have enough baggage to fill
an entire airport.”
He grinned again, revealing boyish dimples. “You’re so cute when
you’re mad at me.”
“Oh wow,” she said. “That’s not problematic.”
“I’m not the one who’s trying to be perfect,” he informed her dryly.
“I’m allowed to have flaws.”
“Oh my god.” She gave him a shove. “How are you this annoying?”
“Because I didn’t have you to put me in my place.”
Jay smiled reluctantly and his eyes lit with triumph.
As they walked back to the lot, Nicholas pointed out some wild
cucumber and even though she knew he was manipulating her, turning up
that charm full blast—that he didn’t really care about what the plant was—
she decided to pretend that he did. She told him the name and that it wasn’t
edible, and he grinned predictably when she added that it was sometimes
called “manroot.”
He never used to smile, she thought wistfully, watching him. He was
always so angry.
That was his flaw, she realized. She was terrified of disappointing
people; Nicholas had decided that everyone else had already disappointed
him.
They were two sides of the same fucked-up coin.
More people were on the trail now, including families. She heard the
distant whoop and scream of kids, followed by the lower warning shouts of
their parents not to stray too far. The parking lot was full to bursting and Jay
hoped that none of those other hikers had been close enough to hear them
on the trail, when Nick had been talking about father’s day and good sex.
A car slowed, noticing them approaching Nicholas’s Tesla. The lot had
filled up while they were gone. Nicholas squeezed between a silver
Mercedes parked beside them to open the door for her, waiting for her to
slide fully into her seat before closing it again.
Like a gentleman, she thought, except that he wasn’t.
And she was starting not to mind.

Jay couldn’t remember the last time she’d been inside a church but this
one was filled with sprays of white flowers. The cloying scent of them was
like drowning in perfume, and as Jay walked slowly up the aisle, she could
feel herself becoming sick with dread.
This is supposed to be the happiest day of your life, a voice whispered
as she stared unseeingly into the amorphous sea of faces watching her walk
down the aisle. You’ll never be alone again, now.
She was wearing the dress her mother had gotten married in: a sequincovered monstrosity that revealed more than it concealed, just barely
clinging to her shoulders. Like mother, like daughter, she thought. Even the
diamonds around her throat looked garish being paired with them, but they
were real. She recognized them. They had belonged to Nick’s mother and
during that benefit gala for sick children, she had worn both the necklace
and the bracelets.
Now, they were hers.
Unwilling to look at her new husband just yet, her eyes swept over the
church. It was Our Lady of Perpetual Grace, the Catholic church in
Hollybook that none of them had ever attended. The stained glass was
blinding in the sunlight, aggressively colorful even, and Jay, looking closely
at some of the painted statues of the saints, noted both the flaking gilt and
their blank, dead eyes.
“You may now kiss the bride,” said the priest, and her new husband
lifted her veil.
Jay looked up, just as she caught a whiff of heavy, familiar cologne,
and a hint of rot that not even the flowers could conceal—and let out a
terrified scream when she found herself looking into Damon’s cold eyes,
icy gray, but with a whitish glaze that could only come from death.
“Be a good girl,” her stepfather said, in his son’s deep, resonant voice,
“and give Daddy a kiss.”
Jay shot up with a gasp, looking wildly around the room. Gone were
the stone floors and varicolored lights. Greenish-grey light filtered in
through her voile curtains, making the faded sunflowers stenciled on her
walls shimmer. She straightened her tank top with a shudder.
It was just a dream, she told herself. It’s not real.
But thirteen years ago, it could have been.
Still trembling, Jay got dressed for work in a sensible A-line and a
backless embroidered blouse. As she pushed her arms through the sleeves,
she tried to shake off the filaments of nightmare still clinging to her skin
like a spider’s web.
On the other side of the door, she heard Nicholas’s heavy tread. That
man was like a bull, the way he charged up and down the stairs. Unlike her,
he’d never had anything to fear in this house.
Despite the tightness in her throat, she still smiled a little when she
walked into the kitchen and saw the sprinkle jar out with the butter.
Nicholas was hovering over the toaster, in slate-grey slacks and a black shirt
he hadn’t bothered to do up. She saw him stretch, almost like he was posing
for her, and her mouth went dry as she watched his abdominal muscles flex.
“Nicholas.”
He looked at her, and both of them startled a little when the toast
popped. He recovered quickly, giving her a slow, sexy smile as he picked up
the bread and dropped it on a plate.
“You’re up early. You must have slept well.”
“No. I had a nightmare.”
Her voice broke into a sob on the third syllable. Shit—she turned away
from him but not fast enough. He set the plate down to reach for her, and
Jay surged forward, burying her face against the solid wall of his chest, and
letting the crisp dark hair scrape against her cheek. The smell of him was so
familiar. She’d never been able to eat or even look at a piece of grapefruit in
the nine years she’d been away, but now, the sweet bitterness was like a
tranquilizer in her blood.
“Daddy,” she said raggedly. “Hold me. Please.”
Above her head, she heard his sudden intake of breath. Then his arms
folded his arms around her, squeezing so tightly that it nearly hurt.
He’s bad at hugging, was her distant thought, which made her sad, for
him and for herself. With a small sound, she pressed harder against him,
locking her hands over the small of his back, and pressing her mouth to the
base of his throat, until his arms loosened reflexively and she felt his deep
sigh as his palm smoothed down her spine.
“You’re safe now,” he murmured, and a small corner of her whispered,
yes.
“Your bread is getting cold.”
“I don’t care.” He petted her hair. “I can always make more.”
Jay pressed her hand against his chest once, lingeringly, before
reaching down to do up his shirt as she took a single step back. The emotion
welling in her throat was so thick she couldn’t speak around it, and her
fingers were trembling so badly that she almost couldn’t fasten his buttons.
(I want you to feel safe with me)
He kept one arm around her. She could sense his concern as his fingers
continued lightly stroking her spine. “Are you all right?”
No. I’ve fallen in love with you.
“Blue jay?”
She had flinched, startled by the blistering salience of that thought. So
this was how he would do it. This was how he would cage her. Not with
violence, but by her own betrayal of herself.
“Jay, what’s wrong? Why are you crying?”
Tears had filled her eyes, as if he had summoned them there, and she
pulled away so he wouldn’t feel her shaking. “I’m so afraid,” she gasped.
“I’m so afraid . . . that you’ll become your dad.” I’m so afraid that you’ll
hurt me if I let myself love you.
He flinched. “What?”
“I dreamed I was my mom—” She swallowed hard. “M-marrying your
dad. But he had your voice when he—” She broke off. “When he said—”
(Good girl)
Jay turned bleak eyes on Nicholas. “I couldn’t stop him.”
I can’t stop you.
He took her hands from his shirt, holding her at length, and the strength
in his hands and the look in his eyes left her unsure as to whether she
wanted to melt into him or run. “It’s not real.”
She stared up at him bleakly, letting her shoulders sink beneath the
unrelenting weight of his gaze. Her mouth still burned where she had kissed
him, and she could still feel the imprint of his heart against her cheek. “You
don’t get it,” she said. “That’s okay.”
His frown deepened. “Jay—”
“No. It’s okay. Like you said, it isn’t real. It was a stupid thing to get
upset about.”
“Don’t talk about yourself like that,” he said harshly. “I don’t think it’s
stupid. I just don’t understand what it is you’re trying to tell me. I’m not my
father, Jay.”
“I know.” She folded her arms. “I don’t want to talk about it anymore.”
“Fine.” Nicholas turned back to the counter and scraped butter over his
now-cold toast, before propping a hip against the counter to eat it. Crumbs
and sprinkles fell in a shower as he tore into it with a viciousness that went
beyond hunger. He was angry.
Jay steeped herself a mug of tea and tried not to let her misery show on
her face.
He didn’t say much to her after that. But that was no surprise. He
insisted she was perfect like a man who wanted his device to be top of the
line.
But everything falls apart.
Jay looked out the window, studying the downtown area, and the buds
on the leaves. The hand on her thigh startled her and so did the look on his
face when he hit the brakes at the red light.
“I want you to come to me.”
To his bed, she thought he meant, and sharp words of denial were
already forming on her tongue that he could be so callous when she was so
fragile. “You—”
“When you have nightmares,” he clarified. “Come to my room and
wake me. I sleep with my door unlocked—” She winced at that. “Any
problem you have, Jay, I can make it better.”
Fiddling with the clasp of her purse, she said, “But what if you can’t?”
“I make it worse.” He tweaked her nose. “And then you forget about
it.”
He smiled at her and she found herself helplessly returning it, despite
telling herself that she wouldn’t fall prey to his charm.
You arrogant, frustrating, beautiful man. How dare you make me fall in
love you.
She was doomed. He had trapped her, swinging the cage door shut the
moment her guard was down, just like she’d been afraid he would. And
when her heart inevitably broke like the clasp of her sad, worn-out purse,
she really would be ruined. There would be no walking away from this.
She craved him like she had craved nothing else.
“I’ll come to you,” she said, and the light changed, so all he said was,
“Good.”
But he put his hand back on her leg, and as his thumb traced the border
between silk and skin, she could feel her resolve crumbling faster and
faster, like cheap concrete breaking under pressure.
She had thought work would be a distraction but there was a tension in
the office that she could feel immediately. People seemed agitated, and
there were more whispers than usual. That perpetual knot of anxiety in her
chest expanded painfully, tightening. Nobody was looking at her, so
possibly it wasn’t about her, and as she returned the usual litany of smiles
and greetings in the kitchen, she didn’t detect anything different in the way
people were speaking to her, either.
Granola bar in hand, Jay sat down in front of her computer and let out a
controlled breath, aware of Annica beside her. Nothing new from that
department, either.
She watched her emails scroll in as she took her phone out of her purse
to sign in through the 2Factor system. Then she sat up, as one of the subject
lines caught her eye.
The open VP position had been formally announced at last.
That’s what this was. She nearly cried in relief. It had nothing to do
with her at all, people were just excited about the role that she had known
about for days, thanks to Nicholas. He had been so casual in his delivery
that she was surprised to find that it was such a big deal.
All day, she heard speculations about who would get it, versus who
deserved it. Some people were blatantly careless about their opinions and
how loudly they spoke them. Jay noticed that, despite the many names put
forth as possible candidates, hers was one that never came up at all.
And why would it? that voice in her head whispered. You’re nobody.
You’re your stepbrother’s little whore. If they talk about you at all, that’s
what they’re going to talk about.
Another email popped up on her screen. Arthur and Nicholas would be
interviewing any candidates who expressed an interest in the VP role within
the coming weeks. If someone wanted to apply, they would need to talk to
their manager before emailing either of them to move forward.
Do I need to email you to apply? she asked Arthur.
His response was immediate.
No, Jay. :-)
She glanced up at Nicholas, who was staring intently at his computer
screen. Obviously busy, or he’d be off in a meeting somewhere or bothering
her. Maybe he was bothering Annica. Her seatmate had been typing away at
her keyboard all morning. At one point, she’d even stepped away from her
desk to take a phone call, which was a surprise.
Jay decided to get herself a coffee. The caffeine wouldn’t help her
anxiety but it was balmy outside and the walk across the palm-lined street
might clear her head. Better than sitting idle at her desk and pining after
Nicholas like a foolish schoolgirl.
The relentless sun almost made it too hot for sweater weather but the
back of her blouse was revealing enough that Jay didn’t want to take it off,
fearing catcalls. She had forgotten how warm it got down here.
Temperatures really didn’t fluctuate that much, this close to the water. In
high school, she and her friends had spent most Friday nights having
bonfires on the beach, toasting marshmallows and drinking alcohol that
someone’s older sister or brother had procured.
As the sun melted on the horizon, they’d loudly declare their summer
plans and sometimes even their adult ones. Most of them wanted to leave
when they graduated, at least for a little while, because even a gilded
paradise like Hollybrook could still be a cage. They talked about the houses
they planned to own, the future spouses they’d marry: all of it had boiled
down to a restless desire for more, to create their own little empire, to be
just like their parents.
Jay straightened her blouse, making sure it was still tucked into the
waistband of her skirt. She caught a glimpse of herself in the mirrored wall
of a building—cute little secretary—and flinched.
Stop that.
She steeled herself and walked into the same indie café from before,
studying the patrons in a quick sweep. Except for a few well-dressed
businessmen who had come here to work, the café was mostly empty. The
only guy who didn’t quite fit the demo was a younger man, and he was
sitting by the door with his face turned away. Her eyes lingered on him for a
beat before she headed up to the register. All that mattered was, none of the
clientele today were Tweed Creep.
“Oh hey,” the barista said. “You were the sprinkle chick, weren’t you?
How was it?”
“Oh! Yes, I was but it wasn’t for me. It was for, a, uh, friend. He really
liked it.” Liked it so much he thanked you for it on his knees when you got
home and called you a dirty little tease. Jay swallowed hard, eyes skittering
over the menu. “I’ll just have an oat milk latte today. For Jay.”
In her periphery, she saw the young guy shift in his seat. Jay turned her
back on him, arms folded as she waited for her coffee. She was so on edge
that she didn’t even notice the vibration of her phone, and when she saw it
was her mother, she groaned and swiped “decline.”
Jay didn’t want to hear her mother’s self-serving apologies. They
always turned into recriminations, anyway. God, if she had tried to bargain
with Nick, he was going to kill her.
She could still remember the anger on his face when he’d come to her
apartment.
That was not the face of a man who wanted to bargain.
“Oat milk latte for Jay!”
“Thanks.” She took the coffee cup and turned to the door, only to find
that the youngish guy was now getting to his feet.
“Justine?”
She stiffened, looking at him cautiously. He was less young than she
thought; the gelled hair made him look younger in profile but he was
actually closer to Nicholas’s age, though not nearly so well-preserved. She
stared at him longer than was probably polite, trying to understand why the
pinched planes of his face looked so familiar.
And then it hit her. “. . . Jake?”
“You remember me.” He sounded so pleased that she immediately
wished that she hadn’t. Nicholas’s weaselly little friend, the one who had
squatted at their house all the time and stared at her whenever she was in
the room. He’d been the first one to throw the rock at the cat that day, too.
Probably, she thought uncharitably, because he had thought it would
impress Nick.
Jake’s smarmy smile faded when she didn’t smile back, and a darker,
almost defiant expression gleamed in his eyes when her gaze dipped to her
throat.
“So the rumors are true. You really did come back.”
“Yes,” she said stiffly. “I got a new job.”
“Well, lucky you, having a swank family home to return to. Not to
mention a booming family business.” He paused to scratch his nose. “I
suppose that means Nick’s forgiven you.”
He must have seen the newspaper, too. “It’s been nine years.”
“So? Nobody can hold a grudge like Nick. Hell, he’ll fuck with you for
fun, just to show you he can. Just like his dad used to do with his investors.
He learned that from his old man.”
This was a little too close to the truth and it made Jay’s jaw clench.
“He’s different now.”
“Not that different. You ruined his father’s name, turned it into dirt. He
should hate you.” Like I do hovered unspoken in the air, and Jay realized
with a chill that of course, Jake would hate her if he thought she was the
reason that he’d lost his ‘in’ with Nick. “Instead, he’s opening his house to
you and inviting you out to fucking black-tie parties? What the fuck?”
Jay drew herself up taller, and noticed that Jake was actually an inch or
two shorter than she was. She saw the exact moment when he noticed this,
too. “Did you ever think that maybe Nick didn’t approve of the scandal? He
testified against his father. Provided evidence.”
And he hadn’t even told her about the rest—that he’d defended her
name, her reputation. Quentin had been the one to bring that up, and
Nicholas was not the sort of person to suffer a good deed in silence, but he
had never tried to leverage any of that with her.
Never, she realized. Even when it could have helped him.
“Oh, that’s right, I remember. They made out like he was some kind of
saint for doing the bare minimum. That he was so brave.” Jake’s lip curled.
“But you and I both know that he never really gave a shit about anyone.
Except for you.”
Scalding pain burst like hot fireworks on the backs of her knuckles.
She’d squeezed her cup so hard that the coffee had spurted out of the lid,
burning her hands. “Shit,” she hissed.
Jake watched her shrug out of her sweater, watched her set her cup
down on the counter and grope for napkins. He made no move to help as
she got to her knees to mop up the floor, and when she looked up, she didn’t
like the look on his face when she realized he was staring at her back.
“I guess it does make sense, in a way. You two were always close.”
An ominous sense of dread dripped down her spine.
“Anyway, it was good seeing you. I’m sure I’ll be seeing a lot more of
you soon now that you’re back in town.” Fat chance of that, creep. “Tell
Nick I said hello.”
With a final smile, he swaggered to the door like he thought he’d won.
A bell signaled his departure.
Jay waited until he was out of sight before grabbing her ruined sweater
and what remained of her drink and hurrying out of the café. Her skin was
crawling. A man shouted something at her from out the window of his car,
but she barely noticed. Damon used to look at me like that, she thought, her
skin going clammy. Right before he—
No. No, she wouldn’t think about that.
But this was just a taste of what awaited her if she did accept
Nicholas’s proposal. Beyond the exquisite agony they brought out in one
another, there was the judgement of the town to consider. The contempt and
disgust would be bad enough but the sly, leering glances from men like Jake
would be worse, because she would know what they were thinking. She
would know and she—
Jay gripped the doorhandle to Beaucroft Assets and yanked it, letting
herself into the building.
For a man who had grown up with so little physical affection in the
home, Nicholas was very handsy. When he stood behind her while she was
cooking, he would sometimes lay a hand on her waist as he asked about the
ingredients or pestered her for a taste. If he passed her in the hall or she was
getting in or out of his car, it wasn’t uncommon for him to catch her by the
chin and pull her in for a kiss that left her feeling dizzy.
Too many times, she had stumbled into her bedroom after one of his
kisses and finished herself off until she was squeezing her eyelids so tightly
shut that she saw the burst of phosphenes, wondering what cruel god had
forced them together only to watch them repel with the violence of two
opposing poles.
Jay dropped into her seat like a lead weight, exhausted by the
exchange. Her cooling coffee sat beside her like a stark reminder.
Her phone buzzed. That’s your third coffee break. I believe the
employee manual says that you can have two.
Jay pursed her lips. After their charged interaction in the kitchen that
morning, she wondered if this was his attempt to bring things back to
normal.
Finished torturing your clients already? It’s not even 3.
He sent her three devil emojis. I’d rather torture you.
I’m sure you can think of something else to do at your desk, Nicholas.
That was a mistake. Her phone began vibrating incessantly as the
screen filled with bird, eggplant, and sweat droplet emojis. She glared up at
the mezzanine, where Nicholas appeared to be propping his fist against his
mouth in an attempt not to burst into laughter.
You are such a child.
Come teach me a lesson then.
By the way, I ran into one of your old friends in the coffee shop.
In the corner of her eye, she saw him sit up. Which one
Jake. He said to tell you hello.
Van Hoff?
Yes.
Three dots appeared. Then disappeared.
He didn’t write back again and the remaining hours of the day spun
themselves around her in a slow web as she tried to focus on her work.
Arthur said goodbye to her at five and the lights went off at six with an
audible hum. Jay could hear the cleaners vacuuming the conference rooms
on the opposite side of the building. Almost everyone was gone now, except
for them, her, and Nicholas.
The sound of his brogues on the stairs made her hair stand on end. She
wasn’t expecting the hand on her back and made a sound as she whirled
around in her desk chair.
He didn’t smile the way he usually did. “What did he say to you?”
“Jake? Um.” Jay glanced warily around the office.
“There’s no one else here.” There was a bite of steel in his voice. “Tell
me. Did he say something to you? Threaten you?”
“N-no, nothing like that. He just said a lot of really strange things about
your father’s trial before implying that there were rumors about us.” She
checked his face and forced herself to go on. “Did you really punch him in
the throat?”
“He told you that?”
“No.” Jay hesitated. “Someone else did. I don’t remember who.”
“I did.” At her stricken expression, he chuckled grimly. “Some rumors
are true, Jay.”
“I can’t believe you did that!”
“Yeah. I had to spend a night in jail for it. Dad posted bail. I was
supposed to apologize but I never did and my father didn’t make me.” He
flashed her a tight smile. “Can’t have the heir wasting away behind bars.”
“He said that?”
“Something like it, before calling me an embarrassment.”
That bastard. “You shouldn’t have punched him, but I don’t think
you’re an embarrassment. Far from it, in fact.” She locked her computer
and grabbed her purse, and so she did not see the way his face softened.
“But this is exactly what I was talking about. All of this happened so long
ago and people still talk about it. It’s going to be even worse if I say yes.”
“You’re going to say yes?”
His eagerness was like a knife in her heart. “I don’t know,” she lied,
lowering her eyes and keeping her hands at her sides so she wouldn’t touch
the ring burning like a drop of cold fire beneath her clothes. “Why did you
punch Jake?”
“Because of what he was saying about you. I won’t repeat what he said,
but suffice it to say that after that incident, nobody else did, either. Not in
my hearing, anyway.”
“You must have still been angry with me,” she said hesitantly.
“I didn’t hate you.” Nicholas’s eyes cut away. “I never hated you.
Everyone just thought I did. People would tell me what they thought I
wanted to hear about you, trying to fucking ingratiate themselves with me,
using you, and it made me want to kill them.”
“Figuratively,” Jay prompted worriedly.
He glanced at her. His gaze was cold and terrible. “Not necessarily.”
They walked out of the building side by side, close enough that the
wool of his suit rubbed against her arm with every swing of his broad
shoulders. The violence that ran through him was close to the skin.
Sometimes she imagined that she felt the teeth of it. A wolf in sheep’s
clothing.
“What are you thinking, Nicholas?” she asked, shaking that disturbing
thought off. “You have the most terrifying look on your face.”
“I’m wondering if this is going to be a problem.”
“The Jake thing?”
“Yes, the ‘Jake thing.’ I ran into him myself not too long ago. I wonder
if he’s following us.”
“He’s a creep,” Jay said. “But there are a lot of creeps, and we come
from a wealthy family. That’s always going to attract the gossips and the
bottom-feeders.”
“Bottom-feeder. Yeah, that’s exactly what he is.” Nicholas unlocked his
car with a dark laugh, holding the door open for her. “But you’re more
vulnerable than I am. Nobody would ever say anything to you with my
name attached to yours.”
“It’s not the name I’m worried about. I don’t want to see the love
slowly drain out of another person’s eyes when they look at me. That’s
worse than being alone. It’s like being broken, slowly. I couldn’t stand it—”
Not from you.
He closed the door and stormed around to the other side before
buckling himself into the driver’s seat furiously. “I’m not my father. I don’t
care about keeping up appearances. I thought I made it very clear when I
punched that fucker who I was choosing when it came to you.”
“You did.” She spoke quietly.
He turned his key in the ignition. “I meant what I said earlier. I want
you to come to me. For anything. Any time.”
Come to me. How many times had he summoned her exactly that way,
expecting her to obey him? Somehow, hearing it as a request made it even
harder to bear.

Chapter Thirteen

Nicholas watched Jay stare meditatively into the darkness, her face
reflected in the dark glass window. Every time some specter from their past
popped up like a fucking jack-in-the-box, he was afraid it was going to be
the reason that she left him again.
She was like water running through his fingers. If he closed his hands
over her too forcefully, there was a distinct possibility that she might slip
past him out of reach forever.
Not wanting to broach the subject of Jake further, he said, “Where do
you want to go for dinner?”
“I don’t. I’ll cook something. We have all that food we brought back
from my apartment. I don’t want it to go bad.”
He didn’t want her cooking. Not when she seemed to think that he
wanted her as his live-in possession. “I think I can afford to lose a few
tomatoes. They’re, what, twenty cents each? Let me take you out. The guy
who owns that Afghan place wants to give you his baklava.”
“It’s not generosity if you give me more than what I want.”
“Well, I don’t cook,” he said gruffly. “I don’t expect you to do the same
for me.”
“I don’t do it because I want something in return,” said Jay. “I cook
because I like cooking. You really don’t cook? At all?”
“Not unless you count the microwave.”
“What did you do in college?”
“Ate in the dining commons like a normal person.”
“You are not a normal person, Nicholas. Normal people don’t try to
buy people apology paintings—” he couldn’t help it, he laughed “—and
have casual prix fixe dinners on a whim because they don’t know how to
use their ovens.”
“I know how to use my oven. I use it to make pizza sometimes.”
“Oh my god,” said Jay. “Stop trying to rationalize your insane amount
of privilege.”
Nicholas hid a smile at her playful scolding as he pulled into the
driveway, knowing that she wasn’t really angry. When she was yelling at
him in earnest, her face got all flushed, and she got these three little lines
between her eyebrows. Now she just looked sexy and cross.
“I don’t like that look on your face, either,” Jay said.
“You’d like what’s in my head even less then,” he said absently as his
eyes swept across his property. The satisfaction of owning it was tinged
with the darker knowledge of what it had cost him, and how it had almost
lost him the woman sitting in the car beside him.
His mother’s flowers glowed whitely in the moonlight, filling the air
with a fragrance he could detect as soon as he had opened the car door. For
years, his father had talked about ripping out the jasmine, lilies, and roses,
and he had been forced to pretend at indifference to the matter, knowing
that if he revealed just how much that would have devastated him, his father
would have done it that much sooner.
He always destroyed what he couldn’t have, he thought, glancing
sidelong at Jay. Especially if it was beautiful.
The cross expression had left her face as she hopped up the raised
levels of the walkway with the same little skip in her step that she’d had
when she was fourteen. She had smiled more over the last couple days than
he had seen her smile at home in years.
Because she was unhappy.
Maybe he was more like his father than he thought.
Impulsively, he bent down and plucked a sprig of jasmine free. White
sap leaked out, staining his fingers. He reached over and tucked the flower
in the dark curls of Jay’s loose hair. It stuck, and she reached up to touch it
with a startled sound.
“Hey! What are you doing? What is that?”
“Jasmine. It comes alive in the dark—just like you.”
The smile on her face faded and she looked at him with solemn eyes.
“What?” he asked, defensive.
“You’re so surprising.” She said it quietly, as if she hadn’t meant to say
it aloud at all.
“In a good way?”
(Stop begging for her approval like the fucking dog)
Jay lowered her hand, leaving the flower in her hair. The white petals
were striking against her dark curls. He didn’t dare breathe, afraid that the
wrong response would send her running.
“In an I-forgot-how-charming-you-can-be-way.” She touched his
cheek, thumbing the corner of his mouth, before ducking her head in
apparent embarrassment. As she stepped aside to let him unlock the front
door, he noticed her cheeks were flushed. “I’ll go start dinner.”
Nicholas felt almost short of breath as he headed up the stairs to his
room, his face still tingling where she had touched it. Ignoring the doubts in
his head, he changed into a pair of worn gray sweatpants and a white
wifebeater, hoping he hadn’t imagined the longing in her eyes.
Jay was standing over the stove when he came back downstairs,
frowning into the pot as she added a powdery yellow spice from a jar. She
was still wearing her work clothes, though she had kicked off her shoes.
The open back of her blouse revealed a generous expanse of bare skin. He’d
put his tongue to that dark beauty mark on her left shoulder blade more than
once while taking her from behind. It always made her shiver. Sometimes, it
made her moan.
He wanted to spend the rest of his life taking his time with her, finding
out what other things could wrest little shivers and pleasure-sounds from
her.
He wanted her to say yes.
“Can I help?”
Jay jumped, her fingers tightening on the ladle in her hand. She looked
at him, and then away, where she gestured to a pile of carrots on the cutting
board.
“You can chop those carrots for the curry.”
He grabbed one of his good Japanese knives.
She winced, watching him hack the top off the biggest one with a
flourish. “It’s not an execution. Here—” She left the ladle in the steaming
concoction to take the knife from him, rocking the blade back and forth to
slice off several neat and even pieces. “Make them nice and thin, like this.
It’s a gentle back and forth motion.”
“I know how to cut vegetables, Jay.”
“You’re just holding it awfully close to your f—”
“Jay. Stop.” He took the knife back from her reluctant hand. “I know
how to—motherfucker.”
“Fingers,” she finished helplessly. “Is what I was about to say. You’re
supposed to cut away from yourself, Nick. Not towards.”
He swore again in response as drops of blood scattered on the wooden
cutting board. Jay sighed and took the knife away, giving it a rinse with
soap and hot water before setting it back on the cutting board, nudging the
carrots away from his blood.
Tearing off a piece of paper towel, she said, “Let me see what you did
to yourself.”
He gave her his hand, letting out a hiss when she gripped him by the
wrist, one thumb pressing just above his pulse point, with her other fingers
bracing against the backs of his.
“It’s not that deep,” she pronounced, bowing her head over his palm.
When a few locks of her hair slid against his bare shoulder, his groin
tightened with need. Oblivious, she the paper towel and squeezed while
looking up at him with one of her gentle half-smiles. “One time in college, I
accidentally cut myself down to the bone while slicing an avocado.
Avocado hand.”
“That’s not a thing,” he ground out, staring at their entwined hands.
“It is. Look it up.” She gave his finger a final squeeze before taking the
paper towel away. “You’ll be fine. Make sure you bandage that later,
though. And put some antibiotic on it.”
She picked up the knife.
“Are you ousting me from my own kitchen?”
Jay began to chop. Small, neat slices. It’s a gentle back and forth
motion. “It’s your house. You can do whatever you want as long as it
doesn’t involve knives.”
His cock throbbed. “I’m making the drinks then.”
“Not too strong.”
“If we’re having an evening in, I want to have some fun.”
“I’m fun without alcohol.”
“Yeah.” He splashed a generous amount of gin into two cut-crystal
tumblers. “Reading and rock collecting. You’re quite the party girl. Pass me
a lemon.”
She took one out of his crisper and began grating it.
“Seriously? You don’t trust me with the fucking grater, either?”
“No.” She dropped the zest in his hand. “You’d find a way to cut off
your finger with it.”
“Well, aren’t you bratty.” He scattered the zest into the gin before
topping it off with some elderflower tonic water he’d brought back from
France, watching the cocktail bubble. “Here, try this for me. If it makes you
fall over, it’ll be just about right for me.”
Jay pointed the knife at him. “Take your devil water and get out.”
Rolling his eyes, Nicholas set down the gin bottle. He could feel her
eyes following him as he carried the drinks out into the den and set them on
the end table. The look was not disapproving.
Humming to himself, he got to his knees and began fiddling with the
cables in the entertainment console, rearranging things in the HDMI ports
until the screen flickered to life, revealing polygonal 64-bit graphics that
looked only a little faded on the big plasma screen.
He was surprised by the wave of nostalgia it brought.
“Is that your old Nintendo?” Jay’s voice sounded from behind him. “I
can’t believe it still works.”
“It is and it does. Now sit down, blue jay. You’re going to loosen up
and have some fun with me.”
She looked down skeptically before getting to her knees one leg at a
time. While lowering herself from that awkward kneel, she handed him one
of the bowls. She had pureed the carrots into the soup and now the liquid
was a beautiful, rich orange color with a glistening sheen.
“This looks good.”
“I think it will be.” She accepted her drink from him and gave it a wary
sniff before taking a very small sip. “This tastes like you put the whole
distillery in it.”
“Good.” He picked up his controller. “That’s how it should be.”
“I feel like we’re about to get in trouble,” Jay said, laughing selfconsciously. “Eating and drinking on the white carpet. Remember how
Yelena was always so particular about the carpet? She seemed to think your
dad would skin her alive if it ever got stained.”
Nicholas glanced at her, and then casually let some of his curry tip out
onto the rug.
“Nick! Oh my god! I put turmeric in that! It’s going to stain!”
She jumped up, and he reached out to catch at her hand, giving it a
little tug. “Sit down, blue jay. It’s just a rug.”
“A stained rug.” She looked at him for a long moment before sinking
back down beside him. She looked so sweet with her skirt riding over her
knees. Now that she’d brought it up, this really did remind him of when
they were both in school, whiling away the hours until their parents came
home to ignore them in person. “Why did you do that?”
“Because it’s my rug.”
Jay shook her head. “Unbelievable.”
“Cheers,” he said, lifting up his cocktail. “To the carpet.”
She wrinkled her nose as they clinked glasses. “To getting ants.”
He clicked his tongue at her before shooting her ship out of the sky.
“Nick! I wasn’t ready.”
“Your toast was shit.”
“God, you’re so annoying.”
“You love it.”
“And manipulative.” She gave him a challenging look. “Arrogant.
Pretentious.”
“Well, that last one is more habit.” He waited for her ship to respawn
while he took a thoughtful drink. “You go to all the right schools, meet all
the people, and you don’t need to be taught good taste because good taste is
all you’re ever exposed to.”
“Nobody made you do any of that.”
“My father did,” he said quietly.
Her face shifted, undergoing several changes in sequence. When she
spoke, she sounded subdued. “You’re still haunted by him, too?”
He thought of the dark whispers in his mind whenever he’d reached
another low, or found himself pushing up against another dark wall. “You
could say that. In any case, I’m glad he’s dead. I often find myself thinking
that if he wasn’t, I might just have killed him myself.”
“You’d be in prison, Nicholas.”
Her ship exploded into a cloud of pixelated fire. “When I think about
what he did to you—what he would have done that night if I hadn’t stopped
him—”
“Nicholas.” She grabbed his arm as her ship smoldered on the screen.
Her face was worried. “Nick,” she said, softening her words. “I don’t want
you to hurt people for me.”
“I feel like I’m losing my fucking grip, Jay. First my father. Then your
mother. Now Jake—”
“I know. Believe me, I know.” She ran her hand over his bicep before
taking her hand away. “After that fight with my mother, I drank a whole
half bottle of wine. It made me sick as a dog.” She gave him a sympathetic
glance. “What is Jake doing now? Is he the sheriff, like his dad?”
Nicholas breathed out a laugh. “Him? No. Even his father thinks he’s
an embarrassment. He works for his uncle, who runs some sleazy detective
agency. The kind that photographs cheating wives for their cuck husbands,
like they’re not getting off on watching strangers fuck.”
“Wow,” Jay said. “That’s a little ironic, coming from you.”
The remark stung and he grimaced as he raised his glass, causing the
ice to clink against the side. “It’s easy to get used to seeing people through a
lens.”
“Spying on them.”
“I mostly just spied on you.”
“Reading my diary.” Jay shook her head. “Filming me. Sneaking into
my room.”
“You were so fucking beautiful. Everything came to you so easily.” He
set his glass down, the florals of the gin thickly coating his tongue. “I just
wanted a piece of you for myself.”
“You wanted me on my knees.” She gave him a harsh look that
crackled through him like static. “Everything I had, I had to work three
times as hard for—and you wanted to take that all away. And nobody
stopped you from doing it to me. Nobody stopped your father, either.”
“Poor blue jay.”
“That’s what’s wrong with this town,” Jay said. “The people here will
tell you that it’s a privilege to be able to breathe, and then they’ll sit back
and watch you be suffocated.”
“I told you that.”
“I didn’t want to believe you.” Her eyes blinked away. “But then you
made me do things I didn’t want to do, and I did.”
He picked up the controller again. “I’ve made you bitter.”
“I’m not bitter.”
“And a liar, too.”
Jay grabbed his controller, sending his ship flying wide. His eyes
widened in surprise, and then a smirk tugged at his mouth as he flipped his
wrist, so her hand was trapped beneath his when he swung to his knees,
using his weight to roll her onto her back while their ships both crashed.
Her drink tipped over right along with her and the scent of bitters and
lemon rose up from the carpet as he pinned her down by his hips, stretching
to cover her body with his.
“Daddy’s bitter little bird.” Smiling darkly, he drew his fingers
possessively down the side of her cheek while his eyes searched her face.
“You don’t want anyone to save you from me now, do you? You like being
at my mercy when I fuck you.”
“Nicholas—” She shivered. “Please . . .”
“I asked you a question.”
She wet her lips. “N-no. I . . . like it.”
He reached past her for the remote, turning the TV off. Under the black
eye of the screen, they fumbled. Her hands moved over his back and
shoulders, and he was forced to get down on one arm so she could pull the
wifebeater over his head.
“You want this.” It was not a question, but she closed her eyes and
nodded.
“Good. Because I never wanted it with anyone else.” The buttons on
her blouse were on the back, and with a grunt of frustration, he yanked at
her sleeves, until her breasts were spilling over the neck of her top in that
sheer, lacy bra. “Never.” He leaned down and kissed her through it,
breathing out heavily against the stiff bud of her nipple. “That’s why I kept
your old bed. I couldn’t get rid of the first place I ever had you.”
“Fuck,” she choked out. “That’s—so messed up.”
“I know.” He slid his hand beneath her skirt as he trailed kisses over
her ribs. “But the thing is, Jay—” he rolled her skirt up to her belly and
tugged aside her underwear, exposing her dark, glistening sex “—you’ve
always had a way of getting under my skin.”
He bent his head and fucked her with his mouth right there on the
carpet, tonguing her clit until she was bracing against the floor, her thighs
squeezing his face until his jaw ached. When he looked up at her, one of her
hands was on her breast. The other was tightly gripping her skirt, keeping it
rolled up and out of his way. “Daddy,” her hips lifted. “Daddy, please—”
The desire burning through him was violent enough to blow him apart.
As she trembled beneath his lips, he knew he’d never get her out of his
blood. It was Jay or nothing. All he had ever wanted was this. Even if it
ended up scoring him raw, he wanted this.
With a harsh exhalation, he pulled away and fumbled with a condom
before plunging inside her trembling cunt, letting his arms hit the floor on
either side of her pretty face. The first thrust made her jolt, but then he felt
her legs wrap around his hips and pull him deeper.
“You slutty girl.”
“Yes,” she panted.
“Marking me up like your property.” Her fingers bit into his back and
he groaned again. “You think clawing Daddy up is going to keep you from
getting fucked?”
“Sorry,” she gasped, and he laughed against her throat.
“Don’t apologize. Fuck me harder.”
Make me yours.
She let her head fall back into the spilled drink as she lifted her hips at
his command. He thrust deeply in response, crushing her breasts against his
bare chest as he filled her until he met resistance. “Harder,” he said,
breathless himself now. “Make me work for it.”
She kept trying to arch into him but couldn’t maintain the pace,
gripping his shoulders to brace herself as her thighs began to tremble with
the strain.
“Daddy, I can’t—” Jay collapsed on the next thrust, making her head
fall back towards the ceiling as she struggled to catch her breath. “We
ruined . . . the carpet.”
“I don’t give a fuck.” Nicholas entered her again, pinning her pelvis to
the floor with his cock, and came with a shudder, as he settled into the lush
cradle of her hips with a final, shallow rock. “Help me christen the next
one.” He traced the rise of her left breast. “Marry me.”
Jay shook her head.
“Marry me,” he repeated. Still inside her, he reached down to unfasten
the chain at her throat, pulling the little ring free from her cleavage even as
she tried to grasp it from him. Unable to resist teasing her, he dangled it
over her face, letting the ring bounce off the edge of her nose.
“Do you love me?”
Her chest hitched. “Yes, but—”
“But what?”
“I’m scared.” Tears sparkled in her eyes. “Everyone leaves me because
I’m not good enough.”
“That’s bullshit and you know it,” he snarled. “I’ve always loved you.”
“Yes. Everyone says that . . . right before they go away.”
“I’m not going to leave you, Jay.” His chest fell heavily against hers,
and she stared up at him, her eyes wide. “I would never leave you. You’re
mine. You have always been mine. But you have to trust me long enough to
prove it to you.”
Jay let out a stuttering breath, more tears sliding down her wet face.
“But I’m so scared.”
“But can you do that? Can you trust me?” he demanded, thumbing the
tears from one of her sharp cheekbones. When her eyes skated to the side,
he let his hand drift to her shoulder, tugging the dangling straps of her bra
back into place. “Tell me things aren’t that broken between us.”
“I’m tired of fighting you, Nick,” she said wearily. “I can’t resist you
anymore.”
He looked down at the beautiful woman beneath him, bent in surrender,
and his conscience twisted. Gently, he cupped her face. “Are you always
going to call me Nick?”
“I can’t help it.” He felt the movement inside and out when she freed
up an arm to stroke his jaw. “You’ll always be my Nick.”
My Nick. It felt like his chest was caught in a vise.
“I can be your Nick.” He took her hand from his face and slipped the
ring on her finger. It fit perfectly. “Say yes,” he urged, folding his fingers
over hers. “And I will be.”
Jay closed her eyes and he felt his heart clench.
“Okay,” she whispered. “Yes.”

When Jay was younger, she had thought about her wedding like any
other girl, but every template for marriage she’d ever seen had either been
disastrous, like her mother’s, or had a hard, sterile stop after the “I do,” like
one of those children’s fairytales.
Nobody had ever told her what should come next after the happilyever-after. She only knew what failure looked like, and had felt the brutal
sting of its loveless lash as her parents’ marriage disintegrated. Relegated to
the role of spectator, she had watched the matches play out as cold silences
and shouted arguments, punctuated by broken plates and late-night
rendezvous. Both her mother and Damon were far too proud and cruel to
ever let the other leave unscathed, even if it meant that their own children
would end up as the casualties. Which they had. Over and over.
What would happen when she and Nicholas inevitably fought? Because
they would. They were like oil and water—if the oil was ablaze and the
water was frozen. Would he mock her, trap her in a cage of her own words?
Or would he follow his father’s teachings and allow himself to become
poisoned by the hate he claimed to deny as she inevitably failed to meet his
expectations and fled from his taunting?
For years, her resistance had become a steel bar that she could support
herself against when everything else was crumbling down. If she didn’t
need anyone, it wouldn’t matter if she ended up alone. If she didn’t let
herself love anyone, it wouldn’t hurt when they left. But now that bar had
been yanked away and Jay could feel herself falling into the cold dark void
it had left behind, and for the first time in her life, she had to trust that
somebody would catch her.
(You need someone to take care of you)
God, it terrified her. It had been so long since she had been in a
relationship with anyone, and none of those had ever made her feel the tide
of overwhelming sensations that threatened to take over whenever they
were together. It left her feeling desperate—to run, hide, both, either. She
wasn’t sure. She had tried both and been run to ground by his tireless,
maddening pursuit of her.
The lines that were beginning to form on his face suggested that he was
as exhausted by it all as she was. Far from being the carefree playboy she’d
imagined he had become in her absence by living large on his father’s
money, Nicholas ran his company with the defiant stoicism of a captain
manning a sinking ship.
Not that he was saint—he had his father’s cold patrician arrogance and
could be so hot-tempered that he was nearly bratty. But in the years that she
had been away, Nicholas had become an adult in a way that she had not.
And she was so fucking lonely.
Nicholas wanted to celebrate their upcoming nuptials by taking her out
to dinner. He didn’t call it a celebration but she knew it was one because
this time they didn’t go to Accia; they went to the Bayview, which had a
very expensive wine bar with a view of the ocean.
Hitting up all the old haunts, she thought, wondering if Nicholas knew
that despite its quiet elegance, the Bayview was notorious for being the
place where men brought their mistresses.
At least I fit the dress code, she thought, pulling down her strappy black
dress. She felt ridiculous in it—her mother would say she looked like a
“size fourteen sausage in a size ten casing”—but when Nicholas saw her
wearing it, he had nearly walked into the wall.
“My fucking god,” he said, fisting his keys. “Come here. Now.”
(“Tell me I’m yours”)
A maître d’ walked them to a booth by the plush bar of Quentin’s
father’s hotel. Or maybe it was his hotel now. She caught a glimpse of
Quentin himself, dressed in a tailored suit and giving orders to a handful of
staff as he no-doubt instructed them on how to handle the pre-dinner rush.
Jay looked away before their eyes could meet but thought she saw him
do a double-take in her periphery. He was pushy enough that he would take
a single look as invitation to come over, so she kept her eyes on her water
glass. But when a complimentary bottle of wine arrived at their table that
Nicholas denied ordering, Jay knew who it was really from.
It angered her. Did everyone think she was so cheap to buy?
“One More Night” by Saleka was playing from some hidden speaker,
the low, sultry music adding to the seductive atmosphere. Anxiety
heightened her senses, making her aware of everything from the smells of
cooking spices to the slight current of displaced air against all the skin
exposed by her “punishment dress” every time someone passed by their
table.
Nicholas took his napkin and covered the cork, twisting until the bottle
opened with a muffled pop. “Was Quentin the one who told you about
Jake?”
Jay looked at him so sharply that her earrings shivered. “He was.”
Taking the bottle from him, she poured them each a frothing glass, as a
waiter raced over in a panic, trying to help her pour. “We’re fine, thank
you,” she said, and then felt her mouth harden when his eyes flicked
involuntarily to the low neck of her dress. “He mentioned you invested
money in this hotel.”
“Very opportunistic of him.” Nicholas leaned back in his seat as he
watched the flow of pale liquid, his eyes a deep slate in the low lights of the
bar. “I wonder if he’s kissing up to me or you.”
“You, probably.” She handed him his glass and a spark shot up her
wrist when their fingers brushed. “He made it very clear where his priorities
lay when we last spoke.”
“He took you for granted then. Just like all your other friends.” He
raised the glass to his lips, causing his dinner jacket to fold open. He was
the only man in the establishment who wasn’t wearing a tie and he outshone
them all with his dark elegance. “It’s pathetic how quickly they’ve all come
crawling back, isn’t it?”
“If you dislike it that much,” Jay said, filling her own glass, “why are
you here?”
“I never said I disliked it. But you do. Is that why you pushed him
away? I always wondered. He looked at you like he wanted to add you to
his collection of expensive, pretty things. In another life, it could have been
you up there. The charming brochure-ready hotelier’s wife.”
Jay grimaced. “I don’t want to talk about Quentin anymore.”
“Then let’s talk about you.”
“What about me?”
“Well, we could talk about our engagement.” He studied her in the low
lights. “Or we could discuss how beautiful you look in your slutty new
dress—and how distracting it is, when you fidget like that.”
Jay realized, when she saw his eyes go pointedly to her shoulder, that
she was unconsciously fingering one of the straps. It was the one he’d
shown her on his phone before he took her out to lunch at Accia, and was
every bit as low-cut as he’d threatened. The structured fit made it look like
she was about to spill out of her dress.
Expensive, pretty things.
Jay lowered both hands to her lap, resisting the urge to cover herself.
“I’m not used to dressing up.”
“You mean, you’re not used to people looking at you when you let
yourself look beautiful.”
“Don’t do that. Don’t analyze me, the way you do everything else. It
makes me feel like one of your stock portfolios.”
“I just think it’s a shame. I bet those polite little cuckholds you dated
thought so, too. When you walk into a room, you outshine everyone in it.
But you always tried to dim your own light by hiding yourself away.”
Jay took a generous swallow of champagne. The bubbles stung her
nose and she wrinkled it, feeling an unexpected flare of defiance that
flickered through her like a candle. “Sometimes I don’t want to be looked
at,” she said heatedly. “I didn’t ask to look like this.”
“Like an angel of sin?” Nicholas leaned back against the booth and the
buttons on his shirt strained with the movement. “That’s what you always
looked like to me.”
“At least I don’t make people cry on purpose,” she said childishly.
“No, you just choose not to see how you affect people. I’d call it cruel
if I thought you had it in you. But it honestly seems like you just really
don’t want to see it.”
“You did call me cruel,” she reminded him. “And if I am, I learned it
from you.”
“Then you learned from the master.” He picked his wine up again,
thoughtful. “I’ll tell you a secret, though. Sometimes, I don’t mean to be
cruel. I just don’t care enough not to be.”
“You could pretend. It might even start to feel real if you do.”
“It doesn’t seem worth the effort—my caring. At work, I get paid either
way, regardless of whose feelings I end up hurting. In these circles, a bit of
emotional bloodbath is a self-fueling spectacle. Entertainment.” He scoffed.
“Before you came back here, I figured I’d end up alone.”
“Oh, Nicholas.” She hated it when he was like this. She could never tell
if he was trying to paly on her sympathies or expressing genuine despair.
His mobile face offered her no clues and she didn’t want to be caught
staring, so she turned to study the opulent wallpaper with its bold peacock
print, even as it felt like her heart might shatter to pieces. “You really didn’t
think someone else would have fallen for you? With all that you have to
offer?”
“You mean I should have gotten myself a trophy wife, like my father.”
“You know that’s not what I meant. You have your charms.” She turned
to face him, breathing a sigh of relief when she saw that some of the
intensity had left his face. Even if he is pretending. “I think you like it better
when people are afraid of you.”
He toyed with his fork. “Are you afraid of me?”
“No,” she said, surprised to realize it was true. “I watched you grow up
in your father’s shadow. I saw the hold he had on you—and how you tried
to escape it. You aren’t the boy you were. I wouldn’t have had dinner with
that boy. But I am here with the man you became.”
“You don’t think I’m—” He looked up impatiently as their waiter
approached.
One glance at Nicholas’s drawn eyebrows and hard mouth made the
younger man flustered. “Shrimp tartlets for the gentleman,” he said,
grievously breaking protocol and serving Nicholas first in his eagerness to
soothe, “and baba ghanoush for the lady?”
“Yes, that’s fine, thank you,” Nicholas said, in a tone that very clearly
meant fuck off.
“Thank you,” Jay echoed after him before he could completely flee. It
was strange, she thought, giving Nciholas a chastising look. She didn’t need
to imagine what it would be like to sit across from this man at a kitchen
table for the rest of her life. Because she had already done so for years.
Unlike the other men in her life, there was no mystery.
With Nicholas, she knew exactly what she was getting.
“I don’t think you’re what?” she prompted, finding his eyes on her.
Something flickered in his face. “Cruel. Heartless. Selfish.”
“Oh. Well.” She rubbed at the back of her neck. “I think we can all be
those things.”
“Enough so that you regret saying yes to me?”
“No.” Jay leaned forward and saw a muscle in his jaw tighten. “I would
have said no if I didn’t want this. I know you love me. But you also
understand that sometimes—” her face flushed as she looked around.
“Sometimes it feels good to be disrespected in the dark.”
Nicholas half-smiled. “Your faceless stranger.”
Jay winced. “You can stop bringing that up any time.”
“What kind of wedding do you want? Not one for the society pages,
I’m assuming, since you don’t like being looked at. Did you want to get
married in a church?”
Jay poked at a chickpea, making it roll across the plate. “I don’t really
want a wedding at all.”
“That won’t be a problem,” he said, so easily that she looked up
suspiciously. “We can get a license. It will be faster. The sooner you’re
mine, the better.”
Her throat tightened. “Can we wait until the interviews are over?”
Nicholas paused with the fork raised to his mouth. “Why?”
“It wouldn’t look good for us. People would accuse me of sleeping my
way to the top.” And they wouldn’t be wrong, would they? He had only
offered her the position as a sort of sexual bargaining chip, even if it was
with the best of intentions. “They already kind of do.”
“Give me names.” His tone was grim.
“No. Please, Nick. It’s very important to me. I want people to take me
seriously. Nobody ever has, not until about three years ago. I don’t want to
lose all of that. If we’re going to enter this partnership—” she emphasized
the word “—I need to be self-sufficient.”
His eyes fell to her hand, where she was worrying the ring with her
thumb. A line in his jaw relaxed. “Whatever you need to do,” he said
carelessly. “But I’m used to a certain standard of living, and I reserve the
right to step in if your self-sufficiency isn’t up to par.”
“Step in to do what?” she asked suspiciously.
“Mostly throw money at all of your problems until they go away.” He
gave her a sideways smile. “I may have bought you a new wardrobe that
reflects your elevated role at the company. I don’t want to see my new Vice
President walking around the office with a broken handbag.”
“I suppose you already bought a scandalous wedding dress, too,” said
Jay.
“I actually thought you could wear my mother’s.” He glanced at her.
“If you want to.”
“Your father kept it?” Jay asked incredulously. “I didn’t think he was
that sentimental.”
“He wasn’t. I think he forgot about it. Otherwise he would have had it
destroyed.”
The cowed waiter came back and asked if they wanted dessert while
Jay reeled from that bombshell. Nicholas sent him away impatiently. “Just
the check.”
“He was a terrible man,” Jay said, recognizing the pain in his face.
“You’re not him.”
His eyes went to her, hopeful and uncertain. As he pulled out his black
Amex, he said, carefully, “Most people say I’m his spitting image.”
“Your coloring, maybe, but the shape of your face is different,” Jay
insisted, though she had believed the same once, when the cruelty on his
face had been more apparent. “I always imagined that you must look an
awful lot like your mother. She must have been beautiful.”
“She was.” He folded the leather case closed over his card. “I’ll show
you a picture.”
“I would love to see it.” She put her hand over his. “And I’d love to
wear her dress.”
“Good, because I—”
“Jay-Jay. Nick.” Nicholas went stiff, the expression on his face chilling
visibly as Quentin hovered over them, putting his hand on the back of Jay’s
side of the booth while the waiter cleared away what remained of their
dishes. “How are you both doing tonight? Was everything to your liking?
Don’t tell anyone but I sent over a bottle of our best champagne.”
“We noticed.” Nicholas was wearing a knife-sharp smile that was a
pale shadow of its former glory. “How’s your sister, Ho?” he asked casually,
handing the folder to the waiter.
As Jay watched Quentin react to Nicholas’s obvious contempt, she had
a vivid memory of taking Nicholas to the store as a child. They had been
doing their holiday shopping and she had wanted to go alone, but Nick,
being his usual bratty self, had appeared out of nowhere just as she was
halfway out the door. “Yelena’s not here and my dad says that you’re
supposed to watch me.”
She had recognized for the lie it was immediately. Damon had never
really told her to do anything. All of his orders had been filtered down
through the untrustworthy mouthpiece of her mother, who was about as
interested in watching them as she was in anything else.
But Jay had also known that dealing with Nick now would be easier
than dealing with Nick later, when he would be bearing a grudge after her
return alone.
“All right,” she’d sighed. “Come on, toad.”
They had gone to a thrift store downtown called Hidden Marvels
because Jay wasn’t used to having an allowance and was terrified that it
would be taken away if she overspent. “Why aren’t we going to the mall?”
Nick whined. “They have an arcade. This is where old ladies shop.”
“We’re shopping here,” Jay had said, already annoyed. “Don’t touch
anything. If you break it, you have to buy it,” she added, noticing a sign.
“I’m not going to break anything.”
Jay, recognizing the bratty tone, had not been convinced. And when he
did break something less than five minutes later, she was not at all
surprised. It had been an old glass ornament—blown antique glass. Very
expensive-looking and quite possibly irreplaceable.
Before Jay could get in an “I told you so” or reluctantly reach for her
wallet, the bratty little twelve-year-old that was her stepbrother had reached
for a tiny leather wallet she didn’t even know he had, and handed the
startled clerk three twenties. “A little extra for your trouble,” he said, in
what was clearly a stiff approximation of his father, and Jay remembered
staring at him with a stunned sort of awe, thinking, Just who the hell does
this kid think he is?
Even dressed in deliberately casual disarray while surrounded by all of
Hollybrook’s finest social climbers, it was clear who held the power here.
Quentin’s suit might have cost the same on the rock, but the fact that
Nicholas wore his so carelessly suggested a level of comfort that added to,
rather than detracted from, his arrogance.
The difference between the Nick sitting across from her and the Nick
from sixteen years ago was that this one knew exactly who he thought he
was—and now, she did, too.
“Courtney’s great,” Quentin said, seemingly oblivious to the fact that
he’d already lost this game of social calculus before it had even begun.
“She’s a doctor now. Married.”
“Are you married?”
Quentin’s face became unreadable. “No.” Turning to Jay, his smile
gained some fresh wattage. “Jay-Jay, how are you? I meant to reach out
after we talked at Just Avocados but you must have changed your number. I
was hoping we could catch up. Shoot the shit, spill the tea—just like we did
during the good old days.”
Did you, Jay thought humorlessly, aware of Nicholas’s gaze. Picking
up her champagne glass, she studied the legs of the wine, the fine spray of
bubbles. It had obviously been very expensive.
“I didn’t think we had much left to discuss,” she said. “You made
yourself very clear.”
Nicholas smiled.
The corners of Quentin’s mouth turned down even as he somehow
maintained his professional smile. “It’s been years, Jay. Can’t we forgive
and forget? You never used to stay mad at me.”
“I’m sorry, Quentin. I’m not the girl I was in high school.”
“Did you want something, Ho? Or are we done here?”
Resigned, Quentin faced Nicholas without much enthusiasm. “Michael
wanted me to pass on his thanks if I saw you. He wanted you to know that
the development is going well. Everything is signed off and ready to build.”
“I’m more interested in him holding up his side of our bargain than I
am in platitudes.” He smiled but it didn’t reach his eyes. “Thanks for the
wine.”
Quentin’s smile was now visibly forced. “With my compliments.
Thanks for patronizing the Bayview.”
“I thought you liked him,” Nicholas murmured, as Quentin walked
away.
“I used to. What was that about? What bargain do you have with
Michael?”
“Just a little business deal. Nothing for you to worry about. Our fathers
used to do business together and he wanted it to be just like old times.” He
arched his brows at her continued silence, not even bothering to hide his
obvious glee. “Wasn’t he one of your simps?”
“Quentin? Or Michael?” Jay drained her champagne, the decadence of
the waste thrilling her a little in the wake of her sudden adrenaline rush.
“I’m not the pushover everyone thinks I am, you know. He can’t buy my
forgiveness with a drink.”
“And to think you used to care so much about what they thought of
you.” His eyes were hotly admiring as he studied her over the delicate glass
that looked like it might snap in his fingers. Nearly twenty years later, Jay
thought, and he was still the small boy who gloried in the delights his own
destruction wrought. “I could ruin him, you know. With a single phone
call.”
Jay’s eyes snapped to his. “What do you mean, ruin him?”
“I mean, I can make all this—” he snapped his fingers. “Gone.”
Jay backed up against the booth. “Y-you can do that?”
He leaned forward, his dress jacket creaking as he braced one hand
near her thigh. “Why don’t you ask me and find out for yourself?”
Her throat tightened as she thought of herself nine years ago, terrified
and desperate, and Quentin’s dismissive “sorry, babe” while lying through
his teeth.
Do it, a voice whispered.
A chill slithered down her spine at the look of seductive menace on his
handsome face and she set down her glass with more force than necessary.
“N-no,” she said uneasily. “Just take me home . . . please.”
Nicholas nodded, like he’d expected nothing less, tucking the tip
beneath his plate. They walked past the still-hovering Quentin and out into
the cold night.
Jay could hear the roar of the ocean in the distance and it reminded her
of her youth with the stinging salience of salt in a wound. No matter how
hard she railed against it, this place belonged to her as much as her own
weary bones did, and she could not unknow the taste of those dark waters
any more than she could the bitterness of citrus on a man’s clean skin.
She wondered if Quentin knew how close he had come to ruin.
“Would you really have destroyed this hotel if I’d said yes?”
His lips curled into a small, private smile. “I guess you’ll never find out
with that soft heart of yours.”
As they headed down the path that would take them back to the car, Jay
impulsively tugged on Nicholas’s sleeve, nudging him down a side path. He
followed her gamely towards the beach as she stumbled a little over the
rocky shore. There was no one else there. It was off-season for bonfires and
all the hotel guests would have been safely ensconced in the warm cells of
their lamplit rooms, but as they got closer to the shoreline Jay could see the
charred remains of old bonfires from last season, made out of circles of
driftwood and cold pockets of ash.
“What are you doing?” Nicholas asked in a bemused tone, as she
shivered in her thin, low-cut dress, holding the hem down with one hand as
she felt her way across the sand in the dark. “I thought you wanted to go
home.”
He didn’t sound at all annoyed but she still felt compelled to explain. “I
just needed to get out of there. Look at that—” She pointed to the moon’s
reflection, scattered over the swells like glinting pieces of broken mirror.
“That’s a million-dollar view.”
Following her finger, he said, “That’s waterfront, blue jay. It’s closer to
ten million.”
“Oh, who cares what it costs? It doesn’t always have to be about the
money.” Jay hopped over a log, nearly losing her shoe when it got sucked
into the wet sand. “We used to come out here back in high school. To this
exact beach. We’d just bum around the sand all day, and then someone
would get food and drinks and we’d sit around the fire and talk about all the
things we wanted to be when we grew up. As if we had a choice,” she said,
some of the bitterness seeping out.
Nicholas nudged a charred piece of wood with the tip of his brogue.
Something in the detritus seemed to catch his attention because he stooped
down to pick up what appeared to be a small white stone. He rolled it in his
fingers, testing its shape. “What did you say?”
“Nothing, usually.” She folded her arms tighter as she watched his
hand. “They all said they wanted to leave here. I did, too. But talking about
it like that made me realize that when everything was over, I’d be all alone.
And then I was the only one who did leave and I was alone.”
She took a few unsteady steps to the side as the wind whipped her dress
around her legs.
“Isn’t that sad, Nick? I was surrounded by people but I was always
alone. I didn’t know how to be with people because I pushed everyone
away. I was afraid they’d leave me as soon as I stopped being enough. And
they let me do it. They let me push them away and they never asked if that
was what I really wanted. Except for you. But there was always a cost with
you.”
“Welcome to the world of business, darling.” The words were mocking
but his tone was achingly gentle. He kicked sand over the ashes. “I tried to
tell you it was a fuck or get-fucked world.”
“Were you even happy? You were trapped in that house, too.”
“You’re the one who left,” he pointed out.
“And you’re the one who stayed. You got everything you wanted.”
“We both know that that’s not true.”
He moved closer and she stopped breathing as the static tension
between them heightened until it was like a touch she could feel against her
skin.
“You were like a dreamer living in a fairytale. You thought there was
goodness in restraint. But there isn’t.” He straightened, the fabric of his
jacket rippling. “When you feed your dreams to the bonfire, you just end up
with a pile of cold dead ashes and a whole lot of nothing.”
Jay laughed humorlessly. “Says the boy who thinks he can buy his way
out of trouble with a fistful of twenties.”
“Oh, blue jay. Don’t tell me you dragged me out here just to be sad.”
She shivered again and he shrugged out of his dinner jacket. It was the one
he’d promised her he would look good in—truthfully, as it turned out. The
fabric was still warm from his body when he draped it around her
shoulders. “You should tell me your dreams instead. If you do it nicely
enough,” he pressed his wind-chilled lips to her cheek, “I might even make
them all come true.”
“You never answered my question,” said Jay. “Were you happy, Nick?”
“No.” Heedless of the fine weave of his trousers, he dropped down on
one of the half-rotted logs facing the water. It was low enough that his legs
bowed comically, nearly level with his chest. “I wasn’t happy.”
Mindful of the fabric riding high on her thighs, Jay sat down beside
him. He immediately put his arm around her waist, stretching his legs out
closer to the silent fire as he stared out at the silvery sea. Jay extended her
leg, and knocked the tip of her heel against his leather brogue.
“I wasn’t, either.”
His hand rubbed up and down her back.
“I know.”
As they sat, breathing in the silence, she felt his hand cover hers. The
dim lights of the Bayview blurred in the distance as she felt his fingers pry
open her palm. The light graze of his nails sent a pulse of heat to her
fingertips as he pressed something smooth and warm into her hand.
“You were looking for one of these, I think.”
The white object Nicholas picked up hadn’t been a stone at all. It was a
sand dollar.
She looked up at him in surprise. He was staring at her.
“I’m only happy when I’m with you,” he told her solemnly.
Jay ran a hand through his thick hair, curving her fingers to cradle his
scalp. “I had a similar thought recently.” She pulled him closer. “Right
before you cockblocked me on your sofa.”
“Sounds like something I would do.”
“Dick,” said Jay.
And with the wind tangling in their hair, and the faint scent of the dead
fires mixing with the salt of the sea spray, she closed the distance and kissed
him beneath that brilliant moon.
The sand dollar went on her desk, next to her favorite mug and a
chipped geode that was too broken to be part of her main collection but she
also couldn’t bear to throw away because the thought of all those crystals
glinting dully in a landfill made her went to cry.
She rattled the sand dollar unthinkingly sometimes while reading her
emails, until she caught Annica giving her a dirty look. Then she shut it
away in her drawer.
As she put together spreadsheets and pulled data, she found herself
thinking of Nick.
Nick and his hands. Nick and his faint aura of menace. Nick and his
devastating words.
(I’m only happy when I’m with you)
Another email had gone out that morning that Nicholas would not be
interviewing candidates for the VP position, after all. Arthur would be
carrying out the interviews alone.
“I’m trying to minimize the potential for conflict of interest,” he had
told her privately in the car that morning. “When you get the role, I don’t
want anyone saying we didn’t do this properly.”
“If I get the role,” she corrected him gently.
“Right.” He winked and tweaked her nose.
Some people were disappointed. They had been hoping for a chance to
hobnob with the CEO. But according to the chatter, this wasn’t unusual.
Nicholas often cancelled redundant meetings and he didn’t manage people
as closely as Arthur did. Numbers and fine details were his domain, and
when it came to facts, he was like a fine-tuned machine.
Jay got up for her interview stiffly, feeling very self-conscious. She had
dressed in eyelet lace and her favorite A-line skirt, not wanting to be too
obvious. Someone had asked, “Is Jay applying for the role?” while not
entirely out of earshot and the other person had responded, “No, that’s just
Mr. Hartwell’s secretary. She’s just here to take notes.”
It was only with supreme effort that she was able to walk through the
room with her shoulders relaxed and her steps unfaltering. She was an
administrative assistant, not a secretary. She had gotten a certification for
her work and she did her work well.
No more tossing my dreams into the flames, she told herself.
As she passed Nicholas’s desk, he looked up from his computer and
winked.
Her face was warm when she opened the door to the office where
Arthur was waiting. He’d gotten a new desk chair, one of the ergonomic
ones that looked like it belonged behind the console of a spaceship. “Hello,
Jay.” He leaned back comfortably. “I hear congratulations are in order.”
Her mind blanked out. “For what?”
His tawny eyebrows lifted and for a moment she thought—perversely
—that all of this interviewing had just been a farce. That despite her
repeated insistence that she wanted to do this her way, Nicholas had found a
means of just giving her the position.
But Arthur was nodding at her hand.
Her left hand.
The ring.
Oh my god. Heat suffused her face as all of the shock and anger
abruptly swirled out of her like colors down a drain. “I—yes. Nick and I . . .
we—”
“I only meant to congratulate you,” Arthur said quickly. “Not put you
on the spot.”
Jay blushed. His tone was one of someone assuring another person that
their mistake wasn’t really that bad. “We’re only stepsiblings. And we
didn’t really grow up together—”
“You don’t have to explain. Nicholas told me earlier.” Arthur looked as
uncomfortable as she felt. “It’s why he isn’t interviewing. He didn’t think it
would be seemly under the current circumstances.”
Current circumstances. Seemly. A hysterical laugh threatened to burst
from her lips at the thought of Nicholas using such uptight language.
“It’s all right. You can say it. It’s distasteful. People are going to talk.”
His face softened immediately and he moved towards her as if he
wanted to touch her before visibly changing his mind. His hand hovered a
moment before falling to his side. “I wouldn’t say that,” he said gently. “It’s
very obvious how much he cares about you.”
Was it? Jay gave him a timorous smile. “You’d be one of the rare few,
then.”
Arthur gazed thoughtfully out the window. “He never struck me as a
particularly happy man. I don’t think I even really saw him laugh until you
arrived. But now he does.” His eyes flicked to her. “I assume, because of
you.”
(when I’m with you)
“Yeah,” Jay said faintly. “He did say something like that.”
The silence stretched and Jay shuffled her feet, wondering why her skin
felt too tight on her bones. “Anyway,” Arthur said, so loudly that both of
them winced. “Let’s get on with things, shall we? You have an interview
with me today, Ms. Varens. So why don’t you go ahead and take your seat,
and we can start by having you tell me some of your strengths and
weaknesses . . .”

Chapter Fourteen

In twenty-seven years, only three things had ever managed to score him
beneath his armor: crying in the mall over his dead mother’s perfume, Jay’s
rejection the first time he told her he was in love with her, and his father
fucking laughing in his face when he’d announced his intention to propose
to her.
The two former humiliations had faded to a faint sting over time, but in
the face of his now very real and upcoming marriage, the latter loomed as
large as a ghost. His father’s voice, so close to his own in terms of pitch and
timbre, now echoed abrasively in his ears.
(How did you get her to do it?)
His hand tightened around his mug of coffee.
“Stacey is our strongest candidate so far,” Arthur was saying. “Apart
from Jun in marketing.”
Nicholas nodded, but he did not want to think about Stacey and Jun.
(I know you’ve been doing a little backyard breeding under my roof.
What do you have on your sister, Nicholas? Receipts? Photographs? Or
perhaps a tape?)
“Not Stacey,” he said, shifting restlessly. “Any power you give her,
she’ll run with.”
“Because she’s a senior level employee. You have to give people some
room to grow, Nicholas. Otherwise, it’s hard to retain talent. It’s grow or go,
in this industry. You know that.”
An image popped into his head, sharp and salient, of a teary-eyed Jay
lying in a bed of cast-off silk, begging him to let her go. He made a harsh
noise in the back of his throat.
“No.”
Arthur pushed his computer aside, rubbing at his graying temples. He’d
been interviewing candidates for several hours and it must have been
exhausting but he didn’t care. Everyone had a reason for why they deserved
better, but only one person here had been forced to suffer for it.
“What about Jun then? His managing style is a little less abrasive. And
he has a coordinator role, so he’d be ideal at running those meetings.”
(Is that it? Did you film yourself fucking her? Did you make her cry?
Do you really think she’ll love you now?)
“No,” Nicholas said again. He stood up and began to pace. “Not Jun.”
Arthur let out a rough breath. “We have to agree on somebody.”
“How did Jay’s interview go?” he asked abruptly.
The lines on Arthur’s face seemed to sag; it was as if invisible strings
holding his face in that usual good-natured state had all been cut. He’s been
waiting for this, Nicholas thought, watching him through narrowed eyes. He
knew I’d ask and he doesn’t like it.
“She’s a very bright and talented young woman who doesn’t have
much experience. And if we were to give her the role, it would be hard to
create a story that doesn’t smack of nepotism.”
(Give me the evidence and I’ll clean up your mistakes)
Nicholas shook his head. “I can’t. But you can. It’s your job to create
the stories, Hartwell. I’ve wiped my hands clean of it.”
“Have you?” Arthur asked mildly. “Then why are we even having this
conversation?”
Nicholas turned towards the tinted glass windows that looked out at the
people buzzing like ants below the mezzanine. All of them were under his
employe, which ostensibly meant that they had to do what he ordered them
to. But he had been letting the system run on its own momentum for so long
that he had never really put that to the test.
Five years ago, they had called him a wunderkind. He’d found the idea
of that a little insulting, even though the attention had brought in cash flow
and fresh talent, and youth had allowed him to cruelly surprise some wouldbe opportunists. Little games of loyalty had been more his father’s domain,
because unlike his father, he didn’t need their fear or admiration.
As Nicholas looked down at those unsuspecting white-collar hipsters,
with their Uniqlo button-downs and Lodis bags, he felt a wave of scorn.
They look entirely too comfortable.
It made him understand for the first time why his father might have
indulged in the games he had. Nobody was calling him anything except for
favors, and now here he was, being told no.
“I’ve never seen anyone work as hard as she does, and get so little back
for it.” He folded his arms behind his back as he spun away from the
window. “I don’t want that to happen to her here.”
“Jay is an incredible woman,” Arthur agreed. “But she does lack
experience.”
“Pick whoever you think best then.” He gave a sardonic, insincere
smile. “I know you’ll make the right call. That’s why I promoted you.”
It sounded like a threat even to his own ears. Perhaps it was.
Served Hartwell right.
His CFO’s disapproval followed him all the way back to his desk. What
did he expect, though? When he’d casually announced his engagement to
Jay the other day, the first thing that man said after he’d recollected himself
was, “Congratulations. You’re a lucky man. Have you notified HR?”
Always by the book, he thought. Which was what Jay wanted.
But no matter how properly they conducted themselves, some people
would insist that this went beyond decorum. They hadn’t lived those nine
empty, soulless years—but he had. Every day, for over three thousand days,
he had endured the chafe of his own sharp edges until he felt like he might
bleed out from the continual abrasion of his own wicked soul.
It wasn’t just that Jay made him happy when he was around her. She
made him feel at home in his own skin.
On the ride home she kept glancing over at him worriedly. She had her
legs crossed in that fitted black skirt, making it ride up high enough to make
it clear that she was wearing tights instead of stockings, and the flashes of
skin beneath her white eyelet blouse were giving him ideas.
“Are you okay?” she asked hesitantly, raising her voice to be heard
over the music.
“I’m fine,” he said gruffly, and then paused. “I’m not angry with you.”
“Do you want to hear about my interview?”
He lowered the volume dial. “I thought that was a conflict of interest.”
“Well.” She gave him a wry look. “You’ll just ask Arthur, anyway,
right?”
Her tone was light but thinking about Arthur made his mood darken
further. But when her smile dimmed, he managed, with effort, to shove
some of that irritation away.
“Tell me about your interview, blue jay.”
Nicholas let his mind drift as she described the questions she’d been
asked and how she’d responded. He already knew all of that anyway, since
he and Arthur had been discussing candidates, but the sound of her voice
soothed him, and her cautious optimism was endearing.
Fuck Hartwell, he thought, looking at the hopeful smile on her face.
Soon Jay would be his wife. After the interviews, which he needed to
go well. Then she would be his. He watched her so intently at dinner trying
to see her through that lens that he could tell it made her nervous from the
way she began to falter.
“Nick?”
“Your glass is almost empty.” He picked up the bottle. “Do you want
more wine?”
“Are you trying to get me drunk?” she scolded, half-seriously.
“No.” He only filled her glass halfway, mentally calculating how long
it would take her to sober up. “I just like seeing you enjoy yourself.”
“You do have very good taste in wine.” She took a slow sip.
She fucks like that, too, he thought, watching her close her eyes to
savor a bite of pasta after the swallow of vintage, and he’d had to drown
that thought in wine before it could grow teeth and bite.
It was so laughably fucking civil the way they played house between
bites of vegan carbonara and tofu pancetta. Passing dishes like he’d never
put that same hand around her throat. It was a civility you could crack like
ice and fall into, unless you skated around the tension with wine and soft
words. They both hid their true faces in public, just like they’d been taught.
Sex was the most honest thing they had between them.
Jay went to her room after dinner but he went to his office, now located
in his childhood bedroom, and tried to work. His mind refused to cooperate,
however; his thoughts remained firmly upstairs, no matter how many times
he tried to refocus them.
He got up from his desk and shut his laptop decisively. There were still
emails to respond to, but he was done. And she’s had several hours to get
that wine out of her system. Using his phone as a flashlight, he made his
way through the darkened halls, up the righthand staircase. But instead of
taking a hard left, he went right and down the hall.
A path he’d taken dozens of times before, always cloaked in shadow.
The door creaked as he pushed it open, holding it just wide enough to
let himself inside before snicking it shut behind him. Jay had her hoodie
pulled over her face and her cat was sleeping on her stomach. When it saw
him, its ears pricked and it scampered under the bed.
Nicholas got on top of her, savoring the way the softness of her body
yielded so easily to his weight, and shifted the phone to his free hand as he
pushed the hood back from her sleeping face.
“My god, you’re pretty.” He brushed a few curly locks from her
forehead, drawing his fingers down her cheek, her parted lips. And she’s all
mine. With a rough sigh, he yanked the zipper of her sweatshirt down and
kissed her breast through the thin camisole. “Come to Daddy, sweet bird.”
A harsh breath escaped her as he ran his hand over her torso, tracing
every dip and swell.
“Open your eyes.” He plucked at the thin strap of her top. “I want to
make you feel good.”
She stirred, her eyes fluttering open—and then she let out a startled
scream, flinching back against the bed as she clawed at him in a panic.
Fuck. “No, no, no,” he crooned, reaching for her now-flailing wrists.
“Relax, blue jay. It’s just me. Don’t be afraid. It’s me. It’s Nick. Just Nick.”
(You didn’t think she’d be having nightmares, did you, boy?
I bet she dreams of you)
Her body went limp beneath his—surrender, but not the kind he
wanted. “N-Nick?” The whites of her eyes were overly large in the dark,
even as her heaving breaths began to slow. She twisted experimentally in
his grip and he relaxed his fingers. “You scared me.”
“I’m sorry.” He bent to kiss her and felt her mouth soften beneath his.
So soft, like crushing velvet. Groaning, he slid his hand into her sleeptangled hair. “Kiss me back.”
Jay turned her head to the side, much to his frustration. “You’ve been
acting strange all day. First, you wouldn’t stop staring at me at dinner. And
now—” She realized her sweatshirt was open and covered herself, even
though she was wearing a camisole beneath it. “What is wrong with you?”
“I don’t want to fight right now.” The words brushed against her
mouth. “Just fuck me.”
Jay growled at him and pushed at his chest, which made him pin her
wrists down again. “I’m being serious,” she hissed. “I can’t deal with you
when you’re like this.”
“Well, if you’re serious,” he whispered hotly, “turn the light fucking
light on and I’ll stop.” He freed her right hand, leaning back to look at her
face. “You have long arms. I know you can reach the lamp, if you really
want to.” He laced his fingers through the ones on her trapped hand. “But I
think you just want to be fucked.”
She shoved at him again, deliberately, and he pushed down with his
hips, grinding her into the mattress. Jay made a noise that made him laugh
and knot his fingers through her hair.
“Oh, so you want it like that from Daddy?”
Arousal pounded through him like a second heartbeat as she tried to
wait him out. But her breathing betrayed her—it always did—and he could
feel her heart pounding against his chest even as she tried unsuccessfully to
break his hold on her wrists.
“I asked you a question, Jay. Do you want to be a good girl for me? Or
do you want to fight me while I take what I want?”
The silence stretched. She tried to squirm again. The hard tips of her
breasts dragged across his chest, which almost broke his control.
“Jay,” he said, once, warningly.
He heard her throat click when she swallowed. “I—I don’t want to be
good.”
“That’s what I thought.” He rolled off her hips reluctantly. “Get out of
bed.”
“W-what?”
“Out. Of. Bed. Now.”
“What are you going to do?”
“You,” he said with emphasis, “are going to run.”
“Run where?” She sounded so horrified, he would have been amused if
he weren’t so fucking hard. “Outside?”
“Wherever you think you can get to in ten seconds before I drag you to
the ground and have my way with you.”
“What?” Her voice sounded thin. “Are you serious?”
“Nine seconds. And if you make me fuck you in this bed, Daddy is
going to be extra mean.”
Jay jerked, swaying as if hypnotized, and then scrambled to her feet,
stumbling a little in her haste. Her pajama bottoms were just a little too
long, and it occurred to Nicholas, as he watched her hitch them up to her
waist, that they might have been his.
She slammed the door behind her. He could hear her stumbling down
the stairs, loud enough to wake the dog, who howled unhappily from the
master bedroom. A door downstairs opened—not the front door, but the one
that branched off from the sitting room that led out to the pool.
You want me to fuck you outside, Jay? He pushed off from the bed. You
really are a bad girl.
After carefully shutting her door behind him, he headed down the
stairs, taking them two at a time. He didn’t bother being quiet—he wanted
her to hear him. In her haste to escape out the door, she had closed it but
hadn’t bothered to latch it, and he shoved it all the way open, letting it slam
against the side of the house with a loud bang, before swinging it violently
closed.
There was no way she hadn’t heard that, no matter how hard her heart
was pounding.
(It comes alive in the dark just like you)
He breathed in lungfuls of jasmine-scented air as he scanned the garden
for Jay. He figured she would play hard-to-get, forcing him to drag her out
of the shadows, and was surprised to see her in the pool when he stepped
out on the deck, still fully clothed.
Out in plain sight. Just waiting to be snatched up.
With a dark smile, he kicked off his pants and grabbed a small stone
from one of the garden beds, casually lobbing it into the water at the deep
end of the pool.
Jay yelped, and covered her own mouth, swinging her whole head in
that direction while he hoisted himself into the shallows with the quietest
splash.
“N-Nick?” she said, drifting towards the ladder—closer to him. She
sounded puzzled, and a little worried. “Nick, was that you? Are you oka—
aah!”
“Got you.”
She bucked in response, clawing at the arm that he’d looped around her
waist. Her camisole rode up as he fought to maintain his grip, pushing aside
the damp ropes of her hair and letting her feel the press of his teeth against
her skin. “I thought I said no clothes in the pool.”
“You tricked me,” she seethed.
“I always trick you. You let it happen so often, I have to figure it’s on
purpose.”
Jay elbowed him in the ribs and he swung her up in his arms. Water
poured off her body in sheets as he walked through the shallow end and up
the tiled steps, heading not for the house but one of the plastic loungers
where his stepmother had used to drink and ogle the pool boy.
He set Jay down on one, ass-first, throwing out a hand to cushion her
skull when her neck snapped back. “Put your hands over your head. I want
both your wrists.”
“It’s cold,” Jay chattered, as if the water hadn’t rendered her top
completely sheer and he couldn’t see this for himself. “C-can’t we go inside
if we’re going to f-fuck?”
“You should have thought of that before you jumped into my pool with
your clothes on.”
The lounger creaked dangerously as he joined her on it. This was far
more precarious than fucking on the love seat in her living room and he
found himself wondering if the plastic and rubber might snap beneath their
combined weight.
Jay gripped the sides of the chair, head tilting back to watch him with
wide eyes as he tugged at a lock of her wet hair, twisting the curl around his
finger until her face was tugged towards his.
“You’re not afraid to take Daddy’s punishment, are you?”

Here in the darkness, cloaked in their own private world of darkness, it
was almost possible to forget everything but him and the electric impulses
flashing beneath her skin as he touched her like a man possessed. God, he
was terrifying—like a pagan god, wild as wine.
She envied the girl she had been. The girl who had been able to resist
him.
Now she could not imagine him from her life any more than she could
imagine herself dead.
Punish me, she thought, leaning into that rough, claiming kiss. I
deserve it.
She must have spoken the words aloud because his fingers bit into her
skin. Then he was yanking her pants off. It was difficult—the fabric was
clingy and wet, and he had to roll them off her legs slowly once he got past
the backs of her knees, which he did.
It made her nervous, him being on his knees so close to her thighs, but
he was still holding her pants, pulling them taut with a wet snap that made
her flinch before rolling them out longwise. Restraints, she realized, when
he hauled her hands over her head and tied her loosely to the chair. Wet
pants were not nearly as effective as his leather handcuffs and she could
have easily wriggled away if she’d wanted to, but she didn’t. She let him tie
her to the chair.
She watched the flex of muscle in his arms as he worked, the efficiency
of the act making her wonder, for the first time, how many other women he
had tied up. She could feel him breathing, warm puffs of air against her
chilled throat, and was surprised by the sharp stab of jealousy that she felt.
Her fingers spasmed when he bent to kiss her palm, the impulse traveling
down her veins like liquid gold burning up her blood, and she thought: I
want him.
“W-what would you have d-done to me if I d-didn’t r-run?”
“Exactly what I’m going to do to you now.”
The cold rushed in as her breath rushed out. She leaned towards him,
but he pushed her back down with a shake of his head. Filled with
something far too fluttery to be dread, Jay watched him stride to his
discarded pants at the other end of the pool and pick something up. The
patio lights bathed him in milky light, throwing skin and muscle into basrelief. Water matted the hair on his chest and trailed over the grooves of his
belly in quicksilver streaks, before dripping lower.
Jay nearly choked on the dryness of her own throat.
Nicholas tore open the condom and sheathed himself before swinging
himself over her prone body. He didn’t enter her right away, though. He ran
a hand over her body, in a single possessive stroke, before gripping her
hips, just over the hard girdle of bone. She thought his hands might be
shaking. “Look at you,” he rasped, almost involuntarily.
And then he fucked into her on a sharp, shallow thrust that made her
cry out in surprise as he slid along her inner walls. The stretch of it almost
hurt, especially with the cold making her body so stiff, but his skin was hot
and the ache was familiar; it went all the way down to her heart.
As he sank deeper, he braced his hand on her ribs, keeping her flat. The
other slid between her legs, shockingly warm. “How long were you in the
pool?”
“I—” He watched her face as he touched her clit. The porch lights
didn’t reach this far and half of him was in shadow. As soon as her
breathing picked up, he took his hand away despite her protest. “W-wait!
I’m sorry—I d-don’t know! I’m sorry.”
“Only good girls get to come, little bird. Sorry girls lie there and take
it.” The chair creaked dangerously as he lifted her up by the backs of her
thighs, forcing her to wrap her legs around his slim hips for purchase as he
drove into her at a steeper angle. The pressure was exquisite now; she could
feel the gouge of his pelvis with each stroke, the impact jolting her back
against the slats as the metal shrieked under their combined weight. “And
slutty girls just get fucked until Daddy’s had enough.”
“Aaah.” He was being forceful enough that she could feel her ass
sinking through the gaps in the slats. They were really testing the limits of
the chair now, Jay thought. His knees were nearly touching the ground and
one of his hands was actually braced against the rough concrete.
He didn’t seem to care, though. It was like he had something to prove.
From the very moment that she had woken up to find him in her room, she
had sensed his frenetic energy. Something wild had driven him to her, and
now he was releasing his passions the only way he knew how.
Maybe I have something to prove, too, she thought, tilting her hips to
meet him, even as she struggled to hold onto the slippery metal rails that
were slick from pool water.
“Fucking me back isn’t going to change my mind.”
“I don’t care,” she gasped.
The wind blew an errant lock of hair into her face. At this angle, she
had a full view of his vast backyard, though most of it was upside-down.
She loved the sweeping rows of his mother’s roses, which were cast in thick
bars of darkness from the wall of cypress that blocked the scaled-off side of
the property from the eyes of the street below. Jay had always thought that
its mock Greek Revival façade had the appearance of a palace fortress.
She gasped out on another sobbing exhale as his hand slid up to her
face. “Nick—”
He brushed the lock of hair out of her eyes, dragging his knuckles
tenderly down her jaw before collaring her throat with his hand and
tightening his fingers just enough that she felt exquisitely lightheaded. Her
muscles spasmed and he gave her a particularly rough thrust that had her
gasping.
“Don’t you dare fucking come.”
“Please—”
So many small humiliations lay scattered between them, spangled like
a constellation of hurts in a black velvet sky where she was caught in his
orbit, unable to escape.
He punished her for making him want her, and she punished him for
making her need him.
For making her crave this.
“Please,” she repeated.
“You’re mine,” he said, his voice a textured snarl in her ear, and she
shivered so violently that the chill seemed to ripple through every cell in her
body, turning her very nerves to ice.
When he came, she felt the harsh echo of her own denied pleasure in
each of those last staggered thrusts. His still-damp hair was drying with a
slight curl to it, throwing his eyes into shadow as he stared down
searchingly into her face the same way he had at dinner.
What is he looking for?
She shivered again. That icy feeling of pins and needles was edging
into pain. “Nick. I’m c-cold.”
He swung off her body, heading for his pants. Jay looked away from
the sight of his buttocks and tugged free of her restraints with a few hard
pulls, trying to force back the bitter feeling building in the back of her
throat like hot acid. As she looked around desperately, wondering where her
sweatshirt had disappeared to, a hand clasped her shoulder.
Nicholas was holding up a towel.
She peeled off her damp top and let him blot her dry, the briskness of
the gestures making her suck in. “Does that hurt?”
“N-no,” she said shakily. “Just sensitive.”
Apparently deeming her dry enough, he handed her the towel, watching
her wrap herself in it.
“What?” she asked cautiously. “Why are you looking at me like that?”
“I’m imagining what it will be like when you’re here.”
Jay blinked, a startled laugh escaping her. “What are you talking about?
I am here.”
“When you’re my wife.” He gave her that same intense look from
before. “When you’re mine and you finally let yourself belong here.”
All the moisture fled her mouth.
“I can’t remember what my life was like before you came here. You’re
studded into my soul like little pieces of glass. I can feel you all over this
house, and when you’re not here, it’s like being lost in that fucking mall all
over again, chasing the scent of my mother’s perfume.”
He broke off, as if he hadn’t meant to say that much all at once.
(it’s such good sex)
“I said yes,” she reminded him, but he didn’t seem to hear her.
“You can’t fuck me like this and then leave me again. You can’t make
me feel—” He reached out suddenly, grabbing her by the hips and pulling
her close. She could feel his strong fingers biting in, even through the thick
terrycloth. “Don’t leave me again.”
It felt like he’d reached into her chest and squeezed. “Oh my god,
Nicholas, what’s gotten into you? I’m not going anywhere.”
“You always run,” he said. “And I can’t fucking exist without you. I
don’t know how.”
The devastation she saw on his face caught her raw. “I’m not going
anywhere,” she repeated, very alarmed now. She leaned into him until he
opened his arms and gave her one of those awkward embraces that broke
her heart every time. “Except m-maybe inside,” she said in a muffled voice.
“Yeah, you’re freezing.” He sighed against her temple, his hand
running over her arm. “Let’s get you in the house.”
The warmth of the house hit her like a wall. Nicholas picked up a red
Stanford sweater from one of the backs of those sunroom chairs and pulled
it over her head. She let the towel drop to the floor as the fleecy fabric
swung down to her lower thighs, curiously indulgent against her bare skin.
“Red looks good on you.”
“So you’ve said,” she replied warily.
“It’s still true.” He headed for the bar, reaching up to grab two glasses.
“Do you want a drink before we go to bed? It might warm you up.”
“No,” she said. “And I don’t think you should, either.”
Nicholas smirked at her before pouring himself a shot of rum. “Always
taking care of me.” Still holding his glass, he strode closer, tucking her hair
behind her ear. “And all I want to do,” he finished, letting his hand trail
down those white letters, “is take care of you.”
“I love you,” she said quietly, the admission ripping something
violently away from her. “But I’m a grown woman, Nicholas. I’ve been
taking care of myself for thirty-one years. That won’t change when I’m
your wife. You can’t bully me into letting you control me.”
Careful, Jay. You know what happens when you want it too much.
“No,” he agreed. “But sometimes—you could hand the reins over to
me.”
Jay thought of all the times she’d dragged herself to his room, burning
with humiliation and the expectation of being destroyed. Even as his touch
woke parts of her that she’d never been able to reach, she had always been
braced for a level of suffering and revenge that never came.
“The reins?” she repeated faintly.
“Just for a while.” He tilted her chin up gently. “You must be
exhausted. You could be my little bird out of bed, too. Let Daddy make
some of the decisions. Let me dress you up and show you off and spoil you
—I don’t think you realize what that would do for me. Or how much that
would turn me on.”
Panic was bubbling through her in earnest now. She was scared of how
much she wanted what he was offering—safety, security, and the
knowledge that she would never be alone again. All her life, she had been
so scared that she would be left if she didn’t leave first.
“Jay, you’re shaking. Why does it scare you to rely on me?”
“I’m afraid my freedom will be taken away,” she blurted.
“I won’t do that to you.” He stroked her and the touch was so gentle
that she flinched as if struck. “You let me tie you up, blue jay. Don’t you
trust me to take care of you properly?”
Jay looked at his hand on hers. She felt as if she were standing on the
edge of a diving board and her feet were bolted to its surface. “Yes,” she
said falteringly.
“But?”
“You could hurt me,” she whispered.
Nicholas said nothing, but she saw a line form on his forehead.
She swallowed, wondering if she should say what she was about to say
given his irascible temper. “My last relationship was very comfortable. He
—he never really asked anything of me. Even though we were a couple, we
were still separate people.”
“You dated someone who bored you so you wouldn’t be invested in the
relationship.”
Jay looked at him sharply. “No, we just didn’t really discuss things like
this. He didn’t care what I wore. He didn’t want control. We just went about
our lives and um, did couple stuff.”
“Boring and bad in bed,” he said, in a deadpan tone. “What a catch.”
“Stop it,” she said, but there was no fire in it, and she could see that
this pleased him. “You just told me you couldn’t exist without me. You
don’t get to criticize anyone.”
“I’m tired,” he said wearily. “And I know exactly what I need.” He
hugged her to him and she sucked in a breath, inhaling the chlorine scent
still clinging to his bare skin, and beneath that, night-blooming flowers and
citrus and him. “From the very first day we met, you never had any trouble
telling me exactly what you think. I don’t want that to change.”
“No, you just want to run the house and order me around like a big man
because that’s what turns you on.”
“It does—but only when you let me.” Jay was taken slightly aback by
the power in his arms when he crushed her bodily to him. “Come to my
room.” He bussed her cheek. “Spend the night with me. I won’t even touch
you if you don’t want me to. I just want you with me.”
Jay, face buried in the crook of his shoulder, hesitated. And then she
took the shot of rum and drank half of it herself before responding, “Yes,
Daddy.”

Chapter Fifteen

The rumpled sheets smelled like him, she thought, as she got into his
bed. He dwarfed her old twin with his massive frame, but even in this large
queen-sized bed, gravity kept her flush against him when the two of them
were on the memory foam together.
He tugged at her sweatshirt. “Keeping this on?”
“Yes,” she mumbled.
He just made a mild editorial grunt, squeezing her body a little tighter
through the cotton.
Jay looked at his sitting area with the two brocaded chairs and loveseat
as his arm settled around her waist, keeping her back pressed against his
chest. One of his legs was pressed between hers, and though he had his hips
tilted away from her, she could feel the heat of body against her bare thighs.
She covered his hand, smoothing her fingers over his knuckles. “Will
you tell me what’s wrong now?” she asked quietly. “If I’m supposed to trust
you, you have to trust me.”
Nicholas sighed. But then, in the moderated tones of a man who treated
his feelings like unpleasant business, he began to talk.
He told her how hollow he felt at work and how bitterly he resented
everyone in town for their complicity in his father’s dealings. He was
furious over how people were treating her, in particular, and after he again
demanded the names of the people who she had heard spreading rumors, he
confessed that he was afraid she wouldn’t marry him if she didn’t get the
job.
Jay felt a wave of pity. Nobody had ever taught him that love wasn’t
something you could bargain for or buy. No wonder he was so unhappy, she
thought. Nick, you foolish boy.
“It’s not about the job. It’s about you treating me like an equal, and not
using your money as a tool of control.” She touched his arm gently. “It
sounds like work is stressing you out.”
“No,” he said, and she felt him shake his head. “It just doesn’t do what
it used to for me.”
“Well, that sounds like you’re depressed.” She ran her fingers over his
forearm, flattening the springy hairs and watching them bounce back up. “It
happens to me sometimes.”
“Men like me don’t get depressed.”
“Men like you do if they feel like they don’t have a purpose in life.
What’s yours?” She tilted her head back to look at him. “Have you ever
thought about starting a charity?”
“So help me, Jay, if you whip out a bible—”
Jay smacked his arm. “You funnel money into the town with all your
big investments, but you’re mostly just helping your rich friends. You have
the power to change someone’s life if you wanted to. I mean, look at me. I
went to a great school but had to use your father’s money to do it, and if it
weren’t for the optics of having a dropout as a stepchild, he would have cut
me off. I was completely dependent on him—”
She paused, struggling to stay composed.
“You could send kids to school.”
“You want me to use my money on a bunch of brats?” He tugged at her
sweatshirt sleeve, baring part of her shoulder. He nipped at her gently. “I’d
rather use it on you.”
“It could be a wedding present,” said Jay.
Nicholas paused, his breath stirring the fine hairs at her nape. She felt
him turn to study her, and when he did, his cock nudged against her
backside. “I was going to take you to Singapore.” He sounded surprisingly
hesitant. “That’s what you want?”
“I think it would be very sweet of you.” She leaned back against him.
“I think it would make you feel good, too.”
“I forgot what an idealist you are.”
“It’s not a bad thing, wanting the best out of people.”
“I didn’t say it was a bad thing.” She felt him playing with her hair. She
hadn’t dried it properly and now the frizzy little strands were unwinding
from themselves like small pinwheels. “It just says so much about you.”
“Like?” she prompted.
“Why you keep giving second chances to people who don’t deserve it.”
Jay rolled around to face him. He was lying on his side propping up his
head with one hand. The other, which had been resting over her stomach,
was now on the bed.
He arched an eyebrow, running his fingers through his mussed hair.
“Yes?”
“I love you.” She leaned forward to kiss his nose and saw his eyes flare
open wide. “I won’t co-sign all of your decisions, and sometimes you get on
my nerves, but I do love you, and I want to see you grow. And as long as
you try to do that—as long as you’re kind to me—I’ll forgive you.” Resting
her head on the pillow beside him, she whispered, “It’s really that simple.”
His mouth tilted. This close, she could see all the little individual dots
of his stubble, and all the lines and angles that comprised his beautiful,
infuriating face. “You’re such a goody two-shoes.”
“And you’re a demon prince,” she said, not unkindly.
He reached up and flicked her nose.
“As long as that means you’re my princess.”

Jay woke up to the smell of coffee. It sliced through her dreams like an
arrow, and she startled, staring at the unfamiliar ceiling and wondering why
the room didn’t look like hers. Then a weight lifted from her feet and she
heard a bark, punctuated by a series of whimpers and a closed door.
A more pervasive pressure took its place, followed by the brush of a
man’s stubbled mouth against her cheek. Nicholas’s blurry face snapped
into sharp focus and her eyes darted from his eyes to his T-shirt, to his mesh
shorts. “Hey,” she said shyly. “You’re all dressed.”
“I tried waking you up but you whined something about being sore.
And then the puppy came in.”
Jay sat up, letting the sheets fall to her waist. “Where are you going?”
“Just for a run. I came to kiss you goodbye first.”
“Okay. But I didn’t brush my teeth.”
“I didn’t mean on the mouth.”
Just in case his meaning wasn’t clear, he yanked the sheets back. Jay
yelped, tugging his sweatshirt down over her thighs. He pushed her hands
away, pinning her wrists to the bed.
“Lie down, and keep your hands up there. I don’t want you trying to
drive.”
“Nick.” She was shocked by his crudeness.
“I know. You’re sore.”
Nicholas smoothed his hands over her skin before pushing her legs
apart and kissing her so deeply that her breath caught. She was still
sensitive and swollen from the previous night and the extra stimulation was
paved with little bursts of discomfort.
“Nick—” she gasped.
He had mapped out her body in dark rooms with an enthusiasm that
now felt like it might be her undoing as he sucked on her aching clit hard
enough that it almost hurt when she came, and she squeezed his shoulders
with her knees, nearly unable to bear it.
“I’ve never kissed anyone else like this, you know,” he said. “Just
you.”
“Oh my god,” she cried out hoarsely, when he guided one of her legs
over his shoulder, spreading her wide on his sheets. But she didn’t resist,
drawing in a deep breath as she slid one of her hands beneath her sweatshirt
to cup one of her breasts.
“Did you like hearing that? I thought you would.”
“Fuck.” Jay closed her eyes. “Please don’t stop.”
“Tell Daddy how much you love being the only girl who gets to fuck
his face.”
“I love it,” she sobbed. “All of it, god, anything, please—” He switched
to his tongue and her low cries became hoarse screams of pleasure that had
hot streaks of white flaring in her periphery as her body lifted off the bed.
“Nicholas. Oh my god.”
“You love this.” He ran his fingers down the backs of her thighs as he
kissed her again, deep and lingering—the way he kissed her on the mouth.
Her legs trembled. “You love me.”
“Yes,” she cried. “I do. Oh—Daddy—fuck—”
“I love seeing you like this.” His breath tickled her tingling skin and
when he kissed her just below her mons, another throb pulsed through her
aching flesh. “I used to be amazed that I could do this to you. Watching you
come would get me worked up for hours.”
“But not anymore?” she asked, breathless.
“Don’t provoke me when you’re sore,” he said. But when he leaned
over to pick a steaming mug off the nightstand, she caught a brief glimpse
of tented mesh between his legs before he sat down at the foot of the bed.
“Are you sure you don’t want to come with me?”
Jay accepted the drink, collapsing back against his bed. All the blood
rushing back into her brain was making her heady. “I think . . . I already
did.”
“Jay.” He laughed, his smile approving and a little wicked. “You bad
girl.”
“Only with you.” She took a long sip of coffee. He’d made it perfectly,
creamed with oat milk and only lightly sweetened. “I’m still impressed that
you figured out the machine.”
“I just read the French instructions, Jay—or are we talking about your
pussy?”
Jay made a face and kicked out at him. “I was talking about your coffee
machine.”
“C'est ça. Je n'ai qu'une seule douce machine.” He caught her by the
ankle and gave her foot a squeeze. Running his thumb over the arch, his
eyes held hers, and Jay felt another dull throb between her legs.
“Did you just call me a douche machine in French?”
“You’ll never know.” His smile widened, dimples popping out on either
side of his mouth. “What do you want to do when I get back from my run?”
“Um.” Flustered, she leaned over to set the mug on his nightstand,
drawing her legs away. “Well, I was going to wash these sheets, but we
could do something together afterwards.”
“Here? Or in town?”
“Whatever you want.”
A flicker went through his eyes, disappearing before she could identify
it. “Think about it. But if you have some extra time on your hands—”
He paused, turning away.
“You could bring down my mother’s dress from the attic. I’d like to see
it on you.”
“I think that’s bad luck.” Jay tried to keep her voice light so he
wouldn’t hear the swell of emotion in it. “I’m pretty sure it’s supposed to be
a surprise.”
“I make my own luck. And I’ll never get tired of seeing you in a pretty
dress.”
Nicholas reached over and flicked her nose before rising to leave,
making her wonder if she had imagined the shadow that had briefly
darkened his features. “By the way, I fed the dog and the cat, so take your
time getting up,” he tossed over his shoulder, before closing the door behind
him.
Wow, okay.
Still buzzing pleasantly from her orgasm, Jay finished her coffee as she
watched the shadows shift on the other side of the curtains from the
mulberry tree outside. Light reflecting off his pool made ripples on the voile
as the breeze stirred the fabric. He’d left the window open and she could
smell roses. She sighed and stretched leisurely.
If this is what he meant by spoiling me, I could get used to this.
She finished the last drop and took the empty mug with her down to the
kitchen, where she was immediately greeted by Maynard. “Hello, baby,”
she said, leaning down to ruffle the dogs ears. The sound of claws skittering
on hardwood followed her all the way to the sink, which was empty for
once. He’d even taken the time to wipe the counters down.
Jay washed her mug and took a long shower, and then changed into
loose jogging pants and an old off-the-shoulder top she’d brought back with
her from San Francisco. After popping the sheets in the wash, she decided
to call herself an Uber and pick up some pastries for Nicholas as a surprise.
He didn’t eat before his runs and the thought of his eyes lighting up at some
surprise sugary treats made her smile.
It was too early for the brunch rush and she was on main street within
ten minutes, walking into a boutique bakery called 24 Karat Cakes. What a
ridiculous name, Jay thought, as she walked in through the doors.
Everything within those four pink walls was covered in rhinestones, and
there was a custom neon sign on the wall that said BYOC (bling your own
cake).
“Hi there! Can I get you something? We have samples of our bake of
the day.”
Jay glanced at the tray of purple frosted somethings and shook her
head. “I’ll take some of the guava jam rolls, a maple bar, and one of those
donuts if they’re vegan.”
“I’ll check for you,” the girl said agreeably before disappearing into the
back.
Jay arranged her pick-up Uber as she waited. Another customer walked
in just as she was slipping her phone back into her purse, talking into his
phone. She recognized the voice and looked up sharply, just as Michael
glanced over.
“They’re vegan,” the cashier said cheerfully. “Do you want one?”
“Um, yes, please.”
A look of panic flashed over Michael’s face, which was odd. But the
anger that followed it was even stranger. He stormed over, throwing a
nervous glance at the street.
“What are you doing here?”
“Getting pastries,” she said, accepting the box from the now-puzzled
cashier. “What are you doing here?”
“My wife owns this place,” he said coldly.
That explains the rhinestone theme.
Michael was still looking around cagily. “Is Nicholas with you?”
“No,” Jay said. “He’s at home, and I’m headed there, too. So if you
have business with him, I’d recommend calling him up on the phone. It was
nice to see you.”
To her consternation, he followed her out onto the sidewalk. “Tell me it
isn’t true.”
“What?”
“Quentin said you were at his hotel. He said the two of you were—”
He broke off, but his eyes went to her throat and she clapped her hand over
herself. Michael’s face creased in disgust. “Tell me you aren’t sleeping with
your own stepbrother.”
“Wow, all right then, I won’t.” Jay scanned the street desperately.
“Screw you.”
“My god.” His voice rose, causing a few people to glance over
curiously. “Did it start after graduation or were you already fucking him
when you started seeing me?”
Jay whipped around. “First of all, you’re being absolutely disgusting.
Second of all, you don’t know anything about me. You never did, because
you never asked. Our relationship was always about you and what you
wanted. And now you’re married to someone else, so it’s really none of
your business who I sleep with, and even if it was, I wouldn’t discuss it on
the street.”
“But it is business, right?” he said flatly. “After all, he owns half this
town and you’re—you.” His eyes drifted to her bare shoulder, and she
fought the urge to tuck away her bra strap. “I used to think you were a nice
girl. It actually used to make me feel guilty a little, because I felt like I was
corrupting you every time I made a move. But I guess I just wasn’t paying
enough.”
Jay shifted the box to her other arm and slapped him—hard.
“Ow, fuck.” Michael pressed a hand to his face. “Very classy, Jay.”
“Fuck you,” she said, fighting back the angry tears forming in her eyes.
“Seriously. Fuck you and fuck Quentin, too. The whole sorry lot of you can
just get fucked.”
“He tried to pay me off to get me to stay away from you. Did you know
that?”
Jay turned away.
“Quentin was paying back interest on that predatory loan for years.
And Nick even put one of his own friends in the hospital with a bruised
trachea. He couldn’t swallow solid food for two weeks. Two weeks, Jay.
Nick only had to spend one night in jail for it.” Michael let his hand fall to
his side, revealing his reddened cheek. “That’s the kind of man you’re
sharing a roof with.”
“Leave me alone,” Jay said in a low, furious voice. “Or I’m calling the
police.”
“I thought you were a feminist. You think he won’t do the same thing
to you?”
“Leave.”
“Wow.” He shook his head. “Well, that makes my decision easy. You
made your bed. Have fun lying in it. But don’t expect anyone to help you
when he runs your heart through the thresher.”
With that, he turned and headed back inside 24 Karat Cakes.
When the Uber arrived two minutes too late, she was still shaking. The
young male driver kept shooting her these little worried glances, and when
he let her out by the trash cans, he wasted no time peeling off back down
the hill in a thick cloud of dust.
Nicholas wasn’t back yet so she set the pastry box on the counter, one
hand pressed flat on the granite as she stared at the oak cabinets and
eggshell white walls.
She thought of Michael saying “I guess I just wasn’t paying enough.”
She thought of Nicholas saying “You could be my little bird out of bed,
too.”
Her hand clenched into a fist and she turned away from the wall with
bright eyes. With the dog nipping at her heels, she stormed down the empty
hallway and yanked hard on the chain that unfolded the set of wooden stairs
leading up to his attic.
Fuck you, Michael, she thought, seething with every step. I’m going to
marry that man so hard that he forgets his own name.
As children, both she and Nicholas had been expressly forbidden from
going up here, even though it wasn’t a true attic like the ones in old
Victorian houses. This was more of a crawl space, where insulation poked
out of the walls in yellow tufts that would itch and burn if you touched
them, which Nick had, because telling him not to do something was the best
way to get him to do it. Shaking her head at the memory of instructing him
on how to wash the little particles of glass off his arms and legs through a
closed bathroom door, she eyed the dust-covered mess of things that had
been stored up here to be forgotten, wondering where to start.
There was a box of her things, marked ‘JAY’ in Nicholas’s
handwriting. It looked like it had been opened and sifted through multiple
times. Curious, she pulled back a flap and saw old clothes and schoolwork
and several notebooks and diaries, her old school uniform.
Shoving that aside, with an odd lump in her throat, she moved one
marked ‘XMAS’ and another marked ‘MOTHER’ (whose mother? she
wondered. Damon’s?) before coming across one that simply said ‘EMMA.’
This one had been taped shut but the tape had yellowed over the years
and was already starting to peel back. She opened it carefully, revealing
stacks of Japanese notebooks and packs of fancy-looking pencils. There
were books, too. Piles of them. Jay found a leatherbound copy of Jane
Austen’s collected works, clearly well-loved, and her heart sank a little at
the thought of a woman who had yearned for that kind of romance, only to
find herself married to a man like Damon.
In a silver frame, she found a picture of the woman whose ghost she
had glimpsed in the features of her son. Emma Beaucroft was more striking
than pretty, with sharp cheekbones and brows that looked like brushstrokes.
Her hair was cut fashionably short but quite wavy, and Jay, with a tight
chest, recognized that same curl pattern from Nicholas, when his hair was
wet.
She set the photograph carefully aside and, beneath some sketchbooks,
found what must have been her wedding dress stuffed carelessly in a plastic
trash bag that had been tied off. The material hadn’t yellowed too much
despite being poorly stored, and when she shook it out, she saw that it had a
deep sweetheart neckline with lace-screened sleeves. On his mother’s
athletic build, it wouldn’t have been very risqué, but this was going to be
quite revealing on her.
Jay folded the dress over her arm and took the book and the photo
frame back downstairs with her. In the master bedroom, she peeled off her
shirt and pants and tried the dress on, half-expecting it not to fit. The waist
was very snug, and her ass and bust stretched the fabric to its limit, but it fit,
and she knew Nicholas would like the low decolletage.
She thought of that nightmare when she’d been wearing her mother’s
Vegas wedding dress. This was the class her mother had always tried to
emulate. Jay smoothed her hands over her own hips before looking away
from her own reflection.
Stepping into this dress, and into this life, made it feel an awful lot like
she was taking her mother’s place, along with his name.
I’ll be the third Mrs. Beaucroft to live in this house.
Jay set the photo and the book on the coffee table of Nicholas’s
screened porch, thinking he might enjoy seeing them. There was also
something that felt very right about putting her so close to the roses she’d
loved, although Jay was careful to face the picture away from the direct
sunlight so it wouldn’t fade. The dress, she laid over the settee in his master
bedroom to air out.
Even after her awful confrontation with Michael, Jay felt almost happy.
The birds were singing and she could hear the piercing cry of a blue jay,
and the rumbly engine of the mail truck. She decided to get the mail, too,
walking back down his spacious drive, glancing at the mulberry tree whose
shadows she had watched while drinking her coffee in bed.
When Nicholas had first brought her back here, she had been surprised
to see it standing. Just as Nicholas’s father had carved the women who
betrayed him out from his life, Jay had expected to be similarly excised by
his son. That her presence had not only been left untouched, but also
carefully preserved, seemed emblematic of the differences between the two
men.
Nicholas, in his own strange, twisted way, was capable of love.
The mailbox was all the way down the path, past the wall of cypress
trees that screened the pool from the street. She opened it with the key and
took out a number of envelopes, mostly bills. She sifted through them on
the granite countertop, chucking away a few obvious ads, pausing only
when she came to a thick unmarked envelope that had no postage stamps.
Nick & Jay was written on the outside in ugly black sharpie.
She felt a twinge in her belly. Before she could second guess herself,
Jay tore open the envelope and shook the contents out onto the counter,
causing them to scatter in a colorful cascade of shadow and flesh tones. At
first, she wasn’t sure what she was seeing—not because she didn’t
understand but because her brain didn’t want to.
Photographs.
She was looking at glossy, full-color photographs.
Photographs of her and Nick.
The first must have been taken in the parking lot of BA because
Nicholas was leaning on her open car door with his arms folded, talking to
her with one of those half-smiles as she got out.
The others were less innocent. There were several taken on that hiking
trail, when he had pinned her against that tree and kissed her like he was
planning on taking her there.
And then there were—her breath caught—several taken out by the
pool.
These were farther away, but it was obvious what they were doing. And
it was just as obvious that she was wearing no clothes at all.
The picture fell from her fingers and landed on the floor with a slap.
That was when she heard the sound of the front door opening.
Nicholas, still existing in a world where these pictures did not exist, was
humming along to one of his metal songs, the low bass of his voice echoing
through the wall.
She tried to call out his name, but all that came out was a sob.

Chapter Sixteen

Nicholas slid the lazily-drawn contract back across the desk as he
studied the man who was old enough to be his father. He wasn’t really
seeing him; it was Jay and her crying face floating before his eyes. He had
come home from his run in a relatively good mood, only to find the relaxed
and happy woman he’d left reduced to a shattered version of herself.
And then she’d held up the pictures.
“What the fuck is this,” he began, in a cold tone that came out sharp
enough that the man across from him flinched. That was no good. He was
too emotional, too distracted to really bargain properly, but for the moment
at least, shock had given him the edge. “This is an insult.”
The man stammered some excuse. Nicholas barely listened. He’d heard
them all before.
They marched in here as if they had come from an assembly line of
white, balding executives in bespoke suits and Countess Mara ties and they
fucked with him because they wanted to be him, thinking his youth made
him a fool, thinking that age made them smarter.
If it were Jay in here taking notes, she would have been staring at him
with a hint of subtle reprimand. But instead he had Annica, who was still
bristly from their “growth” conversation, who would only glance up
occasionally to see if he had finished speaking before taking notes.
This man, as irritating as he was, was just a proxy for who he really
wanted to destroy.
“One-point-five-percent, minimum,” Nicholas said at last. “I’m not
going to bargain.”
Sweat was beading at the man’s temples. It was the sweat of a man
who could already feel the heat of the grill and had braced himself to
endure the flames.
He agreed so quickly that it was embarrassing for both of them. There
were rings of dampness beneath the arms of his charcoal Armani suit and he
left without shaking Nicholas’s hand, which was just as well because he
couldn’t seem to relax his out of a fist.
Silently, he followed the other man out, holding the door open for his
secretary as a courtesy she coldly ignored, preceding him out of the
conference room with only the harshest of thanks before taking her seat
next to Jay. He didn’t miss the dirty look she shot her, either.
Jay looked especially pretty today, with just a clip holding back her hair
and all those curls tumbling down her shoulders in a glorious fall of umber
shot through with silver. Normally, she kept it up and she was getting
second glances from men passing by in the halls.
People said all kinds of things behind his back. He’d heard whispers at
work, seen it in the papers, even had some of it said to his face. It came
with the territory of owning a company that brokered international deals
with the morally flexible and having a skirt-chaser as a father.
Jay had left before their family legacy had all gone up in flames. When
she returned, only the ashes were smoldering; he had been there for the
inferno, and seen all of his father’s so-called friends melt away while
everyone else kept their distance, waiting to see how it played out.
Seeing the devastation on her face had made his chest tighten,
reminding him of a time not so long ago when he had been the one to elicit
that look.
He had savored it then. Now, it made it hard to breathe.
At least some of the photographs had been taken on his property. He
hadn’t wanted to examine them too closely in front of her, but he
recognized the view and perspective on the one taken of them in the pool.
The photographer would have had to have been standing in the shadows of
those cypress trees that his father had put in to capture that angle.
He had checked the security camera that looked out over the drive, and
the side of the house, and after spending a few hours going through the
footage, he’d caught a glimpse of a stealthy figure making its way up the
walkway. They hesitated for only a moment before heading not towards the
front door, but to the immediate left. Right for the pool.
Like they knew exactly where to go.
Jay, the poor little bird, thought this was going to ruin their lives.
Thinking, no doubt, of the men like his father who would only be too happy
to imagine her in flagrante delicto.
“It’s not like we’re actually brother and sister,” Nicholas had pointed
out, which hadn’t been the comfort he thought it would be. She had just
looked away and sobbed.
He had switched to a different, more familiar tack. “If whoever sent
this really wanted to ruin our lives, these would be posted somewhere
already. Which means that they probably plan on bargaining with them. I
am very, very good at bargaining, Jay, and when I found out who did this, I
will listen to their terms and then I will fuck them so hard, they’ll wish
they’d never been born.”
She had laughed miserably but he’d gotten a small, wavering smile.
“You sound so scary.”
“That’s because I am.”
His first thought was that it was Jay’s own mother, who had been
ruthlessly pressing her for cash for weeks. When the calls stopped, he’d
been suspicious rather than relieved, though he hadn’t voiced his suspicions
to Jay. She also wasn’t very technologically inclined—he had a distinct
memory of ignoring her when she’d shouted up to him to help her program
the DVD player—and she had all the stealth of an airhorn. There was no
way she had taken these photos herself.
But that didn’t mean she hadn’t outsourced the work to someone on
Craigslist.
Then Jay, still in tears, had told him about her confrontation with
Michael outside his wife’s bakery-slash-restaurant, and the subsequent slap
—he would have paid good money to see that.
Right after he ran the two-timing double-fuck over in a fatal hit-andrun.
Anyone who knew them could have done it, though. It wasn’t a secret
where he lived, and plenty of people wanted to see them fall. As he’d told
Jay once, perfection was really fucking annoying. So was success.
But the VP role hadn’t been announced yet, and he’d never gotten close
enough to any woman in Hollybrook for Jay to be seen as romantic
competition. His address also wasn’t listed in the company directory and he
had never given it to any of his “dates.” He had been discreet. He had
always been discreet, even with Jay.
Michael had figured it out and his stepmother certainly had, so he
supposed others harbored their suspicions. But they were only suspicions.
Conjecture didn’t hold up in a court of law.
Even he knew better than to say “maybe it was your mother” when Jay
looked so fragile, though. Besides, the photos had clearly been taken with a
tele-photo lens and those weren’t cheap. Even if Danielle had outsourced, a
good photographer was likely more than she could afford.
So he had moved on to the next best solution, grabbing her on their
way out the door.
“Bring your dress to work. I’m marrying you today.”
“W-what?” She eyed him incredulously. “I thought we agreed that we
would wait until after all of the interviews were over so there wouldn’t be a
conflict of interest.”
“That was all you. Now, the situation has changed. You’re worried
about your reputation—and the public perception is very different for a
mistress versus a wife.”
“But that’s a terrible reason to get married!”
“There are no terrible reasons. Not where you’re concerned. Besides,
you’ve always known that I can be a little bit mercenary. I’m just staying
true to form.”
Jay hadn’t denied his words. She knew what he was like. And he knew
what she was like. Watching her fret, he was filled with the suspicion that if
he allowed Jay to her own devices, she’d be on the first bus out of town,
and he had no intention of letting that happen. She would be walking down
that aisle with him, even if the “I dos” had to come with their last dying
breaths.
By the time he got back to his desk, he had a whole page of emails
waiting for him. He jotted off a few quick replies to the ones that seemed
most important before redelegating the rest. Then he pulled out his phone.
Did you try the dress on?
Yes, she responded. And it fits. I didn’t think it would.
He had. As soon as he’d seen the dress draped over the back of the
embroidered chair in his bedroom, he’d known. She wouldn’t have arranged
the drape of the skirt so carefully if she hadn’t fallen in love with it.
I removed the outer skirt, she wrote. It’s one of those day-to-night
dresses. For dancing, I think. Did your mom get married in the 80s?
She did. She told me once that she wanted to look like the princess in
Swan Lake.
There was a pause. Do I need to sign anything for your lawyers? Like a
prenup?
You tore up a check for ten million dollars. If this is some kind of longcon, you’re playing it so well that even I can’t see the angle. And any lawyer
I hired to verify the contract would probably cost more than you’ve ever
allowed me to spend on you. So no, Jay. You sign nothing.
That’s surprisingly idealistic for a cynic like you, she responded.
I’m a romantic. Also, if you ever try to fuck me, I’m just going to fuck
you back.
I know. She sent an eye roll emoji. Nicholas Beaucroft fucks everyone
twice as hard as everyone else who tries to fuck him.
Say that to my fucking face tonight without stammering over the fucks.
I want to hear it.
She sent him a middle finger. He sent her a diamond, an eggplant, and
a bird.
I’m going to make you say it. ‘Daddy fucks me twice as hard as any
man who’s ever tried to fuck me, including my ex who couldn’t make me
come.’
I’m going to unmarry you.
Then I’ll just have to marry you again with an even bigger ring and
think of some even filthier things for you to say to me on our next
honeymoon.
I don’t recommend that. The diamonds fell out of my stupid rich person
nails. You’re already coming into this marriage at a $20,000 net loss. :(
A snort escaped him.
He heard her laugh echo through the office, though she quickly tried to
stifle it, looking around self-consciously as she covered her mouth in a
gesture he recognized all too well because he had seen it every time her
mother dressed her down for being herself.
I’m going to kill her mother.
Reluctant to end the conversation, he put his phone away and headed to
the conference room for his next meeting, where he was intercepted by the
VP of Marketing, who looked anxious as he wielded a slim folder like a
shield.
“Mr. Beaucroft? These are the quarterly profits you asked for.”
“I’m on my way to a meeting. Didn’t I ask for those two weeks ago?”
“Yes, you did. But one of the files got corrupted. We had to have IT
retrieve the data.” He cleared his throat. “Should I put it on your desk?”
“No. Those numbers are confidential. Shred the folder and send the
data to me in a spreadsheet. I’ll review it later.”
The man nodded, looking crestfallen, and hurried towards the copy
room. Nicholas looked over at Arthur’s office, but he was in a meeting with
a woman from Acquisitions and the two of them were talking animatedly.
As he passed, Arthur lifted his hand in a congenial wave.
Nicholas nodded back, before shutting himself into the main
conference room. The meeting was tedious and he really did need to speak
to Arthur, but when the presenter finally wrapped up their presentation on
their current roster of prospective, high value clients, Arthur was still in his
meeting, much to his annoyance.
Not wanting to hang around the door like a student at office hours,
Nicholas went back to his own office. At his desk, he opened one of the
bottom drawers and took out a burner phone.
Danielle hadn’t answered when he’d tried to call from the house, so he
hadn’t bothered with his cell or office phone, figuring she was screening her
calls. Smart enough to block his number but not smart enough to realize
that her proactive silence was an admission of guilt.
Not smart enough to realize that he could buy as many phones as she
could block.
She picked up on the second ring. “Hello?”
His hand flexed involuntarily. “It’s Nicholas. I understand that you’ve
been trying to get in contact with Jay about my finances. That’s
unacceptable to me. If you want to do business with me, you do it with me
—not her”
“Got her locked up in the attic?”
“It’s about seventeen years too late for you to still be pretending that
Jane Eyre is your favorite book. Or haven’t you already cannibalized
enough of her life?”
“What do you want?”
“The negatives of the photographs I know you sent.”
There was a brief pause. “I don’t know what you’re talking about.”
It was almost admirable, how well she lied. But he had watched her
con his father for years and knew her for the careerist bullshit artist that she
was: the kind who would sell her own firstborn child to save her own skin.
Someone waved at him through the glass wall of his office, trying to
get his attention. Nicholas spun around in his chair, making an impatient
brushing-off motion.
“Unlike you, I’m not a fucking adulteress trying to skate around an
infidelity clause. It’s nobody’s business what I do in my own house, and if
you think you and your two-bit Craigslist photographer can wring money
out of me with an outdated Nikon, I’m going to come after you so hard that
you’ll be pissing litigation.”
“So you’re threatening me,” she said, a little too loudly.
Was she recording him? How amusing. “It’s not a threat. It’s a promise.
Just like the promise you made to my father before violating it on top of a
freezer with a pool cleaner young enough to be your son. But that’s not my
problem. You can fuck every moron from here to Kokomo as long as it
means that I never have to hear from you again.
“What is my problem is you calling here, upsetting Jay, and making her
cry as you try to fuck up her life for what I have to figure is the thousandth
time. These photographs—which, I know, you’ve never seen before, it must
be nice to outsource your dirty work—are the last straw. Do not test me. If
you have the negatives, I suggest you give them to me. And if you don’t
have the negatives, you had better find them and still give them to me, or I
will make you very sorry.”
“You have a lot of nerve accusing me of anything when you were
perfectly happy to buy her from me yourself.”
The truth of that statement hit him like a wall. Because it had been
exactly like that, hadn’t it? Knowing he couldn’t lure Jay to himself
willingly, he had employed the same underhanded tactics to reel her in, like
a fly caught in a spider’s web. “What did you do with the money I paid you
for that?”
“I have expenses.”
He laughed harshly. “I just bet you do.”
“You never had to work. Not like I did.”
God, the fucking irony. He leaned back in his chair, looking down at
Jay at her desk. I had to work three times as hard. “Do you even have a
job?”
“Screw you.”
So that’s a no, he thought, pleased that he’d gotten to her. The more
unsettled she was, the more likely it would be that she’d screw up later.
“I’m having a hard time hearing you over this line. Perhaps we should get
together and discuss this in person.”
“I’m not having you over to my house.”
“Well, I’m not exactly dying to go to the Aging Barbie Dreamhouse but
you started this. And don’t even think about bypassing me to harass Jay,
who will be coming along with me when I come to see you, by the way.
She’ll tell me if you try to contact her.”
“Jay wouldn’t do that. She doesn’t like the way you talk to me. I’m still
her mother.”
Nicholas laughed. “You were her mother. But I’m taking care of her
now.”
“Yes, your father told me all about your sick little games before he
died. But she didn’t want you—then or now. What makes you think she
wouldn’t leave you the way everyone else did?”
And there it is, he thought.
“Because we’re getting married,” Nicholas said. “So either you set up
an appointment with my secretary or I’ll be coming to see you on my own
time—with my wife.”
He hung up on her outraged squawk, pleased. Now all he had to do was
sit back and wait to see how she’d react. However she was earning her
money now, he doubted it was legal. He could imagine her being in debt to
dangerous men who were twisting her arm for cash.
But he could—and would—twist a whole lot harder.
Arthur had finally finished his meeting and whoever had foolishly tried
to get his attention was nowhere in sight, so he seized the moment to head
to his CFO’s office.
As he walked, he glanced down at the little administrative hub below
the mezzanine where Jay was working busily. He felt a wave of jealousy.
He missed her gentle touch. Ever since she’d been swapped over to Arthur,
he’d started noticing the bumps in his schedule. Despite what Annica
thought, his days had never felt as seamless as they had been when they’d
been managed by Jay, and every time he’d had a meeting with her, the scent
of her shampoo had left him feeling drunk.
He swung Arthur’s door closed behind him, the sound making the older
man look up. His eyebrows bunched together briefly and then he smiled and
pushed his laptop back.
“Nicholas. What can I do you for?”
“I came to ask you for a favor.”
Arthur’s smile faltered. “What kind of favor?”
“I want you to be a witness at my wedding.”
“At your—oh, yes, that’s right. You and Jay.” Arthur blinked at his
laptop, as if surprised to find it closed. “Of course. I’d be happy to.”
Nicholas watched the other man straighten out his starched-looking
cuffs and wondered if his wife did his shirts. He wondered if Jay would do
his. The image of her leaning in as she knotted his tie popped into his head,
bringing with it the phantom sensation of her fingers grazing his throat, and
though he was not aware of it, his cheeks flushed.
“When is the wedding?” Arthur asked.
“Today.”
Arthur laughed. When Nicholas didn’t respond in kind, his smile
dimmed again. “Today? That’s rather last-minute notice for a wedding.”
“It’s not exactly a wedding. It’s a civil ceremony. I’ve been in love with
Jay since I was a kid.” Nicholas folded his arms behind his back. “She was
too good for me then. She’s probably too good for me now. But I lost her
once because I didn’t do right by her when I should have and I’m not
making that mistake again. We’re getting married this afternoon.”
Arthur toyed with one of his expensive fountain pens. He’d been
around at the company long enough that he’d still been working here when
his father had been alive. Sometimes, like now, Nicholas found himself
wondering how Arthur thought the two of them compared.
“She’s very worried about you,” Arthur said at length.
“I know.” He set his teeth. “I need to do this. Please.”
Arthur set down the pen. “I don’t see how I can refuse.”
“Thank you.” Nicholas headed for the door, darting another look at Jay.
“I mean that.”

Weddings were supposed to be the happiest day of your life.
Or at the very least, Jay thought, they weren’t supposed to fill you with
panic and doubt.
It had been an awful day, too. Ominously so. After getting hung up on
by one of Nicholas’s would-be investees and spending her morning
correcting spreadsheet errors and bad formulas, Jay was ready to hide in the
bathroom and never come out.
Soon, all eyes will be on you. No one will think you’re good enough.
She couldn’t shake off the terrified little voice whispering that this was
part of Nicholas’s revenge. That he had coaxed her into falling in love with
him just so he could shatter her heart.
“Jay?” An executive from one of the other departments was looking
down at her impatiently. “Can you photocopy these documents for me?”
“I was actually just getting ready to leave, but sure, I guess. Just leave
them on the edge of my desk and I’ll take care of them tomorrow morning.”
Annica huffed very quietly, and Jay turned to look at her.
“These are confidential figures,” the man said. “I can’t just leave them
sitting around. I need them done today.”
“Well, I can’t do them today.”
His face darkened. “Then what are we paying you for?”
“She’s not your assistant, Harold.” The deep voice came from behind
them both, with a hard edge that made a diamond drill seem soft by
comparison. “Or do we need to discuss the reason you’re unable to get your
own work done on company time without outsourcing it to the C-suite
assistants?”
Harold blinked and stammered out an excuse, clutching his precious
papers to his chest as he scurried away. Jay cringed, very aware of Annica’s
notice when Nicholas turned his attention back on her. “Are you ready to
go?”
“Uh, yeah. Let me just—um. Get my stuff. For my appointment.”
She could feel Annica’s stare as she tugged the bag out from under her
desk. She walked to the restroom at a clip. Why did I think this would work?
Surely, Nicholas wasn’t so cruel that he would get her all dressed up in
his mother’s white dress, only to abandon her at the altar, or wherever it
was you abandoned someone when it was just a civil marriage ceremony.
(You let me tie you up, blue jay. Don’t you trust me to take care of you
properly?)
She really didn’t care what he did to her body. She was more afraid of
what he would do to her heart. That the whisper of vintage silk against her
skin was just the first link in a chain that would bind her to him forever: a
man who could hate as fiercely as he loved, who did not believe in
uncertainties. Her polar opposite, some would say. Not the sort of man
anyone would ever imagine her with. Not the sort of man that she had ever
imagined for herself—
Until he made her.
The bathroom was empty and silent, except for a dripping tap. Sighing
in relief, she went into one of the stalls to change. Even without the outer
skirt, the dress had a lot of fabric. When Jay looked at herself in the mirror,
the low sweetheart neckline made her blush and throw on her coat.
Good thing we’re not going to a church, she thought.
The office blurred around her as she stepped back out into the hall,
holding the coat closed with the arm holding her purse as her eyes restlessly
scanned for Nicholas’s rangy silhouette.
He wasn’t there.
Jay braced herself against the wall, sucking in a sharp breath as she
tried not to cry. People glanced at her curiously and she turned her face
away, hoping no one would ask her if she was all right. No. He wouldn’t do
that to me, she thought desperately. He told me he loved me.
He promised he would never leave me.
A man’s hand gripped her upper arm and she looked up wildly, causing
one of the tears in her eyes to slide down her cheek as she found herself
looking into Nicholas’s cinereous gaze. She swiped at her face but she must
have looked awful because his softened.
“I was parking the car out front.”
“Okay,” she said in a small voice.
“I’m here now.”
Nodding, she let him lead her away. Most people were in meetings or
getting their late afternoon coffee, but in a company this big there were
always a few people somewhere, and the sight of their CEO with a crying
woman in a coat was bound to draw stares.
Stupid, Jay thought, that desperate feeling rising in her chest until it felt
as if she were about to burst. What the hell were you thinking?
“Deep breaths, Jay.”
She stumbled to his car like a sleepwalker, stepping back to let him
open the door for her. As she started to get in, she paused, blinking at the
sight of the champagne glasses in the cupholders and what was clearly a
makeshift bouquet on the front seat. White lilies, white jasmine, white roses
—had these come from their own backyard? She cradled them, stunned.
“Like it?” he prompted.
“Oh . . . yes.” Her voice sounded faint even to her own ears. She set the
flowers on her lap with a rustle, as the AC blew their sweet fragrance in her
face, and picked up the champagne flute uncertainly. “Is this alcohol? I
don’t think that’s legal.”
“Don’t make me drink alone on my wedding day, blue jay.” He held his
glass aloft as he got behind the wheel, heedless of anyone who could see
him waving his drink around like a madman. She clinked with him just to
make him stop and he knocked back the glittering gold liquid in a single
ravenous gulp. “Live a little.”
Jay sipped her own champagne, ducking every time they passed a car.
“I think you live too much,” she muttered, and he gave a playful pinch.
“That’s because you’re a little rule follower.”
“I used to be.” She set her empty glass back in the cupholder and
picked up the flowers, gripping the blooms so tightly that the petals were
shedding faster than she could breathe. “I think we’ve both fallen from
grace now.”
He put his hand—the same one he’d pinched her with—on her thigh.
As if he’s checking to see if I’m really here. “Show me the dress.”
“You’re driving.”
“The light’s turning. I’ve been picturing it all day. Lose the coat.”
A fresh wave of heat poured down her throat, which was already far too
warm, before radiating outwards in a wave of prickling numbness. As she
peeled coat off, she could feel his gaze as if it were melted candle wax
dripping over her skin, making her nipples bud against the silk.
“Fuck,” he said reverently. “You look like an angel.”
The car behind them honked, startling them both.
Jay tossed the coat in the back and Nicholas swore, hitting the gas hard
enough to propel them both forward. She couldn’t get that look out of her
head.
If only we didn’t have all this cruelty between us, she thought
desperately. If only he had never listened to his father—if he had been kind
—and honest from the start—
Her eyes went to the window, to the world beyond that now felt
strangely muted, and her eyes widened to see a familiar silhouette with
graying brown hair. “That looks like Arthur.”
She sat up, tugging at her skirt.
“I think it is Arthur. Nicholas, what is Arthur Hartwell doing here?”
“I invited him. He’s our witness.”
She glanced over and saw his eyes flick away; he’d been staring. “Our
witness?”
“You can’t get married without a witness.”
“When were you going to tell me that you asked my boss to be a
witness at our wedding?”
“I just did.”
She gave him a frustrated look that he pretended not to see.
Hollybrook’s city hall was a beautiful Victorian with a mansard roof
and white stucco walls. Once it had been a mansion belonging to a longdead member of Hollybrook’s distinguished elite, but they hadn’t had any
heirs, and the property had reverted back to the state. Jay vaguely
remembered her mother harping about it back when she ran with the
historical society. They had come here as a family for some kind of
fundraiser, though she couldn’t remember the details now.
Arthur smiled at them as they walked up from Nicholas’s car. This was
a far cry from the white wedding she had envisioned—she had imagined
something big, and white, and floral, with an audience packed with
nebulous friends. Dreams filtered down through her mother, who had
conflated pomp with affection and had often left her own daughter starved
at that glittering buffet.
The handpicked flowers and plastic champagne glasses were so
oppositional to his grandiose tastes, that Jay knew he had selected both
especially for her. Maybe that was part of being in love: finding someone
who made you feel brave enough to be the person you couldn’t be alone,
and who forgave you for what you did when you were.
“You still should have told me,” she said aloud, giving Nicholas a stern
frown.
“I should have told you.” Nicholas took her hand, turning it over in his
larger one before raising it to his lips. “But it’s not easy to think about
anything else when you look like that.”
Jay felt a traitorous blush rise up her throat. “That’s not going to work
on me.”
He nipped gently at her fingertips, letting his eyes drop to where her
breasts swelled rather indecently over the low neck of the dress. “It’s not?”
She yanked her hand back, folding it into her skirts as he tugged her
towards the city hall building with a grin as her face overheated beneath the
spring sunshine.
“Congratulations,” Arthur said, as they approached. “Jay, you look
beautiful.”
“Thank you,” she said, adjusting her grip on the flowers. She wondered
what he was thinking, how much of their interactions he had seen. This had
to be strange for him.
“She always does.” Nicholas gave her hand a squeeze.
Standing between these two men, with Nicholas holding tightly onto
her hand, made her feel very shy and very young. Which was ridiculous.
She was almost thirty-two. She wasn’t all that much younger than Arthur.
“Thank you, Nick.”
Nicholas tilted his head towards the doors. “Shall we?”
“Yes, let’s.” Arthur gestured in front of him. “You two go ahead. I’ll get
the door for you.”
Jay shifted her grip to Nicholas’s arm, which was firm and solid
beneath the wool suit. She could feel his heart pounding against her forearm
which surprised her. He didn’t appear outwardly nervous.
She was pretty sure she did.
He glanced down and looped his other arm around her waist. When she
felt him casually stroke her hip through the thin, rustling silk, she felt so
lightheaded that the officiant’s words seemed to come at her through a
tunnel when he stepped forward to greet them. She had already forgotten
his name, and he had to tell her three times where to sign her own.
“Just put your name here,” he said, a little exasperatedly. “Right on the
X.”
She gripped the pen extra hard to steady her shaking hand. Nicholas’s
signature was right above hers and it surprised her how messy his
handwriting was, given how precise he was about everything else. Hers was
the stiff cursive she’d been forced to learn all the way back in grade school,
when they were still being fed the lie that it would be used in college.
Nicholas, who was four years younger, had never been taught cursive
in school.
“Good afternoon,” the officiant said. “We are gathered here today to
join Nicholas Beaucroft and Justine Varens in the institution of marriage.
Do you, Nicholas, take Justine to be your lawful wedded wife?”
“I do.” His pale eyes burned like gas flames, lit up by the high beveled
windows. She remembered him telling her that he was hard to read but his
solemn expression still surprised her. He didn’t look like a man who was on
the verge of getting everything he wanted.
“And do you, Justine,” the officiant said, turning towards her, “take
Nicholas to be your lawful wedded husband?”
“Yes,” she choked, widening her eyes so the tears forming there
wouldn’t spill over. “I do.”
“And do you, Arthur Hartwell, give your consent that these two be
married on this day?”
“I do,” Arthur said.
“Then by the authority given to me by the State of California, I now
pronounce you husband and wife. Nicholas, you may kiss your bride.”
That was all the prompting he needed to lean in and give her the sort of
kiss that would have raised eyebrows in a church, nearly forcing her
backwards in his eagerness. Jay fell into it, until she remembered where
they were, and that her boss was standing right fucking there.
“Oh,” she said, pulling away, and covering her chafed and reddened
lips with her hand.
“Sir,” the officiant said, stumbling a little over his words as he turned
to direct his speech to Arthur, who had politely averted his gaze to a placard
announcing the date of the building’s construction, “it is now my privilege
to introduce you to Mr. and Mrs. Beaucroft.”
“Nice to meet you, Jay,” he said, and the cheesy joke diffused the
tension, making her laugh with weak relief after the jarring erasure of her
maiden name.
After some final paperwork and a clumsy shaking of hands all around,
they were free to leave. She was married. I’m his. She looked down at the
strangled flowers in her hands: her trembling grip had reduced them to
wilted stems. She couldn’t believe that the fight was over so quickly.
Or that it had been so bloodless.
“That was faster than I thought it would be.” Arthur caught up to them
at the door, echoing her thoughts. “Since I already told my wife I would be
late, I would love to take you two out to dinner—although I’d understand
completely if you would prefer to celebrate alone tonight.”
Jay’s face flushed. Is he implying—
“No, thank you,” Nicholas said, which made her face burn hotter. “But
we’ll take a raincheck.”
“My wife’s been dying to meet the man who makes me late for dinner
every night. I spend so much time at the office, she calls you the son I never
had.” His cheeks reddened a bit beneath the whiskers, like he hadn’t meant
to say so much. “Thank you for asking me to be part of your day.”
“You did me a favor.” Nicholas ran his fingers over Jay’s arm. “I
should be thanking you.”
Watching him leave, Jay said, “I can’t believe your father hired him.”
“He was only a manager when I took over,” Nicholas said. “He was
one of the first people I promoted.”
“No wonder he’s so loyal to you.” Jay put her hands on Nicholas’s—
her husband’s—shoulders and stretched to brush a kiss over his mouth. On
the sidewalk across the street, someone on a bicycle slowed to stare but Jay
made herself ignore them, straightening his lapel. “You chose well.”
“You’re blushing.”
“Yes, because your CFO implied that you might be too busy
deflowering me to get dinner.”
“He didn’t mean it that way. He’s just being nice.” Nicholas ran his
thumbs over the outer edges of her neckline. “And I’ve already deflowered
you.” His fingers ran down her sides, making her suck in. “Your heart’s
pounding. I can feel it through your dress.”
Jay gave him a defiant look. “Yes, well, to be fair, so is yours.”
A hint of color appeared on his cheekbones—is he embarrassed? Jay
wondered. “I don’t get married every day.” Turning from her, much to her
bemusement, he opened the door, waiting until she’d gathered the skirts of
her dress to her body. “Have some more champagne. It’ll just go flat.”
Jay let him refill her glass with far too much wine, too flustered to
worry about whether anyone could see. Her ring finger still throbbed where
he’d twisted the ring off, just to replace it on her finger after they had said
her vows. She fiddled with it, turning the little bird back and forth.
“What a day,” she sighed.
“Mm. Did you look at your ring?”
“Yes, it’s very nice.” She hoped he wasn’t about to tell her how much it
cost.
“I meant the inside. I had it engraved.”
“With what?”
“Take a look.”
As Nicholas peeled out of the lot, Jay twisted the ring off again,
wincing at the gouge of the tiny diamond-studded wing. When she held the
silver band to her face, she could see faint words etched inside. She
squinted, bracing her elbows on her knees to steady her hands.
“I am no bird, and no net ensnares me. I am a free human being with an
independent will.”
“I thought if you still didn’t believe my intentions,” Nicholas said,
staring fixedly at the road, “you might believe them coming from your
favorite book.”
“I can’t believe you remembered that.”
“It is your favorite,” he said, almost as a question.
God, she felt like she was about to cry again. “Yes, but that was ages
ago. When did you do this? I don’t recall this being here before.”
“The day after we watched the documentary about the planets. That
was when I realized that I couldn’t let you go. Not until you fell in love
with me. Not unless you agreed to be my wife.” At her stunned silence, he
said, “I told you you weren’t forgettable. I’ve been thinking about you
every day of my life since you first walked into it.”
He parked the car in the drive while her mind reeled with that
revelation, loping around the side to open the door for her the way he
always did. They didn’t go through the front door. To her surprise, he led
her around the side, past the same lilies, jasmines, and roses that had made
up her bouquet, and into the sunroom where she had arranged his mother’s
picture on the wicker table.
Nicholas already had his jacket off and had tossed it on one of the
chairs as they passed, the way he had so often done with his school jacket
as a child. Jay narrowed her eyes at him and he grinned unrepentantly,
already loosening his shirt collar. The sight of his tanned skin made her
stomach flip, and so did the smile he leveled in her direction.
She could almost imagine the words he’d engraved in her ring burning
into her skin.
“Are you going to come upstairs with me, Mrs. Beaucroft?”
The smile widened when she blushed.
“You’re taking the whole white wedding thing rather literally, blue jay.
I hope you aren’t going to make me chase you around the bed.”
“Nick.”
Laughing, he gave her hand a playful tug, drawing her up the stairs
with him. He was almost giddy. She had never seen him like this. Even as a
child, he had always seemed subdued, as if he thought any hint of joy
would cause the moment to be stolen from him. Now, happiness lit up his
eyes and gave his face a softness she hadn’t seen in years.
I could fall in love with this man, she thought. I could fall and fall and
never stop.
Without being any less dazed, a flicker of terror crashed through her
stupor like lightning.
The master bedroom had been cleaned—by him, she assumed, unless
he’d hired someone. A melting bucket of champagne sat on the nightstand.
She recognized the brand, and turned to look at him in shock. “How did you
set all of this up so quickly?”
“I drove over here on my lunch break.” Making work of the rest of his
shirt buttons, his dress shirt fluttered around him as he walked to his
expensive stereo and pressed “play.” Jay braced herself for hard rock and
was therefore surprised when one of the old songs she used to dance to
began to play instead. “Dance with me.” He held out his hand. “This time,
no one’s watching.”
Every doubt and fear she’d ever had slammed against her all at once as
his fingers closed over hers and he spun her towards him with an ease that
made her feel nearly weightless in his arms—as if she were some precious,
fleeting thing that might disappear without his grip to tether her to this
realm any longer. It was a covetous embrace he held her in, with the
scarcest amount of restraint, and when she leaned into him and braced her
hand against his bare chest, his fingers tightened over hers as if that
restraint was as fragile as her will to resist.
All those nights that she had cried herself to sleep, she had longed for a
love like this—a love so big that it consumed her entire world. But love like
that was terrifying, and when it had finally fallen into her lap she had
fought, and fought, and fought, because being consumed meant losing parts
of yourself that were no longer yours to keep, and reconciling with the
emptiness left behind.
But now there was only Nick—her Nick—swelling to fill up those
empty spaces in her aching soul, and she was so fucking tired of fighting.
So she told herself she wouldn’t.
Jay kissed him, cradling his jaw as her fingers spread to lightly trace
his ear. The passion between them had always been charged with violence,
and this gentleness crackled against her skin like static as the kiss became
less sweet, more demanding.
Her hand dropped to his shoulder, thumbing his collarbones, and the
hard planes of his chest, before slipping into his waistband to cup him
beneath his dress pants.
“Fuck.” He gripped her wrist. “I can’t last if you do that.”
But Jay noticed he didn’t pull her hand out. Pressing against him, she
said, “I need you, Daddy.”
With a snarl, he lifted her up and dropped her onto the bed, stepping
back to shrug out of his shirt before working the placket of his pants with
fingers made clumsy by his haste.
“If you’d said that to me back then,” he said, stepping out of his pants
and walking towards her nude, “I would have been your slave.”
Jay scooted back on his bed, heedless of how it made her skirt ride up.
“I wouldn’t have wanted that. Love shouldn’t make people into prisoners.”
“Always the proverbial good girl.” Getting on his hands and knees, he
slowly prowled up her body until he was straddling her thighs. “I hope you
don’t plan on fucking me like one.”
“I’m only as good as you make me.”
“I see.” He smoothed his callused palms over her thighs before shoving
them apart. “Then don’t be.” Hooking his fingers in her underwear, he
yanked hard enough that she felt the fabric catch and weaken before they
ripped. “I like you begging and slutty.”
The current of air between her legs made her gasp.
And then, so did his tongue.
She was forced to grip the headboard as he gave her the sort of kiss that
wouldn’t have been suitable for any sort of ceremony at all.
“Tell Daddy your new name,” he whispered between her legs, as she
trembled over that precipice of mindless, breathtaking desire. “I want to
hear it again.”
“Justine Beaucroft.”
With a low, satisfied rumble, he swung onto her hips and entered her on
a hard stroke. He seemed to take the recoil of her body as a fight, because
he pinned her hands down beside her face on the next thrust and held them
there. The dying light coming in through the window sparked off her
wedding ring in a flash of red as her fingers spread open beneath his.
“You’re mine,” he said, looking down at her.
Jay looked up at his handsome face and faltered, her staggered
breathing a match for the pace he was setting with each rock of his hips.
“And you’re mine,” she said, as a slight question.
He bent to kiss her; she could taste herself on his tongue as he took her
mouth the way he had taken everything else: in a single violent sweep. His
fingers laced more tightly with hers, and his heart was beating against his
chest like it wanted to crawl right into her own.
“I always have been.”

Chapter Seventeen

“You know you can’t force me to love you.”
Jay was wearing one of her old band tees from high school and these
little terry cloth shorts, both worn and a little ratty. He knew she was doing
it to show him how little all of this mattered to her, and he told himself he
didn’t care. If she wanted to dress herself in rags like some sort of LA
Cinderella, she could. All her clothes came off anyway when it was time to
fuck.
He folded his arms behind his head and affected what he hoped was a
look of careless disdain. “What are you talking about, Jay?”
“You might be able to blackmail me into having sex with you—but you
can’t make me love you.” She slid off his bed, one long leg at a time,
looking around his room with a dismissiveness that cut far more effectively
than his own because she was so achingly lovely. “Maybe one day, when
you’re on your third wife, you’ll understand why.”
Nicholas didn’t miss how she stumbled back from him when he stood
up. Third wife. Was that what she fucking thought of him? Could she be that
clueless? “I don’t plan on getting married,” he lied. “And if I wanted
forgiveness, I’d be in a church. But I’m not in a church, am I, Jay? And you
know there’s only one place in this house where I like to kneel.”
She bristled so obviously in distaste that his anger spiked.
“What’s the matter, little bird? Your pussy’s too good for me now? You
were happy enough to let me play with it when I was tongue-fucking you so
hard you couldn’t breathe.”
“I hate you.”
“Show me.” He took a step closer and when she jumped away again, he
told himself again that he didn’t care. Fear was better than love—his father
said so. Being feared didn’t make you weak. But the way she was looking at
him now scored him so deeply that he found himself thinking very briefly
that if this was strength, he didn’t want to be strong. “Get on your knees and
show me.”
The unhappy noise that she made was like a knife in his chest. She
reached for the hem of her shirt and he felt the belated pang of conscience.
“No, I don’t need that. Just your mouth.”
“You’re disgusting,” she said quietly.
He felt disgusting, in that moment. And for the first few seconds, as she
knelt down and began to do what he was forcing her to do, he hated himself
more than he had ever allowed himself to hate his father. But the hatred
made it easier to let this go on, too. Because the more Jay ripped at his
heart, the more he could tell himself that this was what he wanted all along.
(you’re disgusting)
His eyes snapped open and he breathed in sharply, his heart keeping
pace with the throbbing pulse in his neck. The dreams were receding,
leaving behind a heaviness that had become as familiar as a lover. During
those nine years that she’d been away, he had woken up hollow and
gasping, holding nothing but empty air; and then the memories of what he’d
done to drive her away burrowed like flechettes beneath his skin as the
coolness of the sheets beside him salted the wounds of her loss.
What if there’s nothing? He thought wildly, his body already bracing
itself for that familiar rejection and emptiness. What if she’s gone?
He rolled over and brushed something firm and warm.
It felt as if a pressurized catch inside his body had just been released.
Oh, thank god.
Nicholas traced her lips, which parted under his thumb, before touching
her cheeks, her nose, her throat—whatever he could reach, working his way
down her body like a blind man struggling to remember. Then he gripped
her hand until he thought her ring might draw blood.
“Nick? What are you doing?”
“Looking at you.”
“Why?”
“Because you’re here.”
“Wow. Okay.” She laughed, drawing the covers up to her breasts as she
rolled over to face him. There were lines around her bright eyes and slight
brackets around the corners of her full, upturned mouth. They gave her
beautiful face a comfortable, worn-in air that made looking at her feel like
coming home. She looked at him warily. “Good morning to you, too.”
“How are you feeling?”
“Like I lived to excess and have regrets.” She looked at the empty
champagne bottle, pressing her fingers to her temple. “You’re like the
devil.”
“If am, it’s only because you were begging so sweetly for my
corruption.”
“We’re going to be late for work,” she said, when he rolled her onto her
back.
“I could be persuaded to let you work from home.” The sheets rustled
as they were crushed by their bodies. He grinned down at her wickedly. “As
long as you wear a slutty uniform.”
Jay glared up at him. “Get off me, creep.”
“Stockings.” He smoothed his hand over her hip as she struggled and
failed to maintain her composure as he traced feather-light circles on her
inner-thigh. “A sheer blouse. No underwear.”
“Absolutely not.”
He thrust his fingers inside her, all the way to the second joint, and she
groaned.
“Fuck.”
“I love that little buzz.” He ground his thumb over her clit. “It’s so
fucking cute.”
Jay writhed beneath him and he tightened his grip, resting his chin on
her shoulder as she made those little sounds that drove him wild. She was
still the girl who slept beneath a canopy of sunflowers while dreaming of
men with cruel hands.
But now she belonged to him.
“Come for me,” he growled. “Come for your husband.”
Her body tautened beneath his before going limp, her chest heaving
beneath the thin layer of sheet. With her hair falling richly around her
flushed face as her head fell back, she looked so decadent that it took his
breath away.
“You’re going to kill me,” she said, still breathing hard. Her face was
all flushed. “God, what time is it? Oh my god.” She stared at the phone
screen in disbelief, wriggling free from his body. “We really will be late
now. It’s almost nine.”
“At the company I own.” He reached for his own phone, scrolling
through the emails as he gave his cock a few tentative strokes. His fingers
were still wet from her arousal and that dampness slicked his skin, blending
with his own. “Take your time.”
“Easy for you to say,” she grumbled, turning her back on him. “You’re
not angling for a new position.”
He half-smiled, looking up appreciatively at her retreating form, but his
teasing retort remained unspoken as he noticed that his private investigator
had finally gotten back to him.
Spotted a man leaving her apartment at 3am.
Did you get an ID on him?
No, got the license on his car. Having a buddy of mine at the DMV run
the plates. Shouldn’t take too long. He owes me a favor and I told him it
was for an extortion case.
Good. Put the bitch through the wringer. Make it hurt.
Nicholas collapsed back against the sheets as Jay appeared in the
doorway, wearing a prim little button-down blouse and high-waisted
trousers.
“You’re still in bed?”
“Mm-hmm.”
Jay flung his pants at him. “I thought you were an early riser.”
“I am,” he said deliberately, his smile widening with wolfish delight at
the way her cheeks reddened when she looked away from his waning
erection.
She threw a shirt at him. It sideswiped his face.
As he got dressed, he was aware of the little glances she shot his way,
pelting like hail against his skin. He grabbed a silk tie from his drawer and
purposely fumbled it, and just as he’d hoped, Jay stomped over and reached
up to fasten it properly around his throat.
“You’re hopeless,” she told him, giving the knot a final cinching tug.
“Hopelessly in love with my beautiful wife.”
She faltered, staring at him.
“This is the part where you return the sentiment, Jay.”
“I’m in love with my beautiful wife,” she echoed, and he spanked her,
making her jolt forward.
“Bad girl.”
Jay ducked her head but not before he saw the brief smile breaking
through her serious appearance like a crack. And he thought: Got you.
They held hands on the way to the car. When he adjusted the rearview
mirror before backing down the drive, he noticed her looking out the
window and followed her eyes past the garden, to the bare, denuded earth.
His father hadn’t seen much point in gussying the yard up for the
deliverymen, and now the path was choked by weeds and native scrub. It
had been like that for so long that he’d forgotten how it might look to an
outsider.
“It’s not much to look at, is it?”
“No . . .” She looked from him to the window and back. “It’s pretty
barren. It was like that even back then, wasn’t it? I remember it flooding
whenever it rained.”
“You can do the yard however you want,” he told her. “The interiors, as
well. I can give you the names of the people who did the furniture and the
décor when I last remodeled, and we can sell any of the art you don’t like.”
“What? Oh no,” she said. “Nick, I was just teasing you about the
jellyfish in the museum.”
“No,” he said firmly. “This is your house now. It should look the way
you want it to.”
“I really don’t mind it the way it is.” She fidgeted with her broken
purse. “I’d be happy to see to the landscaping, but you don’t need to gut
your house for me to want to live in it.”
He wondered if he ought to reiterate that taking his money wouldn’t
come at the cost of her independence. But then he remembered her words—
you don’t have to give me things to make me like you—and hesitated.
At various office parties, he’d heard the society wives talk as he
circulated the room. They turned their homes into passion projects, invested
in their appearance the way their husbands did in mutual funds, and spent
their husbands’ money just because they were bored. He was not entirely
sure how to deal with a woman who didn’t want to spend any of his.
“You’re going to need a car,” he said eventually.
Jay glanced at him. “Yeah. I suppose I will.”
“Another Honda?”
She looked surprised. “I’d love that. Thank you.”
“You mentioned your license expired. We can get it renewed this
weekend. Depending on how long it’s been, they might make you take the
test again.”
“I guess that’s a good thing. I’ll need one with my new name, anyway.”
She leaned back against her seat. “I should email HR today. Meghana is
going to love that.”
“You’re a Beaucroft, Jay.”
“Your name can’t protect me from everything.”
“Then I will. You don’t need to worry, seriously.” Nicholas threw the
car in park. “I’m going to take care of you. Say it.”
“You’ll take care of me,” she breathed.
He leaned over the console to kiss her and felt her lips part beneath his.
Yes, kiss me, kiss me like you can’t get enough of me, undo me thread by
thread until I just come fucking loose.
“You like that?” he whispered, and she nodded, looking a little drunk.
He ran his knuckles up her shirtfront before stroking her throat. He’d
gotten so used to the necklace, it was strange to see her with her throat bare.
I should get her a necklace. She gripped the back of his neck as she leaned
away, her eyes unfocused. Collar her. Make her mine.
No one is ever going to fucking hurt her again.
“How’s my lipstick?”
Nicholas tweaked her lower lip. “All gone.”
“Shit.” She took a tube of lipstick out of her purse and begin filling in
her full mouth with a dark plum. “You don’t have to wait in the car for me
anymore,” she added. “People seem to suspect we’re together, anyway. I
heard some people from Acquisitions gossiping about how you’re probably
sleeping with me a few weeks ago.”
“Why didn’t you say something?”
“Because I knew you’d be angry.”
“I’m not angry,” he lied, feeling a surge of warmth when she leaned
into him just a little as he stroked her warm cheek. At you, he added silently.
“We can discuss how we’ll conduct ourselves in public later. Just do
whatever feels most comfortable for now.”
“Okay.” She tugged her blouse down and centered her waistband as she
stepped out of the car. “I hope you can maintain that mindset going forward
because they’re going to talk about us a whole lot more now. Marriages are
part of the public record.”
“I could always issue some Q4 layoffs,” he muttered.
“Please don’t do that. If you fire anyone who looks at me funny, people
really will talk.”
They shouldn’t be looking at you at all, he thought, though he smiled
and nodded for her sake.
Let her think she’d won. She wasn’t ever going to see any of that
paperwork.
Jay turned and headed into the building at a brisk clip that she must
have adopted in the city. A man held the door open for her and Nicholas
rolled his eyes as he wiped her lipstick from his mouth. Her little fan club
would be very disappointed when they found out she was off the market.
He took the same path as Jay—my wife, he thought, which raised
goosebumps on his arms—stepping aside to dodge an intern who was
padlocking her bike. The usual clutch of kiss-asses from sales and
marketing were hovering by the door, comparing numbers, though they
swarmed him like lemmings when he came in through the door, eager to
schmooze.
Nicholas maintained a bland look and nodded until he didn’t feel like
nodding anymore, and then he made an excuse and left. Stacey was on her
way to get her morning coffee and shot him a wary look before hurrying
down the hall with her mug, her face slightly pinched.
He watched her with a lifted brow and then grimaced when he saw
something worse coming down the hall—Harold, his least favorite
executive.
“Mr. Beaucroft, hey—how was your weekend?”
“It was fine,” he said, with a note of irony only Jay would have
understood.
“I spent the weekend in Malibu. But I’m sure yours was much more
eventful.”
Was it supposed to hurt that he wasn’t burning the midnight oil in
overpriced surfer hell like a burner frat boy with a trust fund? “The
weekends just fly by.” His smile thinned. “Was there something you
wanted? I have a meeting in twenty minutes.”
“I just wanted to check in. If I need something, I’ll ask your secretary.”
“That’s what she’s there for,” Nicholas said, adding silently, for now.
He headed for the stairs, and on his way to the office he saw the man
swagger over to Jay and Annica’s station. He leaned over to talk to Jay, and
whatever he said didn’t appear to please her, because her shoulders tensed
and the smile vanished from her face as she responded.
Nicholas sat down at his desk and drew in a breath as he looked around
his domain. The room still smelled like the lemon carpet cleaner the janitors
were so fond of. Usually, he was able to ignore it, but now it stung his
sinuses like a brand.
His eyes went to his computer. He frowned. A newspaper was tented
over the keyboard, arranged so that even the mouse was covered. It was The
Hollybrook Herald. That was even stranger. It was a puff-piece pamphlet
paid for with city dollars by people who thought that local change was
terrifying. He never read it if he didn’t have to. Why the hell was it on his
desk?
Maybe one of the janitors was reading it, he thought doubtfully.
Then his eye caught on the title of one of the articles.
LOCAL CEO CAUGHT IN TABOO SCANDAL
Hollybrook, CA—Early last week, an anonymous source revealed that
Nicholas Beaucroft, local philanthropist and CEO of Beaucroft Assets, has
allegedly been involved in a clandestine relationship with his older
stepsister, Justine Varens, for the last nine years.
This revelation sent shockwaves through the community, particularly in
light of his father’s sexual misconduct, for which he stood trial for several
months following multiple allegations from his employees. The anonymous
source, claiming to be a part of the young CEO’s inner-circle, hinted that
the affair began with the family’s tacit knowledge, albeit against their
approval.
Since Varens is an employee at her stepbrother’s firm, the nature of this
relationship has sparked concerns on the morality of Beaucroft’s actions
and the implications of his perceived nepotism with regard to how it might
potentially affect the running of his corporation. This is not the first time
that this concern has been raised. In 2015, an ex-employee of BA wrote an
open letter to the CEO, alleging that BA was a hostile work environment
with little to no amenities.
One employee, who did not wish to be named, said of the incident:
“When she [Varens] first came here, nobody knew who she was or how
she’d gotten the job. She started as [Beaucroft’s] secretary, but then they
swapped her out to the CFO. Now, she’s vice-president. A jump up the
corporate ladder like that doesn’t just happen. Other people’s careers have
been toppled just so she could glide ahead. But I guess some people don’t
care who they stop on as long as it means they’re climbing to the top.”
A shareholder, who also wished to remain anonymous out of fear of
retaliation, said: “As someone with a stake in the company, who has relied
on his investments in the past, this news is incredibly distressing. CEOs are
supposed to be the figureheads of the companies they lead. They’re the face
that everyone sees. If Nicholas chooses to conduct his personal life with
such a flagrant disregard for his own reputation and conduct, that, to me,
raises serious red flags about his ability to steward his own corporation.
But then, he’s always been a little too comfortable strongarming people into
handshake deals.”
The news has caused other shareholders to wonder if Mr. Beaucroft
ought to step down. The anonymous shareholder continued: “We have an
expectation that company executives are always operating in good faith. If
a CEO’s behavior compromises that public face in any way, even during
their so-called private lives, the shareholders have a right to know these
details because the effects can be so public. When an executive’s personal
life impacts corporate governance and throws his moral and ethical values
into question, he’s saying he doesn’t care about the rules or the people he's
dealing with.”
Beaucroft Assets became a multinational corporation earlier this year,
but the anonymous employee hinted that there are whispers of clients who
have already begun pulling out due to the allegations of their CEO’s
conduct. When we attempted to reach out to BA for a statement, we received
an email from their HR department claiming that they would be “looking
into these allegations.” Nicholas Beaucroft and Justine Varens could not be
reached for comment.

Hi Meghana,
Nicholas and I got married this week and I didn’t see a name change
form on the company’s internal Wiki page. What is the procedure for getting
my last name updated in the system?
Also, do I need to notify someone else besides you? We want this to be
above board.
At least, she did, thought Jay, as she signed her name to the bottom of
the email and sent it off before she could second guess herself. It would
have to do for now. If she had made a mistake, she was sure Meghana
would correct her.
She twisted the ring on her finger. Nicholas must have had it resized
since he had attempted to present it to her nine years ago. At thirty-one, her
fingers were no longer as slim as they had been when she had been a young
girl fresh out of college. That should have disturbed her and it did a little,
but it wasn’t that much more invasive than anything else he’d done.
Keeping her childhood bed because he’d fucked her in it, hiring a PI to
stalk and photograph her, blackmailing her into being his mistress by
filming her getting off—even when he was a boy, he had lacked both
boundaries and restraint.
That morning, he had been holding her like he thought she might be
taken from him. Touching her with such aching tenderness that she had
feigned sleep so that he might do it longer. She couldn’t remember the last
time someone had touched her like that, with so much longing.
Like she was their whole world.
“Do you think you can make these copies for me?”
Jay looked up. It was that marketing executive that Nicholas had
chased away. Memory of his authority had apparently faded in his absence.
“I’ll see what I can do.” She didn’t bother to mask the sharpness in her tone.
“It might be faster to do it yourself. I have a full morning with Mr.
Hartwell.”
“And you don’t do what you do for your bosses for other people?”
The wording of his question gave her pause. “I’m Mr. Hartwell’s
assistant. Not the office secretary. I’m happy to show you how to use the
copier later but if I do, it’s going to be a courtesy and not because that’s my
job description.”
“That’s funny,” the man—Harold, she remembered his name was—
said. “From what I hear, you do plenty of things outside of your job
description for your stepbrother.”
Jay stiffened, shooting a sidelong look at Annica. Did she hear this?
But she kept her face angled pointedly towards her own screen, in a way
that suggested bomb blasts could be going off and she wouldn’t notice.
Either she had the best-noise cancelling headphones in the world, or she
wasn’t going to lift a damn finger to help.
“I’m not sure what that’s supposed to mean,” Jay said at last, opting for
a cold, no-nonsense tone. “I don’t work for Nicholas.”
“Just under him,” she thought she heard Annica say, but when Jay
whipped around to look at her in shocked anger, the woman still had her
eyes on her screen.
“Look, I don’t have time for this,” Harold say, with a nasty smile that
suggested he’d heard what Annica said, too. “Just make the copies.”
Just do this, do that, I thought you were a good girl.
People were always telling her how to behave and what to do, and
expecting her to just roll over like a beaten dog. Anger flared through her,
hot and dangerous.
She picked up the sheaves of paper, allowing the man one beat of smug
satisfaction, before ripping them right down the center with a neat twist of
her hands.
“What the fuck.” Harold dove to his knees to salvage his precious
documents while Jay turned to her desk, her hands shaking as she put them
in her lap. I can’t believe I just did that.
Harold stood, his posture menacing—familiar. She stared at the screen
until the bluish light wavered, remembering a time not so long ago when
her stepfather had put his fist through the wall.
(if you want to keep that pretty face)
“You’re as crazy as your whole fucking family.”
Jay jumped when her computer chimed. God, shit. She plugged in the
jack, silencing her computer as Harold walked away with a shake of his
head. Her heart was still beating a mile a minute and there was a highpitched ringing sound in her ears.
HR had sent her an email. Wow, that was fast. Jay was vaguely
surprised that Meghana was responding to a request for a name change
personally, when she had an entire staff at her disposal.
Please come see me in my office at your earliest convenience.
Dread sank into her gut like a falling stone. Had Harold run to HR?
And—what? she mocked herself inwardly. Complained that she’d ripped up
the documents after he’d made vaguely suggestive comments about
Nicholas and her family?
It’s probably about Nicholas. She darted a look at Annica as she rose up
on shaky legs. It’s always about Nicholas. The trek to the office felt longer
than normal as he brain spiraled with worst-case scenarios and doubts. Who
was the sadist who had designed this building so that you had to parade
yourself across the entire floorplan just to get called on the carpet?
And then she realized she knew the answer. It would be Nick’s father,
of course.
He was already there, standing over Meghana’s desk. Looming, the
way he always did. She wished he wasn’t doing it now. Even if the HR
director seemed immune to his tactics, any threatening behavior would
make whatever was about to happen worse.
This definitely isn’t about the name change form.
“Oh good.” Meghana spoke in a tone of decisive calm as Jay shut the
door behind herself. “Since you’re here, we can all begin.”
“Begin what?” Taking a cue from Nicholas, Jay didn’t sit down, either,
remembering how helpless she had felt last time when she had been forced
to remain seated while castigated like a child in front of all that yarn. She
held onto the back of the chair as if it would buoy her. “What’s going on?”
Meghana held up a newspaper. Jay recognized it. The Hollybrook
Herald—the one she’d been on the cover of just a few weeks before, not
that she went out of her way to read it. Damon had thought it was gossipy
trash and her mother didn’t read anything that wasn’t in Vogue, and
Nicholas seemed to get all of his news from his phone—
“What,” she began, confused, until her eyes focused on the first page.
There was a picture of her and Nicholas there, printed in black and
white. Not a recent one—not one of those pictures. Not even the one of her
in that silvery dress that she’d hated.
No, it had been taken on the night of her stepfather’s holiday party.
The night she had run away and never come back.
LOCAL CEO CAUGHT IN TABOO SCANDAL
“Oh,” Jay heard herself say, her voice cracking.
“This was on my desk this morning. I don’t know who put it there and
to be honest, it doesn’t really matter.” Meghana set the paper down beside
her colorful yarn decorations. “Someone took the liberty of circulating
copies around the office. At this point, I think it’s a safe bet to say that
everyone has either seen it or heard about it.”
Jay stared at that photo of herself in the rose gold-colored gown that
she’d hated. The look in his eyes. She hadn’t imagined it—Nicholas as a
young man who didn’t know how to mask his obsession. It was there on his
face, plain to anyone who cared to see it.
She supposed that there were plenty of people who would.
“The copier needs credentials to work,” Nicholas said. “Did you check
the log?”
“Yes. Someone used the interns’ code from the supply office.”
Jay made a sound. Nicholas started to go to her and the sight of him
visibly checking the impulse—for her sake, she assumed—had her sinking
into that stupid chair, after all.
“Given our last conversation on this subject and your litany of legal
issues, I had hoped that we had seen the matter of corporate malfeasance
reach a close. But it seems Jay’s new role in the company has now raised
concerns about favoritism in the workplace.”
“Spare me the pearl-clutching,” Nicholas said. “We’re all adults here.”
Jay started to glare at him and then did a double-take. “Wait—my—my
new role?”
“We were going to announce your promotion today. Mr. Hartwell made
a very strong case for your lack of experience in light of your other
considerable achievements. But now that this is out, we’re considering
either deferring the announcement and your promotion to the next payment
cycle, or until the blowback from this situation dies down. Or—” She
hesitated. “Going with another candidate. There were contenders.”
They don’t want you, that nasty voice in her head whispered. They
never wanted you.
“Don’t punish her for what I did.” Nicholas had moved. Now he was
standing right behind her, gripping the back of her chair. She could feel the
warmth of his fingers through her blouse. “There’s no need to denigrate her
contributions. It’s all above board.”
“Nobody is denigrating anyone,” Meghana said. “But we have the
company to think of. And I apologize for sounding harsh, but when you fail
to disclose a relationship that impacts the work environment, the situation is
very much not above board, Mr. Beaucroft.”
“It doesn’t matter. Jay isn’t going to be taking the fall for this.” She felt
him lean forward, both hands bracing on the back of her chair now. She
imagined he looked like an angry-eyed panther, ready to spring. “I raised
this company from the ashes. If you go through with this decision, I won’t
just step down. I’ll gut it. That could mean pro bono consulting with every
single one of our competitors, or it could mean a lawsuit for retaliation. I
got this position by being creative, and I plan on getting even more creative
if you force me to leave it before I’m ready.”
A look of panic flashed over Meghana’s face, as if she were
considering the damage an angry and inspired Nicholas could wreak. “Let’s
not be rash.”
“I’m not being rash. How did news of her new role get out in the first
place? We hadn’t even announced it to her yet.”
Oh my god. Jay’s hands fisted in her lap. He’s right.
“Arthur and I were the only ones who knew the names of the
applicants. And I only know because he discussed it with me briefly, in
passing. This suggests that there was a breach—or someone was given
access to Arthur’s office or files that shouldn’t have.”
His tone said very clearly who he blamed for that.
Meghana nodded stiffly, accepting the strike. “We’ve already
considered that possibility and have our security team looking into the
situation.”
“Are you? That’s interesting. Because I should have been informed of
this slanderous hit piece before you gave yourself the go-ahead to deliver a
canned response to the press.” His voice turned cold. “When I find out who
violated their NDA to go crawling to a reporter, they’re going to be fired—
and sued—regardless of their position with the company.”
“Security is reviewing the footage from Mr. Hartwell’s office and the
legal department has already signed off on dealing with this as a violation
of the company’s NDA. As soon as we have this vetted through the proper
channels, you’ll be consulted on every step of the outcome.”
“Let me make one thing perfectly clear.” The chair creaked as Nicholas
leaned forward again. “As long as I’m doing my job and the numbers look
good on paper, the perception of the slack-jawed public doesn’t really
matter to me. We’re not brokering auto shops and church bake sales here. I
could not give less of a flying fuck what John Q. Public thinks about how I
conduct myself with my wife when I’m making the company billions. They
don’t hand out your paychecks. We do. I suggest,” he finished, with a slight
growl, “you remember that.”
For the first time since Jay had met the woman, Meghana looked
surprised. “I’m sorry, did you say—wife?”
Nicholas reached down and grabbed Jay’s left hand, holding it up like a
trophy. Meghana’s brown eyes drifted from Jay’s hand to Jay herself and
then over her shoulder, to Nicholas. Jay cringed at the thought of what his
expression must look like right now.
But a small part of her thrilled at his fierceness.
“We got married this week. Clearly, the informant didn’t know that.
They got Jay’s name wrong.”
“I sent you an email.” Nicholas was still holding her hand and she
made no attempt to free herself, although she did shoot an uneasy glance at
Meghana. “This morning.”
“I didn’t see it,” Meghana said. “It’s been a busy morning.”
“Too busy to check your emails. That is concerning.” He stroked the
inside of Jay’s palm with his thumb. “Especially if you have the time to
schedule superfluous meetings that could have been proactively handled by
reading them.”
That was enough. Jay spread her fingers, gently breaking Nicholas’s
grip, aware even as she folded her hands in her lap that she was free only
because he had allowed her to be. “I told you in my email that we wanted
this to be above board—and we do,” she added, hearing his quiet scoff. “We
were hoping to keep this quiet for at least a little while but now it’s
affecting the work environment, you’re right. But a lot of that is because of
the paper being circulated. Someone made a suggestive comment to me
before I’d even settled down at my desk.”
“I’m sorry,” Meghana said, after a pause. “That’s unacceptable.”
“Yes, it is. Listen to your VP. She knows what she’s doing. And unlike
me, she’s going to be a lot more understanding about you reading the gossip
rags instead of doing your job.”
He let go of the chair and pivoted towards the door. “I expect to have
an email before the end of the day telling me how you plan to deal with this
in detail. Assuming we’re both still here.”
Way to drop that bombshell without diffusing it, Jay thought, her
frustration blending with concern and—yes, a little schadenfreude, too.
Nobody had ever defended her like that, not so viciously. She thought she
might like it. Too much.
“I’m sorry,” she said, as much as for Meghana’s sake as herself, before
hurrying after Nick. “Nicholas, wait,” she called out, and his steps slowed,
allowing her to catch up to him in the hall outside the HR office. Employees
from the Acquisitions department were beginning to trickle in and they
were getting a few sidelong looks. “I need to talk to you.”
“In my office.”
His office? Jay eyed the people who were making a very poor attempt
at disguising their interest. If she went into a room alone with him, there
would be talk. But on the other hand, there already was.
She had a flash of following him in there before, terrified that he would
use her as his little office whore but bound to follow anyway. He pressed a
button on his desk and the windows automatically became opaque. Jay
startled.
“I didn’t know they could do that.”
“Well, they can.” He leaned back against his desk, hands braced on the
surface. “What do you want, blue jay?”
The affectionate nickname softened the impatience in his voice. “You
can’t give up your job for me.”
“Why not?”
“Because it’s your job. You’re good at it. You enjoy it. I’ve seen your
face at those all-hands meetings, Nicholas. It lights you up.”
One of his eyebrows had lifted challengingly, but as she spoke, she
recognized the stubborn set to his jaw as he pushed off from the desk. “It’s
not my job that ‘lights me up.’ It’s you. You’ve given up so much for me.
What if I want to be the martyr for once?”
“Because you can’t fix the past by . . . by martyring yourself on it.” Jay
shook her head desperately. “Is this about what you said by the pool? Your
idea of a big sacrifice? I don’t want that.”
“Do you want the job?”
“Not at the expense of your career!”
“No, I’m asking you, Jay. Do you want the job?”
She glared up at him heatedly. “Stop trying to make me punish you. I
told you I wasn’t going to co-sign your stupid decisions!”
“This isn’t punishment. They’re not going to let me go without cutting
me some kind of deal. We’re a multinational corporation and I’m me. Do
you think those shiny new deals I brokered are going to last if the CEO
suddenly disappears? Meghana’s probably on the phone with Legal right
now, trying to conjure up some golden handcuffs to bind me to them right
now.”
“My god,” Jay gasped. “You’re evil.”
“It’s a fuck or get-fucked world out there, Jay. I didn’t get where I am
today by letting people bend me over a table. You, on the other hand, insist
on seeing the best in everyone, even when your ass is in the air.”
“Nicholas!”
“It’s a very cute ass.” He flicked her nose, his smile widening into a
grin when she smacked his hand away. “I’ve seen people here fall over
themselves trying to please you. I think they’ll try even harder when they
come crawling to you for comfort after dealing with me.”
Jay wasn’t sure whether she wanted to laugh or scream. “Please tell me
you didn’t threaten Arthur into giving me this job.”
“Of course not. Just a strongly worded suggestion.”
“Oh my god.”
“You deserve it. You’ve always worked harder than everyone else.
Three times as hard—isn’t that what you told me?” His eyes flicked over
her. “I can believe it.”
“I didn’t ask you to do this.” She shook her head. “I didn’t want you to
do this.”
“Look, I told you that hard work didn’t matter, but that was before.
Back when my father was buying me off like some kind of insurance policy.
Bailing out this company like a sinking ship changed my thinking. I don’t
want some corporate pencil-pusher managing my operations division like
it’s just another rung on the corporate ladder. I want someone who will
fight.”
“What if you lose your job?”
Nicholas shrugged. “Then I sell the house and buy you a vegan bakery
or something.”
“You can’t do that.” She felt as if she were speaking through a
mouthful of Novocain. “You can’t just sell your house and leave, just like
that.”
“I don’t think you understand how much money I actually have, Jay.”
Oh god, Jay thought. He’s right.
“You know,” Nicholas said, lowering his voice confidingly, “half of it
is yours. Or do you still not realize that?”
“I realize that,” she snapped.
“Because you’re acting like you think you still need to budget for a tiny
little apartment with bars on the windows.”
He’s so arrogant. That entitlement was like something out of another
age, when men could own land stretching beyond what the eye could see.
And then Jay thought of how he had defended her, and his unshakable
faith in her. She wasn’t sure it was warranted but it still made her feel good,
because nobody had ever told her that it was okay to yearn for things that
seemed beyond her reach.
Before she was quite aware of doing so, Jay closed the distance and
wrapped her arms around his slender waist. The muscles of his back
stiffened beneath his suit.
“What are you doing?” he asked, in a careful voice.
“Hugging you, idiot,” Jay mumbled, hugging him harder, burying her
face in his throat the way he did, whenever he inhaled against her hair.
“Even though your plans are stupid and I think you might be insane, the
way you defended me today made me want to kiss you.”
“Of course I defended you.” His arms folded awkwardly around her
body, in stark contrast to the smooth elegance of his usual gestures.
“Anyone with eyes can see how hard you work.”
She managed a brave smile. “Part of the reason I worked as hard as I
did was because sometimes it felt like that was the only thing keeping me
afloat. I was so afraid . . . that no one would step in to save me if I stopped
flailing.” She paused. “But you would.”
“Every time.” His lips brushed her brow. “Until my heart stops.”
Jay nearly shuddered when he pushed her gently back.
“I thought—when she showed us the paper, I thought it would be the
photographs.”
The gentleness vanished from his face like evaporating mist. “Yeah, I
think we’re going to have to talk to your mother about that. I had a PI
looking into her. The same one I used for you. He’s thorough, and he told
me she’s seeing someone.”
The same one he’d used for her. He said it so casually, so shamelessly.
“Who is she seeing?”
“I don’t know. But she’s not smart enough to come up with anything
this elaborate on her own, which probably means that whoever she’s with lit
a fire under her ass.”
“You want to confront her,” Jay said, reading his expression.
“Do you not want me to?”
“No.” Jay realized that could be taken for denial and shook her head.
“She made her choice a long time ago. The weekend she let me think she
was dead so she could hook up with your dad—that was the day she made it
clear that she would never choose me. If she is behind this—” Jay steeled
her shoulders “—if she sent me those pictures, I will never forgive her.”
“Don’t worry. She knows she won’t get her money if we think we have
nothing left to lose.”
“Was that why you did it?” Her voice was quiet. “When you
blackmailed me?”
Nicholas studied his tinted office windows with his wintry eyes,
folding his arms. “I thought you didn’t love me anymore. And I wanted you
. . . so badly. I didn’t want you to leave.”
“I never understood what made you want to hurt me.”
“I thought if I made you stay, I could force you to love me back. But
the more I took from you, the emptier I felt—and the more you shoved me
away.” He laughed bitterly, shaking his head at the blinds. “I really was a
waste.”
“You were a cruel and vicious boy who got everything he wanted.
Someone was going to have to say no to you eventually.” She leaned back
on the edge of his desk, crossing one foot over the other. “I hate that you
made it be me.”
“I’m not a nice man, Jay. But I love you. And I want to do for you what
neither of our parents did for us. Protect you, take care of you.” He stalked
closer, making her suck in her breath. “And now that I know that you love
me back, there’s nothing I wouldn’t do for you.”
“I know,” she said, a little anxiously. “You’ve told me. I believe you.”
“No.” He bent slightly, so they were face to face. “Not just in the
office. Anyone who has ever kept you up at night, I can destroy.” She
gripped the desk tighter as something too dark to be arousal blazed through
her veins. “Do you want to get back at your mother? Your friends? You’ve
only seen me at the very best of my very worst. I can show you what I’m
capable of when I’m not holding back—and I will win.”
Jay had a piercing realization of what the serpent must have sounded
like while cajoling Eve into tasting the apple; it must have tasted like the
sweet violence he was promising her now.
She turned her face away, conscious of the closed door and the buzzing
silence and the slight kiss of arousal on her inner thighs. Even in this steel
and drywall bubble, they were not beyond judgement.
“I don’t want to hurt her,” she said uncertainly, still turned away.
“You don’t need to hurt her to make her hurt.”
She thought of all the times her mother had made her feel worthless.
She might not have raised a hand to her, but her words had been like the
slow death of a thousand cuts. And she had swallowed down all those
insults like bitter medicine, thinking that her mother had surely known best.
And then she left me alone. She hurt me on purpose because it made
her feel bigger when I was small. She treated me like I was nothing. And
then she sold me—like I was nothing.
She looked up at the man her mother had sold her to. He looked back at
her, and she saw that radiant chill in his eyes thaw by just a few degrees,
like a teasing glimpse of sun in a storm.
Then he bent to her ear and whispered, “Let Daddy take care of it.”
“Okay,” Jay said, sounding only a little shaky.

Chapter Eighteen

When she was young, she used to have the same recurring dream. She
was looking for her father and he was singing to her, and she knew with the
logic of dreams that he would only come back to her if she could remember
the lyrics. She had to remember the lyrics.
But she could never remember how the song went, and he never came
back, and Jay would wake up with tears in her eyes and a stinging sense of
failure that she could never put a name to. Lying in the warm bed, with one
of Nicholas’s heavy forearms draped around her waist, she felt the fleeting
vestiges of those feelings even now.
They whispered, You’re not good enough to be loved.
Looking at Nicholas put an ache in her throat. Being with him made
her feel for the first time in her life that she could be enough—and not just
for him. For herself, too.
That was terrifying.
She ran trembling fingers along his jaw, rasping over the sawtooth
blades of stubble. The shape of his face was as familiar as her own, with
those vaulted cheekbones that were sharp enough to gouge and a prominent
nose that he spent far too much time looking down at others with. And that
mouth, she thought. It was a wicked, sullen mouth that did terrible things to
her heart.
“Please don’t hurt me again, Nick.” She touched his nose, thinking
about the way that he was always flicking hers with such irreverence. “Can
you do that? Can you just—love me?”
His fingers flexed at her hip, but otherwise, he didn’t stir. He would
soon, though. The rise and fall of his chest was steady and his breathing was
too shallow for deep sleep.
“Thank you.”
Impulsively, she pressed a kiss to his nose before sliding out of his
arms and quietly creeping to her own room. She didn’t look back, so she
didn’t see his eyes open, following her as she left while his fingers ghosted
the path hers had taken.
Jay fed her anxiously pacing cat and patted his butt the way he liked
before sliding her arms into a floral blouse and doing up the buttons. As she
clasped on a statement necklace that she refused to believe was out of
fashion, she studied herself in the mirror.
It wasn’t the loss of Danielle she grieved so much as the loss of a
mother who had never really existed at all. She had made excuses for that
mother, but every time she stayed out late at night, it wasn’t because she
had been trying to provide. She had been looking for a way out—with or
without Jay. And when she had needed her mother most, her mother had
chosen without.
Maynard was scampering around the kitchen and kicking up his heels,
so Jay fed him, too. He was an excitable dog, and was beginning to get
quite large. Sometimes Nicholas had to walk him three times a day, and Jay
would quietly go to the front door to watch their shapes disappear around
the curve of the hill, her stomach flipping when he would bend to ruffle the
dog’s ears.
The only thing the dog liked more than them was the cat, who stayed
locked in Jay’s room. He would claw at the door like a creature possessed,
while her cat’s little shadow floated back and forth beneath the gap in the
door, hissing audibly.
I bet he’s lonely, she thought, as the puppy sniffed her hand with
interest, detecting hints of the cat he could smell but never see. She smiled
when he licked her and scratched behind his ear, watching him kick out his
left leg in a rhythm of pure blissful joy.
“I get lonely, too,” she told the dog. “But maybe none of us has to be
lonely anymore. Wouldn’t that be nice?”
“Jay.” She jumped guiltily, falling back on her ass as Nicholas placed
his briefcase on the kitchen table. The puppy gleefully took advantage of
her discomfiture by jumping into her lap. “You ran away again.”
She set the puppy to the side and got to her feet, straightening her shirt.
“The cat was hungry.”
He looked at her, with an expression that clearly said, I might be, too.
When he slid a hand into his pocket and strolled over to her, her body
thrummed in anticipation.
“This is pretty.” He fingered her statement necklace, lifting one of the
pink rhinestones.
“It’s just a necklace,” Jay said, looking down at his hand. “I brought it
back with me from the city.”
“Would you wear something like that for me?”
“A necklace?”
“No. Something that will go with the lace you wear for me at night.
Delicate and sweet—until it’s not.” He gave a tug on the rhinestone.
“Something that tightens when I pull on it.”
“O-oh,” Jay heard herself say faintly, as his fingers drifted harmlessly
down her blouse.
“I like that reaction.” He pulled away with a grin, which faded when he
realized how stiff she was. “What is it? What’s wrong? You don’t want the
necklace?”
“N-no, that’s fine—” she flushed. “They’re announcing my role today
and I’m just really nervous.”
And now her head was full of explicit images, thanks to him. She
shook her head side to side, trying to dispel them.
“I’m worried about how people will take it after that article.”
“It doesn’t matter how they take it. You’ll be the smartest person in that
room.”
The praise made her smile unwillingly, even as she searched his face
for deceit. Absently, she reached up to fasten his crooked shirt collar, before
taking the silk tails of his unfastened tie and knotting them beneath his
throat. He smiled at her. The smile was not reassuring.
“You’re not going to scare them into respecting me,” she said, partially
as a warning.
“It isn’t my fault most people listen to me when I tell them to do
something.” His hand smoothed down her back, which would have been
sweet, until he squeezed her ass. “You happen to be the lone exception to
that rule, little bird.”
She pushed his hand away from her butt. “I listen to you when you’re
being reasonable. I just also call you out on your toxic bullshit.”
“It’s a simple, reasonable equation, Jay. If they’re afraid of me, and
you’re not afraid of me, why are you afraid of them?”
It was a good point and she was mildly annoyed that he had made it.
“Just don’t meddle.”
“Trust me. I told you I’d take care of everything. All you have to do is
pass the probationary period.” He scrolled through his phone. “I’ll send you
a picture of the necklace I’m having made for you later. I think you’ll like
it.”
“You found one already?”
“You shouldn’t leave me alone in bed in the mornings. I get very
distracted when I’m horny.” He gave her ass another grope. “Come on.”
She tried not to fret over what he might do on the car ride over, while
she kept absently nudging his wandering hand off her thigh. Nicholas’s
method of taking care of things tended to be oppositional to hers and
sometimes it got people hurt.
But when Annica gave her the cold shoulder, refusing to even look at
her, it was clear that she had not only read the article but believed every
word. She was still stinging from the looks she had gotten from some of the
other female employees in the bathroom that morning, and the mocking
laughter that had followed in the wake of her departure.
Maybe Nicholas is right, and there is something to being feared.
“Jay,” Arthur said, “does that clarify what the transition plan should
look like?”
“Yes,” she lied, too cowed to admit that she hadn’t been paying
attention.
“Good. I’ll forward you the 30-60-90 plan Nicholas had drafted up for
our last executive hire. But as a very quick debrief, the plan is to have you
in your new office within the week.”
“So quickly?”
He nodded. “Annica can take over your duties while we interview
candidates to fill your role. By the two-month mark, you should be making
most of your decisions independently, and in about three months, the
training wheels will be off, and you’ll be a full-fledged executive with all of
the responsibilities that entails. Which reminds me, did you sign your new
NDA?”
Jay nodded, thinking, Provided that I pass the probationary period.
Nicholas had explained in the car that this was the only way the board
would go for it, given her lack of experience. No matter how prettily they
spun the narrative, she was a risk. If she failed, they would replace her with
someone more capable and Nicholas would lose his job, or so she assumed.
He hadn’t actually said that, but the fortunes of many powerful men were
riding on his shoulders.
She swallowed hard and forced her smile around her unease.
“On the third Wednesday of every month, we circle up and discuss
various pain points within the company. Sometimes people will share team
updates or brainstorm ideas. The meetings are always very loose and fluid,
following a freeform structure. I thought it would benefit you to attend the
one that we’re having today.”
“Yeah, sure. That makes sense.”
“Do you have any questions about what we expect for you?”
“No, um, you’ve been very clear.”
“Then I think we had better head over now.”
They walked side by side to the massive conference room that Nicholas
had used to take her into whenever they went through prospective clients
together. A little shiver passed through her when she saw that he was
already there, his head bowed as he talked to the head of security.
“Odd,” Arthur murmured. “I wonder what James is doing here. He
never attends these meetings.”
Nicholas caught her staring while he was nodding along to whatever
the other man was saying, but his mouth crooked up at one corner. Then
James took his leave and Nicholas took his seat, causing the chatter to drop
by several decibels. A couple of people looked at her curiously.
Arthur put his hand on her shoulder gently propelling her forward.
“Everyone, this is Jay, our new VP of Operations. Some of you may have
met her before,” he added, acknowledging her change in status. “Jay,
perhaps you’d like to say a few words before we kick off this meeting?”
Fuck, they hadn’t prepared her for this. She glanced around the table in
alarm, her eyes bouncing over everyone except Nicholas, who gave her
another one of those subtle not-quite-a-smiles. Nobody was being
outwardly hostile—especially not with him in the room—but some of the
executives stared a beat too long and she knew from the way their eyes
narrowed what they were thinking and why.
“H-hi,” she said. “I’m Justine Va—ah, Beaucroft,” she corrected
herself. “I’m a Cal alum and I’ve been with BA for the better part of a year
now.” She fought the urge to duck her shoulders and make herself small, the
way she always had whenever people looked at her too long. “Before I
came to this company, I worked at a small luxury home goods manufacturer
in the Financial District of San Francisco. My role there was largely
administrative, too—at least in the beginning. But I worked my way up, and
that was where I got my experience managing to the operations and
financial health of a business.”
Her eyes darted to Nicholas again. She had his full attention. She had
everyone’s attention but it was his that made her cheeks warm as she set her
shoulders and kept going. “You already know my husband—” her voice
cracked, and a few people looked away “—I’ve heard the rumors
circulating and I’m willing to acknowledge that our relationship probably
makes my presence here seem questionable to some of you, but I plan on
working very hard to prove to everyone that I deserve to be here. I promise
that I won’t let any of you down.”
A long, frozen silence followed her words. A bead of sweat rolled down
her spine. Arthur saved it, by saying, “Well said, Jay,” and clapping, and
slowly others joined him. It was the most tepid accolade she had ever
received but at least they weren’t booing or sewing a scarlet letter to her
chest.
After her cringing introduction, the talk shifted to the promised
department updates. Jay listened to the various executives give perfunctory
reports of their metrics before launching into their lists of grievances with
far more gusto. Jay struggled to look competent and interested, even as she
wondered how many of these “operations” would actually fall into her
court.
When she dared to look over again, Nicholas was on his phone.
She felt drained and useless dragging herself back to the desk that
would only be hers for another week before she got an office of her own.
Annica wasn’t at her seat and her desk appeared to have been cleaned—
ruthlessly so. All of her various knickknacks and photos were gone.
Her eyes swung to Nicholas’s office. He wasn’t in there.
Back-to-back meeting? It wasn’t uncommon for his day to be stacked
—she knew that from managing his schedule—but a bad feeling nipped at
her like a biting fly. He’d seemed so distracted in that previous meeting.
And what was that about with Security?
Is everything okay? she asked him.
Don’t worry about me. Tell me what you think of this. It’s a mock-up.
He sent her a picture of a silver chain necklace that had a bunch of little
charms dangling from it: a big sphere of citrine surrounded by smaller
spheres of onyx, heliotrope, kyanite, and what appeared to be pallasite, with
small chunks of olivine crystal,
Is it space-themed? she asked, looking at the meteorite.
They’re the planets from your documentary.
Jay stared, her breath leaving her in a rush as she belatedly recognized
them all: the irradiated desert planet; the one that was half-lava seas and
frozen volcanic rock; the hurricane planet with diamond rain; and a real
chunk of space, meant to sit frozen against her skin.
(Can I watch the world burn with you?).

Nicholas sat with his laptop out in front of him, tucking his phone
away. There was a document open on the screen but it was mostly there for
reference: he had been preparing for this meeting for weeks now, with an
attention to detail that would impress even Jay.
And he was so looking forward to it.
James entered the room, standing against the far wall. One of his
subordinates had already been to Annica’s desk, cleaning it out and
revoking her credentials—after copying her hard drive. If she did somehow
make it back to her desk before she was escorted out of the building, she
wouldn’t be able to access her computer. It only took one spiteful employee
with a magnet and a grudge to learn that lesson.
He watched her adjust her headphones, taking her time making sure
everything was arranged just so before walking down the hall. A fastidious
little control freak, he thought. There was a notepad under her arm and her
face was expressionless as usual, although he didn’t think he was imagining
the new undercurrent of distaste whenever she looked at him.
The feeling was mutual, though she’d be finding that out for herself
soon enough. His smile hardened as she walked in. Her eyes flicked
uncertainly to James as she sat down, opening her legal pad to a fresh page.
When the seconds ticked by and he didn’t kick off the meeting or introduce
his “guest,” she began to squirm, dog-earring the page and working it back
and forth.
“Do you know why you’re here?” Nicholas asked, after several
minutes had passed.
“No. You didn’t send me a calendar invite for this meeting. Was there
supposed to be a brief attached to it?”
Nicholas leaned forward, pushing his laptop to the side so that there
would be no obstructions between them. “This isn’t a meeting. Let me
enlighten you on why you’re here today. We have security footage of you
making unauthorized use of Arthur Hartwell’s computers after hours to
access confidential documents.”
“What?” The shock in her eyes could have been convincing if not for
the panic.
“We also have footage of you going to the photocopier before hours,
using credentials that weren’t yours—seemingly to circulate copies of The
Hollybrook Herald’s front page amongst staff. I don’t think I really need to
specify which issue.”
The color faded from her face. He relished it; he’d been planning his
revenge since the day she’d demanded a promotion, figuring he could get
her slapped with a performance improvement plan after catching her in
enough mistakes. But corporate malfeasance?
That was so much better.
“Additionally,” he began, drumming his fingers on the table, “I’ve
managed to obtain a transcript of a conversation you had with a reporter
from said newspaper. Not only were you foolish enough to have that
conversation during work hours, you fed him information that violated your
NDA and slandered me.” He raised an eyebrow. “That looks a lot like
retaliation.”
“I get a lot of phone calls. Any one of them could have been a
reporter.”
“Don’t give me that shit. I have proof. He was eager enough to sell you
out after I called his boss and threatened to pull my funding if he wasn’t
fired. Several of that paper’s biggest advertisers are clients of this firm. But
I suppose you knew that already, being so good at your job.”
Her shoulders sagged and she threw a look at the door. “Whatever you
think I did, I can explain.”
“I’m not interested in explanations. The consequences of your actions
speak loudly enough. I already know you met with Michael Valdez, that he
fed you information that you then leaked to the reporter. I have photographs
of him slipping you cash before you both left the Bayview. And since I
happen to know for a fact that you aren’t his type, I’m guessing he was
paying for a different kind of fuck.”
That made her lurch back in her seat. “You can’t let him talk to me like
that,” she said, appealing to James, as if expecting agreement. “That’s
harassment.”
Nicholas could see James’s subordinate boxing up her things, including
those meticulously placed headphones. Jay wasn’t there to see it, of course.
She was in another development meeting with Arthur—he’d planned that
out, too. Everything was shaping out perfectly.
“Harassment,” he repeated. “That’s an interesting choice of words,
coming from you.”
“W-well, what about you?” Too angry to maintain the illusion of
ignorance any longer, she rose to her full height. In the corner of his eye,
Nicholas saw James tense. “Everyone knows that you’ve been playing
favorites with Jay. Your own stepsister—who you’re obviously sleeping
with!” Her voice, which had been rising steadily, became shrill. “You
wouldn’t even consider my promotion, but you’ll pour company resources
into paying off your office mistress, even though I’m way more qualified
than that wh—”
“Don’t.” Nicholas pressed his hands flat to the desk as he stood. “You
were not more qualified. You were complacent and vindictive. And rather
than address your own shortcomings, you denigrated another employee.
You didn’t get the job because your performance wasn’t up to par.”
“Or maybe it wasn’t the kind of performance you were looking for.”
He smiled. She flinched.
“James will escort you out. Don’t bother stopping by your desk for
your things. They’ve been boxed up already and will be mailed to the
address you provided on the day of your hiring.”
“You’re—” Annica flicked a wild look at James. “You’re firing me?”
“I already have. For violating your NDA and sabotaging the company.”
He allowed himself the privilege of a sneer. “Good luck with your future
employment.”
James shepherded her towards the door, and Nicholas followed,
watching the man march his ex-secretary out. His third secretary to leave in
as many months. He had flashbacks of Crystal’s voluble departure—when
she’d called him heartless, screaming it for everyone in the office to hear.
The other employees were watching with interest, sensing blood in the
water. Jay was back at her desk and looked up when the shadows of James
and Annica fell over her desk. The other woman seemed to find that
provocative. Nicholas took several steps forward but Annica had already
lunged, aiming not for Jay herself but her cup of coffee, sending it flying
with a single, well-placed swipe before James grabbed her by both hands.
Jay jumped to her feet with a yelp as hot coffee dripped down her pants
and blouse.
“Enjoy the victory,” Annica snarled over her shoulder. “Little Miss
Slutshine.”
The whispers in the room got louder. A few people exchanged halfsmothered grins that quickly disappeared when his harsh gaze swept over
the open floor plan. Eyes dipped and they got back to work, or pretended to.
Jay stared after Annica. His anger spiked at the look on her face—lost
and devastated, but also so unsurprised—and he had to suppress his sudden
desire for violence.
Not now, he told himself. Everything’s going exactly to plan. Security
will deal with her.
Nicholas put his hand on her shoulder, rubbing her arm through her
blouse. “Let’s get out of here,” he suggested. “I think this calls for an early
day.”
Still looking stunned, Jay folded her arms over her soaked and stained
blouse. Is she off the property? he texted James.
The response was prompt: Yes, Mr. Beaucroft, she’s gone. I sent her out
in a taxi.
He needed to get Jay out of the building before the shock broke. He’d
seen that brightness in her eyes too many times not to know when she was
about to cry. With his mouth in a firm line, he herded her out the door.
By the time he had gotten Jay into the passenger seat, tears were rolling
down her face. He turned off the radio while backing out of his parking
space one-handed, swearing when someone walked in front of his car.
“Call my accountant,” he barked at his phone, which obliged him by
dialing. “Go to speaker.”
The man picked up after two rings. “Hello?”
“Cancel my installments on the Valdez project.”
“Really? Are you sure? They’re in the middle of development.”
“I don’t care. Cancel it. Tell them there was a breach of contract. If
they don’t like it, he can get a lawyer. End call,” he snapped at his phone,
and it went silent.
Jay sniffed. “Wasn’t that the project you were telling me about in the
restaurant?”
“It was.”
She rubbed at her eye. “What happened?”
He sped up to beat a yellow light. “Did you know Annica was the leak
to the paper?”
“N-no, what?”
“Yeah, she came to me asking for a promotion. But she tried to throw
you under the bus. Then she went to the newspaper when I didn’t give it to
her, complaining about our hiring practices, feeding them all that bullshit
about our homelife.”
The petty little cunt.
Jay rubbed at her hands. “How would she know about our homelife?
She told me she grew up in Ridgeview.”
“Because, like your mother, she wasn’t working alone.” Nicholas
turned down a familiar street and Jay sat up when she realized that they’d
missed their turn off.
With a crunch of gravel, he pulled up in front of a big house with a
marble bird path and a row of agaves leading up to the wraparound porch.
“This is Michael’s house,” Jay said.
He hated that she remembered that.
A look of sudden comprehension dawned over her face. “Nicholas, did
he—”
Not wanting to hear her finish whatever that sentence was—because
the answer was almost certainly yes—he got out of the car and headed for
the driveway.
With a curse, Jay scrambled to unfasten her seatbelt. “I don’t like that
look on your face. Whatever you’re thinking of doing—please, don’t be
hasty—”
“It’s just business,” Nicholas said grimly. “Just like our fathers used to
do.”
He rang the bell. Jay hovered conspicuously at his side. When the door
opened, he half-expected some uniformed member of the help to answer it,
so it was a surprise to see Michael himself appear in the doorway. He must
have been hurting. His wife seemed like the type of woman who would
think it was gauche to answer her own front door.
“Nicholas?” His eyes bounced from him to Jay. He looked scared—but
not scared enough. “What are you doing here? I just got a call saying you
cancelled our fund—”
Nicholas clocked him in the face.
“Nick.” Jay tried to grab for him but he sidestepped her, grabbing
Michael by the front of his green Lacoste shirt and using his body to shove
the door the rest of the way open before throwing him against his tasteful
mahogany credenza. Several equally tasteful pieces of pottery shattered and
fell to the tiled floor, causing a fluffy Pomeranian to appear out of nowhere
and start barking.
Nicholas nudged the dog away, swinging one leg over Michael’s torso
to straddle his chest. He was heavy enough that the other man began to
wheeze. “I warned you.”
His next punch caught Michael in the mouth and he felt the bite of
teeth in his knuckles, busting them up. There was pain, too, though he
barely felt that—he was too angry. “I told you not to fuck with her. And
what did you do? Pay off my employees to talk shit, just to—” his words
splintered into a snarl and he slammed the man’s head against the tile. “You
little fuck.”
“That’s enough.” Jay gripped him from behind, hauling him backwards
beneath his arms. Michael took advantage of his distraction to lash back,
hitting him on the nose. It was a glancing blow, really, but something
cracked and Nicholas swore, lunging forward in a way that had Jay falling
against him. “Nicholas, stop—”
“I never touched her.” Michael’s voice was clotted.
“I know,” Nicholas said coldly. “That’s why I’m hitting you and not
cutting your dick off.”
“Nicholas.” Jay shrieked when he lunged again. “I said stop.”
She wasn’t strong enough to hold him back and she knew it. They both
knew it. But her shaking arms reminded him of that terrible night that she’d
left him for good.
Because she wasn’t strong enough to stop you then, either.
He sagged, giving Michael one last half-hearted swipe before allowing
Jay to pull him away.
“Jesus,” Michael said, in a choked and miserable voice. “Fuck.”
“We’re through. The whole project’s through. I’ve got you for breach
of contract. Nobody in this town will touch you with a nine-foot-pole when
they find out that you tried to season your development plan with a little bit
of extortion.”
From the depths of a house, a baby began to cry.
Jay went white. “You didn’t,” she whispered, seeming to register the
gist of the conversation at last. But this time it was Michael she spoke to,
Michael who couldn’t meet her eyes. “Why?”
“Mikey?” Angie’s voice echoed down the hall. “Mikey, I heard a noise.
What are you—oh my god. Oh my god. What happened to you? Do I need
to call the police?”
Nicholas gingerly touched his nose. “Hello Angie.”
“Did you do this?” Angie whirled on him. “Get out. Get out of my
house, Nicholas, or I’m calling the police.”
“Ask him about the pictures.”
Angie looked rattled and stared at Michael with the trace of insecurity
that he remembered so well from high school.
No matter how many extensions she purchased, or antique porcelain
she put in her pretty house, she would always be that jealous, petty girl
from high school, crying by the pool to her friends because her ex liked
someone better.
“What pictures? Pictures of her?”
“No! I didn’t take any pictures.” Michael blotted his nose with his shirt
collar, giving Nicholas a baleful, watery glare. “I paid your employee off
with money and information so she could go to the papers but she was
going to do that anyway. I never did anything else.”
“You say that like you’re capable of doing your own dirty work.”
Nicholas put his arm around Jay’s waist, pulling her towards him. “Did you
pay off anyone else?”
“No, I told you, I don’t know anything about any pictures.”
“If my husband said he didn’t, he didn’t,” Angie snapped.
“Why?” Jay repeated, her hazel eyes glittering with their own internal
fire. “Why would you go against my back like that?”
“Because he wants you,” Nicholas said bluntly, when Michael didn’t
respond. “And since he can’t do anything about that now, all he can do is
punish you for not being the pristine little angel he never got to fuck.”
Jay jerked away from him. “Nicholas.”
Angie cracked him across the face, breathing hard. She looked at Jay,
who flinched expectantly, but it was Michael she went for next, leaving
gouges that must have stung.
“What the fu—”
“I’m taking our child to a hotel,” she spoke over him. “I can’t deal with
any of this shit right now. I have to meet with our investors tomorrow.
Someone has to bring in a paycheck.”
“It’s not my fault,” Michael protested. “Angie—baby—” She shook
him off and disappeared deeper into the house, towards the direction of the
crying child. His whole body sagged as he watched her leave. “Shit. Fuck.”
“You should have denied it,” Nicholas said. “But maybe you wanted to
punish your wife for not being what you wanted, too.”
Michael turned hot eyes on him. “You’ve fucking ruined my life,
Beaucroft.”
“No,” Nicholas said, reaching out and grabbing Jay’s left hand.
“You’ve ruined your own.”
He saw the other man’s eyes go to Jay’s ring, and the matching
platinum one that he wore on his own left hand. Horror and disbelief filled
his eyes. “You—”
“Me,” he agreed coldly. “And her. Goodbye.”
With a final backwards sneer, Nicholas let the door close behind him
with a slam.

Chapter Nineteen

Jay was silent on the drive home, her face gradually shifting from
anger to something that he wasn’t sure how to identify. “There’s blood on
your shirt,” she said at last.
Nicholas made an impatient noise and undid a few of the buttons
before yanking his shirt over his head and wadding it up into the backseat.
The car swerved.
“Jesus,” Jay said. “Don’t do that while you’re driving!”
“Well, I’m not really sure what you want from me Jay. I had it all under
control.”
“Not beating Michael up would have been a start.”
“He made you cry.” A few drivers gave him second glances as they
passed in their vehicles. People in Hollybrook weren’t generally in the habit
of driving around half-dressed, busted up like they’d been bare-knuckle
boxing in some underground bar. “On the street. In front of everyone.”
He gripped the wheel harder, wishing he’d broken Valdez’s nose.
“And he had a baby in the home. God, Nick, I never would have told
you if I’d known that this is what you were going to do. You’re lucky Angie
didn’t call the police. You could have killed him, hitting him like that.”
“Probably because she’s planning on killing him herself,” he said
darkly.
Jay pressed her lips together and he felt an unwilling flicker of fear.
The last time she’d looked at him like that, she had left him for nine years.
“It was because of the paper,” he said, and he saw her head turn back
towards him. “That’s why I did it. When Meghana showed you that
newspaper, you were looking at her the same way you looked at me.”
When I forced you.
Her mouth trembled before she bit her lip and turned away like she’d
heard the unspoken words.
When they arrived at the house, she slipped past him as soon as he’d
gotten the door unlocked. Nicholas had to resist the urge to follow, to forbid
her from leaving him again. He made the turn into the master bedroom
instead, gripping the marble sink of his bathroom and leaning in to study
the damage that Michael had done to his face in the big, full-wall mirror.
Touching his nose tentatively, he hissed through his teeth. Blood
trickled out of one nostril accompanied by a hot flash of pain. It didn’t feel
broken but he looked like a fucking mess.
At least Valdez looks worse.
“Did he break your nose?” Jay appeared in the mirror behind him,
framed by the gilt edges his father had chosen. She had changed out of her
work clothes and was now wearing sleep shorts and a faded tank top that
left very little to his suddenly very overactive imagination.
“No.” He lowered his hand to the sink. “Just busted it pretty badly. I’ll
be fine.”
“Sit down,” she said, pointing to the bench outside of the shower.
He moved to obey, glancing up at her beneath his dark brows. “I
thought you’d left.”
“Why would I leave?” she asked crossly. “We’re kind of stuck with
each other at this point, aren’t we?”
Nicholas did not care for that phrasing at all, but when he opened his
mouth to say as much a snarl of pain escaped his lips instead as she dabbed
at one of his cuts with a Q-tip that felt like it had been doused in battery
acid.
“Fuck, that hurts.”
“It’s your own fault if it does.” She picked up his hand in her cool one,
studying his split and oozing knuckles, and he had a vision of himself
coming to her for some bleeding scrape at ten, when her hands were still
bigger than his and her gentleness was all he’d craved. Nicholas inhaled and
—god, he could smell her fucking hair. “You’re lucky this isn’t deep. When
human bites get infected, you can get sepsis all the way down to the bone.”
“You’re such a little nerd,” he breathed, shifting uncomfortably as she
got a new Q-tip and began dabbing more of that liquid fire torture all over
the back of his hand.
“As opposed to, what, a fratty jock with anger issues?” Her golden eyes
narrowed beneath their heavy fringe of lashes. “I know what you thought
you were trying to do, but beating up my ex-boyfriend isn’t going to unprint what that stupid newspaper said about us.”
“Are you sure it didn’t turn your crank at least a little, seeing me mop
the floor with that waste?” Another harsh breath escaped him as she wound
the bandage around his hand. He flexed his knuckles. “I thought you liked it
when Daddy got mean.”
“Cut it out,” she said, in a missish voice that had him stirring. “You
could have gone to jail. Or worse. Don’t shake your head at me,” she
snapped, furious again, seeing the smirk tugging at his lips. “Even you’re
not above the law, despite what you seem to think. Did you really think he
took those pictures? Hand to heart.”
No,” he admitted. “But whoever did it knew their way around our
house so it could have been him, and to be honest, after you told me what
he said to you, I wanted to put a little fear of god into him, anyway.” He let
his hands fall to his sides, tilting his head obediently when she leaned in to
study the scratches from Angie’s nails. “He’s still in love with you. I can
tell. Thinking about you with me doesn’t fit with his image of Jay the
Angel. Seeing photographic confirmation would make his head explode.”
“Was I part of your bargain, too?” Her fingers gripped his chin a little
too forcefully. “The one that you cancelled in the car? Did you really pay
him off to stay him away from me?”
“I told you what I was willing to do to make you mine.”
Jay applied the Q-tip from hell to his face far more viciously than he
felt the situation required. “Have you ever read Faust, Nicholas?”
“Why? Is it hot?”
“Stop smiling. This isn’t funny.”
Oh, Jay, you’re having far too much fun topping Daddy from the
bottom in his own home.
He wound his arm around her waist and tugged her bodily onto his lap.
Startled, she fumbled with the bottle of rubbing alcohol and nearly dropped
it on the floor when he splayed his hand on her thigh to steady her. “I think
Jake is the one who took the photographs.”
“Jake Van Hoff? Your friend from school?”
“We’re not friends,” he reminded her. “But yes. Him.”
“Why?”
“Because he’s your mother’s little boy toy.”
She let out a disbelieving laugh as she twisted to toss the bloodied Qtip in her hand in the trash. “He’s not exactly her type.”
“He’s got a cock and a pulse. Of course he’s her type. He also has
something she wants; he works for his uncle.” He took the bottle of alcohol
from her loosened grip, screwing the cap on tightly and setting it on the
counter beside him.
“The PI guy? You think he’s working for my mother? You think she’s
paid him to take pictures of me?”
“I know he is. I had my guy trace his car—it was parked in front of her
apartment. And guess what? It’s registered to a Frank Van Hoff. He’s
driving his uncle’s car. I saw it in San Francisco, too. Same model.” Right
outside your apartment. “It’s not fully paid off, either. He must be
desperate.”
“You really think my own mother hired a cheap PI who’s in debt to
follow me around and—” she couldn’t finish. Tears began to form in her
eyes. “No. She’s awful, but you can’t believe she’d do that.”
“I do think that. I think there’s a lot of money at stake and she’s been
whoring herself out to Jake to get a discount on services rendered.” His
mouth flattened. “She might have even gotten the idea from my father, if he
really did tell her about what had been doing on between us.”
Jay shook her head desperately. “Oh god. I don’t want her having that
kind of hold on me, Nicholas. She knows I gave up the money for you.”
“Nothing is going to happen to you.”
“It already has! For years, I searched my name, waiting for the ticking
bomb that would blow up my entire life. It might be the past for you, but it
wasn’t for me. Until a few months ago, that was my present. I don’t want it
to be my future as well. I can’t go through that again.”
Looking at her face, he felt his desire evaporate, leaving behind
something hard and cold. Carefully, he stood, bringing her up with him as
he got to his feet. “I know, sweet bird. I’m sorry.”
“I just want to be happy,” she said, brokenly slumping against his
chest. “I just want to feel good without someone always trying to make it
hurt. That’s all I’ve ever wanted. I didn’t think it was too much to ask.”
“I know,” he said again. He walked to the bath and turned the tap,
watching the water steam. When his eyes flicked to the mirror, he saw his
smile turn sardonic. “Get in the bath. I’ll make you a nice, stiff drink, and
then you can talk to me about anything you want while I wash your hair.”
“A bath.” She glanced at the tub uncertainly with a bitter twist to her
mouth. “You know, the night I left, I scrubbed myself raw when I got to my
motel—as if that could wash the whole evening away.”
Nicholas stared at her as she peeled off her clothes, seeing not her
nakedness but the regret on her face. “You told me I didn’t scare you
anymore.”
Jay got into the water and put her arms on the edge of the tub as she
looked up at him. “You don’t.”
Nicholas felt his heart thump against his chest. With a terse nod, he
turned and walked into the bedroom, pouring two glasses of the honey
whiskey from the small bar area. So she really was thinking about leaving
jostled with but she didn’t—she stayed. She had turned around when he
came back, though he saw the muscles in her back ripple as he padded back
into the room.
“Tell me what to do.” He set her glass where she could reach it as he
swept down to his knees. When she didn’t reply right away, he gathered all
her wayward locks of hair into a loose ponytail, and put his hands on her
bare shoulders, smoothing them over her back the way he’d done when he
was younger and a soft touch was the only tenderness with her that he could
fathom. “Tell me how to take care of you.” Tell me how to fix this.
She reached up for his jaw, bringing his face down to hers.
And then, in a quiet but steady whisper, she told him.

“So we have plenty of money in the bank, which puts us in a strong
position for Q3.” Jay clicked to the next slide of the Powerpoint that she
had spent the last two days putting together even as it felt as if her whole
world was threatening to come apart at the seams. “New growth has slowed
since Q1, but we’re still projected to make fifteen percent profit year over
year.”
As she spoke, it was like she was hovering outside of her own body,
watching herself. Public speaking had never been her forte, but practicing
with Nicholas made her realize very quickly that she needed to memorize
all her speeches because of how badly her notecards shook in her trembling
hands. She gripped the clicker a little tighter, trying to hide the shaking.
A man from Marketing raised his hand. “If we’re doing so well, why is
it just sitting in the accounts like deadweight?”
“Because it’s not deadweight.” Jay folded her arms behind her back.
“It’s a buffer. Part of that deadweight ensures that your salary gets paid after
all.”
She hadn’t been trying to be funny, but several people laughed—not at
her, thank god—and she was able to get through the rest of the presentation
before handing the remote off to Arthur and retreating to her seat as he gave
the introduction for the next speaker.
Nicholas was sitting several seats down and looked very intimidating in
his dark suit, which he undoubtedly intended, since he had worn the same
one to intimidate her when he had come to San Francisco that first time and
literally dressed her down in that little vegan diner.
She smoothed out an imaginary crease in her trousers, remembering
her mother’s ability to zero in on her appearance and immediately point out
all her flaws. She had donned her work clothes as if she were putting on
armor, but as she was getting dressed, she found herself ticking off all the
flaws out of habit, from the worn-out heels of her shoes to the fashion tape
she used to keep her blouses from gaping open when the buttons were
spaced too wide.
The thought of confronting her mother, in person, was terrifying.
Her fidgeting drew Nicholas’s eye. He gave her a brief, but pleased
nod.
“Great talk, Justine,” someone said to her, and Jay looked over in
surprise at a clutch of female employees, whose names she didn’t know.
“Yeah, you nailed it.”
“Um, thank you?” She smiled uncertainly, wondering if she were being
mocked. After Annica was let go, she had left a schism in her wake. Most
people supported Nicholas publicly, but privately, Jay knew there were
people who felt that Annica had been punished for speaking the truth. They
wouldn’t meet her eyes and left every room that she walked into.
She had two other meetings, neither of which she had to present in,
before spending the rest of her day at her desk, reviewing metrics from
some of her new direct reports and responding to emails. Her mind kept
getting pulled towards her mother.
Nicholas no longer bothered to wait until after the building closed to
collect her, which made her wonder, with a little lurch, if all of those late
nights had been because of her.
As he strolled up, Jay fumbled to lock her computer, while stuffing her
things in her bag. “You did nail that presentation,” he said, as she stumbled
to her feet. “By the way.”
“You heard that?”
“You’ll get used to the office sycophants. They’re irritating but
harmless.” He rested one hand on the small of her back as he dug into his
pocket for his keys. “Are you ready to go?”
“I guess.”
“You’re ready. Just remember—your mother’s desperate.”
And desperate people are dangerous. They don’t have anything to lose.
Her mother was staying in Ridgeview, in what the people in the Granite
County area referred to as “the bad part of town” because what they
actually meant was that it was “affordable,” and therefore undesirable
because it wouldn’t be inhabited by the rich elite worthy of their time.
Jay remembered Annica’s glaring once-over as she said, dismissively,
“You look like you grew up here.” As Nicholas drove his car through this
genteel version of “poverty,” she found herself recalling all the times she
had gone to bed hungry or used watered-down dish soap as hand soap, and
wondered if her coworker would have liked her any better if she’d known
that she had grown up even poorer than her.
Probably not. Jay looked at the peeling paint of what she assumed was
her mother’s apartment complex, noting the proximity to the railroad tracks
and the empty, yet-to-be-developed-lot next to a convenience store with a
burnt-out sign. The cars parked on the street were old, but all of their
windows were intact and none of them were perched precariously on
wooden blocks.
“She told me she was on the verge of living on the streets,” Jay said.
“And you believed that old liar?” He parallel parked across the street,
almost hitting the Volvo in front of them. “That’s the car I had tracked, right
in front of her house. It’s the newest one on the street. Looks like they’re
spending the night in. How cozy.”
He headed across the street without any sort of preamble and Jay
jogged a little to catch up to his long stride, wondering if their formal office
attire was drawing stares through those shuttered windows. She would have
liked more time to prepare herself but Nicholas seemed nearly eager.
“Danielle!” He rapped on her door so sharply that he opened up the
scrapes he’d gotten from whaling on Michael, leaving little streaks of blood
on the paint. “Open the fucking door.”
“Maybe she’s not ho—” Jay began, only for the door to swing wide
open. “Oh.”
She hadn’t seen her mother in years. She was still petite, and her spare,
lean build suggested that she still worked out. Her long blonde hair was
scraped back into a ballerina bun and her cheekbones were dusted with
some kind of glittery bronzer. The only nod to her true age were a handful
of sunspots and a few fresh wrinkles.
Her mother gave her a once-over. Critical and unfriendly, it made Jay
feel like she was being measured and found wanting even as she was being
condemned for both.
“Oh,” she said. “It’s you.” Her eyes shifted to Nicholas. “I guess you
don’t make idle threats.”
Jay turned to Nicholas, who was looking at her mother the way
someone might look at a buzzing fly in a restaurant. When did he talk to my
mother? she wondered, disturbed by the glacial rage in his eyes.
“Are you going to invite us inside or do you want me to have my
lawyer dial in through your Ring app?”
The mention of litigation seemed to get to her mother. She quickly
stepped aside and Jay, walking into the foyer, found herself in a space that
looked like the back room of a Victoria’s Secret, with everything done in
shades of varying pink or white. There was a sugar cookie smell that made
her feel vaguely sick, reminiscent of the strip club and too many mall trips
that she hadn’t enjoyed. Fake vanilla and humiliation.
Jay’s mother drifted to her fridge and opened the door. The shelves
were mostly empty but then, her mother had never cooked. She pulled out a
frosted bottle of peach-colored wine from the top shelf. “I suppose you’ll
want a drink.”
Nicholas eyed her. “Do I look like one of your girlfriends?”
Jay saw her mother’s mouth open, ready to deliver a cutting remark.
Then she appeared to think better of it. “Your father never said no.”
Nicholas just looked at her. She swallowed, and then covered her
unease with a shrug.
“Justine, wine?” It sounded like a command.
“Fine.” She didn’t want it, either, but it would give her something to do
with her hands, which were shaking quite badly. Nicholas raised a
disapproving eyebrow at her as she accepted the glass with shaky hands and
took a few desperate sips of the sickeningly sweet rosé.
“I suppose you let him bully you into coming here.” Her mother
watched her hands, not looking away when Jay accidentally splashed some
of the wine on herself. “He said he would.”
Nicholas gave her hip a squeeze, which did not go unnoticed by her
mother.
“I didn’t realize your brother had turned you into such a pushover.”
The barb had been intended to sting but it didn’t hurt as much as it
would have before, when her self-worth had hinged on how well she had
pleased the people around her.
She realized, with a kind of numb fascination that was heightened by
the wine, that she no longer really cared what her mother thought of her at
all.
“This is a nice place.” Nicholas gave her a little tap with his fingers
before letting his hand drop from her back. Her mother grew tense as he
circled the kitchen, like a panther pacing a cage. “Is it a rental? I imagine it
must be, given the dire state of your financial woes.”
“You put me in this position,” her mother seethed.
“Did I?” Nicholas opened one of her cabinets, peering inside, before
turning over his shoulder to give her a cold look. “I don’t remember telling
you to get on your back.”
Jay’s mother looked at her. “Are you going to let him speak to me that
way?”
Such a pushover. The wineglass trembled in her grip. “If you don’t like
it, tell him yourself.” She set her glass clumsily onto the ugly Formica
counter. “You’ve already sold me out once. And for what? An apartment on
the train tracks? Screw you.”
Nicholas snorted, and headed back down her narrow hallway.
“You are living in my house, Justine. I suggest you remember that
before accusing me of selling out.” Her mother turned on her roundly,
deciding she was the easier target, even as she kept one wary eye on
Nicholas. “Last I checked, you got there the same way I did.”
“Last I checked,” Jay said, “it’s not your name on the deed.”
“Why’s this door locked if you’re here alone?” Nicholas asked
casually, rattling the doorknob on one of the three doors in the foyer.
“Where’s it go?”
“My bedroom,” her mother snapped, looking away from Jay. “Stay out
of there.”
“Nicholas, stop,” Jay said, when he tried the handle again.
“He always did take your marching orders.” Her mother’s tone was
sour as Nicholas leaned back against the wall, his arms folded. She turned a
look on Jay that would have made her wilt when she was fourteen. “I
suppose I know why.”
“You do know why. You drove me into his arms.” Jay squared her
shoulders. “It must have been very disappointing when he didn’t squeeze.”
“Doesn’t he?” her mother said.
Jay closed her eyes and drew in a deep breath. “What’s your price? I’ve
been told everyone has theirs. What do you want to make this stop?”
“Seven million dollars.”
Nicholas laughed from his post by the door.
“Seven million dollars in exchange for my silence. I saw that article—I
know people are already talking. You’re the biggest scandal this town’s had
since your father’s trial.”
“People always talk,” Nicholas said indifferently.
“I’m sure they’d talk a lot more if they know what you were up to
when you were younger. Damon told me some things before he died.” A
disgusted laugh left her lips. “I didn’t believe it at first, a little prude like
you, but you didn’t waste much time trying to steal my husband from me,
either, so why wouldn’t you sleep with your barely-legal stepbrother, too?”
Jay’s mouth fell open. “What?”
“He told me you came onto him that night at the resort when you were
eighteen while you were hanging around the bar dressed like a little tart.”
She sounded as if being eighteen were a crime, Jay thought. Perhaps, to
a woman like her mother, it was. The sour tang of bile rose in her throat.
“That’s a fucking lie. He tried to—”
But she couldn’t finish. All she could taste was that cheap acidic wine.
He wanted to own me.
“You see? You can’t even deny it. Just like this thing you have with
your brother—” Her mother jabbed a pointed fingernail at her. “When did
this start? Because Damon told me that you’ve been fucking him since he
was only fourteen.”
Jay’s vicious cry of denial was lost to a deafening thud, followed by the
sound of splintering wood. Nicholas ignored both of their startled shouts
and rammed his shoulder into the locked door again, causing it to jump off
its broken hinges.
“How dare you,” Jay’s mother shouted, but she sounded terrified. As if
she hadn’t realized how strong Nicholas really was, and how easily he
could turn on her.
Or that he might want to if she pushed him far enough.
Nicholas walked into the room, and Jay heard a shout, followed by
what appeared to be a loud scuffle and then a curse. She saw her mother’s
eyes dart to her phone on the kitchen table, but Jay beat her to it, dropping
the battered old iPhone with the cracked screen into her purse.
“Give that back,” her mother snapped. “Now, Justine!”
“I will, when we leave. Nicholas isn’t finished with his marching
orders yet.”
“I am your mother,” she seethed. “You listen to me right now and give
me my phone.”
“If you’re my mother,” Jay said, still riding that wave of eerie calm,
“you should act like it.”
Pain lit up the side of her face and Jay blinked in shock at her mother’s
uplifted hand.
“You have a lot of nerve—you vindictive, twisted little—”
Her mother jumped back from Jay as Nicholas reemerged from the
bedroom, holding a struggling Jake by his shirt collar. In his other hand was
a camera.
“He was listening at the door.” With a display of strength that made Jay
jump and her mother scream, he flung the camera onto the floor so roughly
that it shattered, denting the linoleum. “He was recording, too. Which is
illegal, in case you were wondering.”
“You ruined my floors!”
“My floors, actually,” Nicholas said, but her mother, who was working
herself up to one of her tantrums, didn’t appear to hear. Jay did, and looked
at him; he gave her a smile that she knew well, because she had been on
both sides of it.
The fuck-or-get-fucked smile. And clearly, her mother was on the
wrong side of the table.
Then he did a double-take and his eyes went to her reddened cheek,
before swinging sharply to her mother and narrowing.
“That’s destruction of private property and assault,” Jake snarled,
oblivious to the murderous expression on the other man’s face. “You want
to talk about illegal. If you think you can keep me from pressing charges,
you’re so fucking wrong. I won’t be bought off.”
“Isn’t it an election year?” Nicholas’s fury was no longer visible but
Jay, who was far more familiar with his moods, could see it in every rigid
outline of his body. “I think it is.”
“The view from your ivory tower must be pretty rosy if you think
you’re that above the law.”
“Do you? I have your license plates and photographic evidence of you
being places you’re not supposed to be. I know your dad isn’t going to go
for that. He’d sacrifice you in a heartbeat.”
Jake scoffed. “You don’t know shit. Now, let go of me.”
Nicholas tilted his head to look at Jay’s seething mother. “You said I
was like my father. But we both know what kind of man he was—that what
he couldn’t acquire fairly, he destroyed. If you really believe that, I’m not
sure why you would invite me over here and then try to fuck me.”
Jay’s mother turned away. “He betrayed me. Why shouldn’t I get my
dues?”
“Do you really think you’re the wronged party here? He proposed to
your own daughter, you stupid fucking bitch. If she were as grasping as you
think she is, you would have been out on your ass the day of her graduation
and she would have been his new wife. But she told him no. My father
didn’t like no. He once arranged for the devaluation of a property when the
owner wouldn’t sell. He tried to do the same thing to Jay’s reputation.”
“Everyone knew she was with Quentin and Michael,” Jake broke in.
“And my father did business with both of theirs.” He gave Jake a little
shove, sending him stumbling back into a rack full of mismatched
wineglasses that tumbled out and shattered. “How do you think he managed
to control the narrative? He paid for the stories he thought were fit to
circulate, until his influence dead-ended and control finally eluded him.
“I saw the way he watched her. I know you did, too. You saw him
alienating her from her friends, cutting off her paths to escape one by one.
But I think you convinced yourself to let the chips fall wherever they may
because deep down, you wanted to teach her a lesson. If something did
happen, with all your carefully laid criticism, she’d only blame herself.”
The kitchen seemed to go gray. Jay leaned back against the counter,
breathing harder.
No, she thought. Oh god.
“I used to think you were just some dumb bimbo,” Nicholas was
saying, “but you and my father really did deserve each other. Neither of you
ever cared about anything but yourselves.”
“Jake,” Jay’s mother said, appealing to the other man, but he didn’t
move. He looked at the glass, and then at Nicholas.
“You want to get involved in how I conduct my business, Van Hoff?”
Nicholas gave him a chilling smile that was all teeth. “Someone in this
room is getting fucked tonight but only one of you is going to like it.”
“Is that another threat?”
“No. You’re going to give me the negatives and then you’re going to
pack up and leave before I call the cops and have you arrested for
trespassing.”
Jay’s mother laughed angrily. “In my own apartment?”
“No, in mine. I did some digging and found out what you’ve been
doing to float your rent, in addition to letting this pathetic little fuck live
with you rent-free. Both of those things violate your rental agreement. Your
landlord was very interested in hearing about that.”
“Well, he didn’t tell me. He’s supposed to give me thirty days.”
“I’m telling you. Get the hell out of my building.”
“I don’t believe you. You won’t fool me with your nasty tricks.”
“It’s not a trick. One of my recent business deals fell through so I had
some extra money to burn. This is my apartment, whether you believe me
or not, and if you don’t get the fuck out of it by five o’ clock this evening—
that’s one hour from now—I’m forwarding everything I have on you to the
police before I have them throw your ass out to the curb with the rest of the
trash.”
“You can’t do that!” Jay’s mother looked at Jay. “Tell him he can’t do
that.”
Jay shrugged.
“I also picked up most of your collective debts, so your car,” he added,
tilting his head to look at Jake, “or, rather, my car, also belongs to me. So
you’ll be hightailing it out of here on foot. Make the appropriate
arrangements. Or don’t. I don’t really give a shit.”
“I’m your mother,” her mother said again to Jay.
“Get on your knees,” said Nicholas.
“I—excuse me?”
“Get on your knees,” he repeated, “and beg her forgiveness. You said
you were her mother—a real mother would do it. If the apology’s good
enough, I’ll write you a check for ten grand.”
“You’re crazy,” her mother said.
Nicholas gave her a grim look. “It’s the best offer you’ll get.”
Jay was aware of a numbness in her fingertips as she turned her head to
look at him. She could sense the desire for violence radiating from him as if
it were a physical thing, rubbing against her skin like a furred and vicious
creature that would eat her alive from sheer hunger alone.
It left her breathless.
Slowly, Jay’s mother got down to the linoleum floor. She winced a little
and there was a popping sound as her kneecaps rolled against the hard
surface.
“I’m sorry, baby.” She spoke grudgingly.
“For what?” Nicholas prompted. “Be specific.”
“I’m sorry I failed you as a mother. You were such a difficult child and
I—” Nicholas gave her a sharp look and she broke off. “I wasn’t a good
mom to you. It was wrong of me to buy into your brother’s twisted schemes
to get my house and my money back.”
“Stop calling him my brother,” said Jay. “He’s my husband and the
house belongs to us.”
That gave her mother pause—Jay could read every thought flashing
across her face: fear, disgust, and something that looked a lot like jealousy.
“You scheming little bitch.”
Jake muttered, “Shit.”
“God. You’re both such freaks.”
“And you’re a bad person!” She fought off the familiar prickling of
shame spreading its fingers along her spine. “You spent so much time trying
to make me feel as if I would never be good enough that I actually started to
believe it.”
“Justine, spare me your persecution complex for once in your
miserable little life. I know it’s all the rage now to hate your mother, but
you’re not exactly an innocent here.”
“Bullshit,” Nicholas said.
“I tried to make you independent. I tried to make you grow up into a
young woman. But you weren’t like me. You couldn’t take things on the
chin. Everything hurt your feelings, like the child you are. Everything made
you cry.” She drew herself up from the floor dramatically. “I’m sorry I hurt
you by trying to toughen you up, but it seems like you landed on your feet
anyway.”
“That’s your apology?” Her voice sounded a little too high. She didn’t
care. “Saying that it was all my fault, and adding a mea culpa? You have
been holding the bar over my head my whole life and criticizing me for not
being able to reach it. But I don’t think you ever really wanted me to. I
think it made you feel a whole lot better when I couldn’t. That’s why you
threw me to the wolves! You wanted to see me get torn apart!”
“That’s not true!”
“Then why wouldn’t you let me feel pretty? Why wouldn’t you let me
feel good?” Jay shook her head wildly. “Why wouldn’t you believe me over
your husband when he would sit there and talk about my how beautiful my
fucking wrists were at the dinner table like it was his right to comment on
my body? Why did you throw me at Nick?”
“I just can’t believe you can say things like that to me with a straight
face after marrying your own brother—I’m sorry, stepbrother—and sending
him here to intimidate me like a little mob boss. You never came to me
about your stepfather, Jay, and I remember how you dressed. You can force
me to apologize all you want but it doesn’t change the fact that you liked
the attention.”
Jay said nothing but a gasping breath left her lungs.
“It seems like you still do.” Her mother looked at her for a long
moment, apparently satisfied. Turning to Nicholas, she said, “Just give me
the ten thousand so we can drop this ugliness. I’m tired of this.”
Nicholas looked over her head at Jay. Even now, choking on all of her
past trauma as if it were a bone stuck in her throat, she recognized the look
—stern and expectant. The look he gave her whenever she defied him, like
he was waiting to see if she would push him harder.
(you want it like that from Daddy?)
“Justine,” her mother said, snapping her fingers.
Still looking at Nick, Jay said, “No.”
“Excuse me?” her mother said.
“I said no.”
“What do you mean, no?”
“I don’t think my wife liked your apology.” Nicholas sounded like he
was trying not to laugh. Enjoying himself, actually—but for once she didn’t
fault him for it. Not when hearing him say my wife felt like being stroked by
a staticky brush. “Get out of my apartment and take your boy-toy with
you.”
“You promised me money!”
“Yeah, but your apology was shit.” Nicholas tilted his head and gave
her the empty stare her mother had mentioned on the phone. “You have
three options now. You can leave on foot, in a cop car, or on a stretcher.”
Jake tried to slink past Nicholas, to the safety of the bedroom, but he
reached out and grabbed him by the front of his shirt. The fabric bunched
beneath his Adam’s apple, making him gasp and choke.
“Where is she keeping the negatives?”
“M-my uncle has them.” Jake swallowed hard. “Please don’t hurt me,
man.”
“People in my line of work don’t typically operate on good faith.”
Nicholas studied him for a long time, letting the other man squirm before
releasing him with a hard shove. “Put your keys on the counter and make
sure she leaves.”
Jake tossed them clumsily on the Formica before darting into the
bedroom. Nicholas pushed off from the wall to join Jay in the kitchen while
Jay’s mother swore in her bedroom, grabbing jewelry and various other
things and shoving them into a pink laundry basket.
He picked up what was left of the rosé wine and took a leisurely drink,
his throat bobbing. He swallowed and held it out, offering it to her like a
fallen angel offering to lead her down into hell. But Jay knew what hell was
like. She’d grown up surrounded by its gilt trappings like a bird in a cage,
and had almost been blinded by their deceitful dazzle.
Nicholas had burst into her life and dragged her back just when she
finally thought she’d have a chance to escape, stalking and blackmailing her
into submission, only to get down on his knees and offer to tear it all apart,
bar by golden bar, if it meant that she would be his—and, more than that: if
she would allow him to be hers.
To a girl who had never felt wanted, being coveted—fought over—
fought for—was frightening. She had never wanted to be another man’s
conquest. She had attended far too many feminist lectures to see herself as a
thing.
But being the treasure he protected, the thing that made him turn
vicious at her request—
Jay took the bottle and watched his eyes flare as she drank from where
he’d put his mouth.
She thought she might like that.

Chapter Twenty

Nicholas threw his car into park in front of V.H. Investigations. The
fake Spanish revival tiling really set the stage. If you were going to hire a
guy to catch your second wife cheating—or entrap your daughter who
desperate to escape from your poisonous influence—why not hire someone
who paid rent to work in a strip mall?
Jay had been very quiet on the drive over. She was always quiet, but
usually her silences held a certain charge—judgmental, disapproving,
wounded. But she hadn’t said a word since she’d taken the wine bottle from
him and gulped it down with those dark siren eyes.
When they were young, she had always been the voice of reason. The
conscience he’d never had. Hollybrook’s little angel, he had called her.
Rule-abiding to a fault.
But as her eyes lifted from that bottle, she looked like every bad
thought he’d ever had. He wasn’t sure what to make of her silence or that
look, but he liked it, just as he’d liked seeing her finally stand up to her evil
bitch of a mother.
“You think I was too harsh,” he said at last.
“What?” Jay blinked like she was coming out of a terrible dream. “No.
She’s been awful my whole life but I just didn’t want to see it. To think that
she would go through all that effort to hurt me . . . after all that I’ve been
through—”
“It was cruel.”
“Yes, it was cruel.” She looked as remote as she had in those
conference rooms, whenever he’d given someone a talking down. “For so
long, she was the only family I ever had . . . and she made me feel so awful.
She’s never looked at me the way that she looked at me today. Like she was
afraid of me.”
“That’s called power,” he said. “Enjoy it.”
“I feel like I shouldn’t.”
“Why? Because it might make you a bad person?” He tilted her face
towards his. “Be a bad person, then. Take a little pleasure in thwarting that
spiteful bitch.” Who fucking hit you.
“Do you really think she’ll leave town?”
“God, I hope so.” He leaned back from her, reaching down to unbuckle
his seatbelt. “I’ve always liked it better when the trash takes itself out.”
Jay slid out of the car, rubbing at the cheek her mother had slapped.
Her face was solemn but there was a restless energy in her movements; it
was as if she had been a wilting blossom that had just been placed in a new
glass of water and finally allowed to bloom now that she’d shaken off her
mother’s poison.
I see you now, he thought. This is the you that you don’t give anyone
else.
Strong and even a little vicious beneath all the sweet.
The woman who fucked him with her nails buried in her back.
Frank Van Hoff was at his desk, sifting through his papers. He didn’t
look up when the door opened. “I don’t take walk-ins. If you want to
arrange a consultation, do it through my website.”
“I think you’ll want to see me.”
At the sound of his voice, Frank’s head whipped up just as Nicholas
reached behind him to lock the door and flip the sign from OPEN to
CLOSED.
“What do you want?” Frank demanded.
“My stepmother is a client of yours.”
“I don’t discuss clients with non-clients.”
“I just came back from talking with her,” Nicholas continued. “She
informed me that she had been using your services, which she wouldn’t be
needing anymore because she plans to leave town very, very soon—along
with your nephew.”
The other man’s mouth tightened. Nicholas suspected Jake had already
called to warn him, and maybe give his own colorful version of what had
happened. Even when they were kids, he’d been a spineless weasel. First to
throw the rock, first to deny the blame.
“You can call her yourself, if you don’t believe me.”
“What do you want?” he repeated.
Nicholas saw him tense as he put his hands on the man’s pretty
polished desk and bent down, staring him right in the red-rimmed watery
eyes that made him suspect that there was a bottle of whiskey locked in one
of those many drawers.
“I want the negatives you have of us.”
“I don’t keep photographs in the office.”
“I think that’s a lie. You seem like a man who enjoys keeping his vices
close. Give me the negatives and you can continue slithering under the
radar to conduct your shady little business without any further interference
from me. I doubt you’ll get a better deal elsewhere.”
“I only answer to the police.”
“I have a stake in almost every big property in town. Even your brother
—the sheriff—looks to me during election time, which is coming up soon.
Do you really think, knowing him as well as you do, that he would ever side
with you over me? He didn’t even choose his own son.”
Frank studied him for a long moment, with the cold stare of a seasoned
gambler. “Danielle owed me money. It doesn’t sound like she’ll be paying
up now.”
“I’ll cut you a check.”
“Ten thousand. Plus expenses.”
“How affordable.” Nicholas reached for his checkbook. “She got what
she paid for then.”
Frank barked out a humorless laugh. “She said you were a stone-cold
motherfucker but I figured you were just another prissy little rich boy with a
fire lit under his ass.”
“The negatives,” Nicholas said, without looking up. “Now.”
Frank reached into one of his drawers and slapped down an envelope.
The edge of something glossy slid out of it. “It’s all in here. Call it a
fucking wedding present. I don’t give a fuck.”
“I don’t want to see you anywhere near our home or offices again.”
“I doubt that will be a problem,” Frank said, lighting up a cigarette.
Nicholas noted, with disgust, that the ashtray on his desk was overflowing.
“You and I don’t exactly run in the same circles. I only knew your father
because we played cards.”
“Lucky me.” Nicholas toyed with a dagger-shaped letter opener he’d
plucked up from the desk. “I never gamble unless it’s a sure thing.”
“Be careful with that! That’s real sterling silver. I got it in Scotland.”
He reached for the letter opener and Nicholas jerked it back, out of reach.
Frank turned irately to Jay. “Do you talk?”
Jay eyed him with distaste. Nicholas had been on the receiving end of
that look before: it was just as scalding as he remembered and appeared to
make Frank angry. As he reached down for the envelope and opened it with
Frank’s fancy sterling silver letter opener, the other man said viciously, “I
guess with a body like that, she doesn’t need to talk.”
Nicholas looked up, letting the blade slide noisily through the paper.
That gave Frank pause, but mean-spiritedness won out over caution.
“I remember your dad used to talk a lot about you when we played
poker. He always talked about what a good girl you were. Figured you’d
marry well, shore up the family business.” He smiled unpleasantly. “I
suppose one of those things turned out to be true.”
“He was disgusting,” said Jay, “and so are you.”
“You married the fruit of his loins, honey,” he said, with a hoarse
smoker’s laugh. “So how disgusting could he really be? I’ve seen the
pictures. God, I thought your mom was a fox, but you do shit she wouldn’t
do for free. What’s that old saying—lady in the streets, whore in the sheets?
Maybe in ten years, you’ll thank my nephew for photographing your
wedding n—motherfucker.”
A meaty thud pierced through his scream.
Nicholas pushed down harder on the handle, driving the sharp point of
the letter opener into the web of flesh between the man’s thumb and
forefinger, pining his hand to the desk.
Blood began leaking out, soaking into some of the nearby papers.
“If you go to the police,” Nicholas said casually, “I’ll find you and do
the same thing to your dick. Even if they do put me away, I’ll get out and
then I’ll come after you again. And then I’ll be angrier. You will suffer
worse than you have ever suffered in your life. Do you understand?”
Moaning, Frank managed to bob his head.
“You don’t fuck with her.”
“Sorry,” he croaked.
“Not to me. To my wife.”
Swallowing back a whimper, Frank lolled his head towards Jay.
“Sorry.”
“Oh my god, Nicholas,” Jay said. “Stop it. We need to go. Now.”
Nicholas slapped Frank in the face with the envelope. “Make sure you
pass my message along to your nephew. Just in case he thinks he got off
easily.”
Jay was stumbling, and the warm tones of her skin had taken on a
slight grayish cast. As the doors swung back behind them, she looked
around the half-full parking lot and said, in a low, terrified voice, “Nicholas,
what the fuck? I mean, seriously, what the fuck?”
“You expected me to stand there and let him talk to you like that?”
“You stabbed him in the hand. After threatening his nephew. My god,
Nicholas, he could go to the police. They could both go to the police. Don’t
you understand?” Her voice became higher, desperate. “They could arrest
you and lock you away.”
“Jay.” He felt an unfamiliar heat in his face and throat.
“I don’t want to be alone. I can’t go back to—I can’t go back to
before.” She reached for the doorhandle blindly and he caught her by the
wrist, holding it against his chest. “Nick, I can’t—”
“Nothing is going to happen to me.” He folded his hands over hers.
“But we’re not getting into this car until you promise me that I won’t wake
up to an empty house.”
“No,” said Jay. “I wouldn’t leave. But we have to go—”
“You did leave me. Twice.”
“I know. I know. But I wouldn’t do it again.”
“Why did you leave that night? Why not the first one or the next? Why
did you leave on the night I bared my fucking soul to you and chose you
over my father?”
“Because what I saw in your eyes scared me. It wasn’t love—it was
obsession. I saw a man who would burn down his entire world to make a
place for me in its ashes, who didn’t care how many pieces he broke me
into as long as he owned them all.”
“And now?” he asked, his voice hollow.
She plucked her hand from his face and held it in her own.
“And now I’d rather watch the world burn with you just as I am. So
please, let’s go. Now.”

Jay woke up to the smell of smoke.
She shot out of bed, panicked to find herself alone, the sheets next to
her cold. But then she went to the window and looked through the glass, her
breath fogging the clear surface.
Nicholas had the fire pit lit. The orange glow of the flames softened his
profile, throwing the shadows of his bare torso into relief. He was feeding
something into the fire—she thought, from the way their glossy surface
reflected in the light, that they might be photographs.
There was something so very gothic about that: a man destroying relics
of the past with fire. She twisted her wedding ring as she watched him, not
sure what to make of his behavior. If he was the tortured, brooding master
of the house, what did that make her? Not the wife in the attic, but the one
he’d slash his way through hell and back to save.
Her face softened, fascinated by the way he carried himself when he
thought he was alone. No airs or attempts at intimidation, just a man who
moved confidently in his own skin.
A man who was desperately in love with her.
On her way out the door, she stopped by Nicholas’s nightstand and
reached inside the drawer, tucking the small foil-wrapped packet she’d
retrieved inside the bodice of her nightgown.
Walking down the steps in the dark, she noticed the ghostly spaces
where photographs of Nicholas had once hung on the wall. He must have
removed them—or his father had. There had never been any there of her.
Only the spider sculpture and the blue jellyfish sculpture and windows that
looked out onto a property that was slowly beginning to fall to ruin.
She remembered Nicholas’s offer to let her redecorate the way she
wished. She really didn’t want to touch the house, but the bare grounds and
the driveway could use some love. A pop of color amidst all that white.
Jay walked from the righthand staircase out to the sunroom. In the light
of the moon, she thought the wicker furniture looked a lot like bone. She
could smell the fire now, not just the smoke, and she thought it smelled
rather awful. All those chemicals—breathing in god-knew-what just to
make a point.
Nicholas looked up as her shadow stretched over the tile, and his eyes
widened briefly before he turned back to the fire. “I didn’t mean to wake
you.”
“I smelled the smoke.”
“Pull up a seat then.” He tossed in another photo.
“I’m almost positive those fumes are toxic.” She pressed against him
with one arm looped loosely around his waist from behind. She felt his
body tense as she stretched to rest her chin on his shoulder. “Don’t you have
a paper shredder?”
“I thought you’d appreciate the theatrics of it.”
“While I was asleep?”
He shrugged. “In absentia then.”
“I told you how I feel about bonfires.”
“Yeah, you did.” He watched the edges of one of the photos blacken
and curl. “Want to tell me your dreams?”
“I don’t remember my dreams anymore and I have everything I want.”
She saw his cheek lift. He tossed in the final photograph and then the
folder, for good measure. Gently, he extricated himself from her hold,
turning to look at her with the reflection of the fire gleaming in his pale
eyes. “If that’s the case, what do you want from me?”
“Come over here.” She tugged at his hand and he followed her to the
planter—the same one where he had gotten down on his knees and begged
her not to leave him before trying to pay her ten million dollars just so she
could do exactly that.
You beautifully twisted man, she thought. Oh, how I love you.
“I can’t leave the fire,” he said, sounding amused, though the looks he
was giving her in her thin lace dress made her feel as if she were curling up
at the edges just like those blackened photos.
“Sit,” she said, and he did, his mocking half-smile becoming
considerably more satisfied as she straddled his lap. The scent of jasmine
suffused them both as they kissed, and even with her knees bruising on the
tiled edge of the planter, she was as conscious as she always was of just
how brutal a man he was beneath the streamlined tailoring of his expensive
clothes.
She covered his hands with hers, pressing to keep them pinned against
the ceramic. They both had long fingers, but his were broader, and stronger.
She could feel the flex of the tendons as he looked at her with those hooded
eyes. “You’re not going to be able to hold me down.” He tugged on her lip
with his teeth. “I’ll fight back.”
Jay’s breath came a little shorter when kissed her again, sitting up a
little as he did. She grabbed onto one of his shoulders to restabilize, and put
her other hand over his chest.
“Fuck—” He arched into her touch when she rocked against his hips, a
low, satisfied sound emanating from his throat as she slid her palm over his
pectorals, and over the ridges of his abdomen. “What do you think you—”
A shudder ripped through him as she thumbed his waistband, his belly
hitching as she teased the dark line of hair that thickened beneath his navel.
“Jay.”
There was power in this. Making him want. Making him wait. All his
life, he’d been given everything he ever wanted. Everything but her. And
she had been on the outskirts of his orbit all along, oblivious, until she tried
to leave, and he collided into her world with a violence that set her entire
horizon ablaze.
Can I watch the world burn with you? he had asked, when he was the
one holding the match.
But now she wore the world at her throat.
“Yes, Daddy?”
Nicholas pried her hands away and looked at her for just long enough
to make her heart begin to pound in earnest before flipping her over one of
his shoulders.
“Nick! The fire!”
“I don’t care,” he said, striding towards the house. “I think need to deal
with you.”
“No.” Jay slapped at his back, kicking her legs ineffectively. “Put me
down.”
“Why?” But he set her roughly on the ground, standing in a way that
let her know that she wouldn’t get far if she tried to run. “Do you want me
to fuck you in the pool?”
“No.” She reached into her bodice for the condom she’d plucked from
his bedside drawer. “I want you to do it here. Under the flowers.”
He stared at his hand when she put the wrapper in it.
“Fuck me,” she said to him. “Please.”
This time, when he lunged, she let out a little scream as he half-pushed,
half-tackled her to one of the loungers beneath the patchy shade of the
flowers. She did fight him, and he fought back like he promised, kissing her
into submission until all she could taste was smoke.
They fell asleep out there beneath the balmy skies, with the sweat of
their exertion chilling on their skin. Flower petals had blown over them in a
light shower, carried by the wind.
Jay opened her eyes. The fire had died to a few faintly glowing embers
and Nicholas was tracing a sprig of jasmine around her breast, the featherlight touch raising goosebumps.
“That tickles,” she said.
“I keep thinking you’ll vanish.” He ran the flower up her throat. “I’ve
had too many dreams that you were in my arms, only to wake up and
realize it wasn’t real.”
“I’m real,” she said.
Nicholas tucked the flower into her hair and leaned over her again.
“Show me.”

Jay had already received three compliments on her “necklace” and after
the first two, she had even managed not to blush. It really was exquisitely
crafted. The semi-precious stones on the stainless-steel chain looked so
demure, threading through the handcrafted leather band. Nobody looking at
it could have guessed that Nicholas sometimes fucked her with that citrine
bead in his fist, with six inches of its extended chain wrapped around his
knuckles.
Don’t think about that now. She could feel the threat of a blush
warming her cheeks and recentered the necklace absently, making the little
stone spheres clatter against the citrine.
“The number of international clients in our portfolio is up 4.3% from
last quarter,” Jay said. “And our retention is good. Customer Success sent
out a survey: seventy-percent of our clients would be willing to work with
us again.”
Everyone clapped politely and despite the nerves fluttering her gut, and
an upcoming audit that she was very nervous about, she felt a flicker of
pride. She had worked so hard for this, living and breathing this data. It
wasn’t all that different from the work she had been doing for Arthur and
Nicholas behind the scenes, but now it was her face up front, her name on
the dotted line.
Justine Beaucroft, VP of Operations.
“All in all, it’s been a very successful quarter,” she finished, handing
the remote over to Arthur, adding into the mic, “And things are looking
even brighter for Q4.”
“Thank you very much, Jay,” he said. “Now I’m going to talk to you all
about your favorite subject, OKRs.”
Jay glanced subtly at her phone screen as she took her seat up front,
hiding her smile when she saw that she had a text from Nick. How was your
speech?
It went well, I think. Thank you for practicing with me.
I saw it on the live-feed. It did go well.
After her promotion, Nicholas had stepped back into a consulting role.
His choice—which surprised everyone, considering his ire when the option
had been given at HR’s suggestion. “I think it’s time the company took a
new direction,” was all he said. “I want to step back from managing and
focus on maintaining a decent work-life balance.”
On paper, Nicholas was still the owner of the company, but he had
hired a new CEO to take his place: a no-nonsense woman named Katie
Chang, who had moved down from Silicon Valley to take on the new role.
Now, he ran his own schedule and came into the office on an as-needed
basis, which seemed to please him. Jay wasn’t surprised—he seemed to
relish the control. What did surprise her was the way he seemed to throw
himself into managing the house. In the absence of a maid, it was not
uncommon to come home to find him cleaning or staring down into a pot of
boiling soup while adding ingredients with the contemplation of an
alchemist at work.
Damon would have been rolling in his grave if he could see his son
now.
I’m so flattered that the high-flying millionaire house husband tuned in
to see me.
Of course. Did you remember to eat lunch?
Not yet. Jay glanced at Arthur, clapping in the appropriate spot. I’ll
grab something after the All Hands meeting, I promise.
I know you, Jay. You forget when you’re nervous.
I won’t forget.
She watched Katie take the microphone from Arthur, clicking to a slide
that showed a bunch of metrics for various departments and their
performance. She thought wistfully of the first time she had listened to
Nicholas speak at one of these meetings and how impressed she had been,
seeing his depth of knowledge and casual competency.
Their marriage had raised some eyebrows, and she still heard the
occasional whispers of disapproval, but it seemed like Nicholas’s jaded
assessment of the town had been correct: money talked even louder than
rumor. His sense for business outweighed his transgressions, and when he
came into the office to discuss big clients or expansions, people still looked
at him with respect.
Still, sometimes she found herself looking at that empty office on the
mezzanine and thinking of how he used to make faces at her when he
pestered her over text.
When he wasn’t here, she missed him.
After a full day of back-to-back meetings, she was ready to go home.
With her new car and new license, she could play all the 90s strip mall
music she wanted. Whenever she drove, Nicholas groaned aloud every time
Letters to Cleo came on, but he never touched her radio. And sometimes,
she thought she’d caught him humming the hook to her songs in that deep,
resonant voice.
The house was warm and after hanging up her purse and coat, she
found Nicholas standing over what appeared to be a passable imitation of
her curried carrot soup, along with a plate of vegan aquafaba merengues.
“Surprise,” he said, watching her face with obvious delight.
“You baked,” she said, unable to keep the shock out of her voice.
His brows slanted down and he folded his arms over the front of his
raglan shirt. “You don’t have to sound so shocked.”
“I’m sorry, you’re so progressive, I should have realized you were a
feminist king.”
Nicholas rolled his eyes and smacked her sharply on the ass. “Get two
wine glasses and tell me how your speech went. Did you remember to eat?”
he asked casually.
Jay froze in front of the cupboard just as her stomach let out an
incriminating growl. She glanced at him over one shoulder and saw his
mouth twitch into that familiar dark smile.
“So, no.”
“I had meetings all day,” she protested.
“So get something delivered.”
“I can’t do that, that’s so embarrassing. I feel bad.”
“So tip them.” He caught her by the chin and kissed her hard, taking
the glasses out of her hands and setting them on the counter. Her heart gave
a little skip of anticipation when he flicked the citrine stone against her
throat before gripping it in his fingers. “You bad girl. Now I have to think
up a punishment for you.”
“Why?”
“You need to eat,” he said, and when he tugged on the chain, she
shivered. “It’s the third time this week you’ve forgotten. I can’t have my
beautiful little bird wasting away to nothing while she flutters up the
corporate ladder.”
“Daddy,” she said. “No. Please.”
“The more you beg, the worse it’s going to be.”
Jay heard herself make a rather shameless sound that did not sound
particularly concerned with consequences, worse or otherwise.
He laughed darkly. “Is the thought of a little punishment turning you
on? I’ll make it extra fun for you then. You can choose how and when.”
The scent of the baked merengue filled her lungs when she breathed in,
and she thought dizzily how strange it was, to taste such lingering
sweetness while listening to his threats. “H-how?”
“Option one—you go out to dinner at Accia with me in that slutty little
dress you hate, with nothing on underneath.”
“Oh my god,” Jay choked, scandalized—but not as much as she wanted
to be.
“Option two—you let me buy you a proper gift, no spending limit. And
charity doesn’t count.”
She glared at him.
“Option three,” he continued, with a glint in his eyes. “You let me fuck
you in the ass.”
“Nicholas!” Her jaw dropped. “Oh my god.”
“I wasn’t planning on going in dry,” he said, which made heat flood her
face as she made another incredulous sound. “But if you don’t want an
assful of cock, you can always let me dress you like a slutty princess.”
“I thought you said you weren’t a sadist.”
“Bratty Jay brings out the worst in me.” He kissed her nose, grinning
when she wrinkled it. “Stop stalling and tell me how you want to be
punished.”
“The third thing,” she said defiantly.
“Are you sure you aren’t frightened of Daddy’s big cock? You went
pale.”
He looked so smug and pleased with himself that a little flicker of
rebellion made her say, “Shut up, Nick.”
His face got that forbidding look then—the one that she secretly loved,
though wild horses couldn’t have dragged that from her, even though she
suspected that part of him knew and reveled in it—and when he tugged on
her necklace, the sound that came out of her was high and needy.
He pushed his fingers against her lips and she parted them, closing her
eyes as he dragged them over her tongue.
“Eyes open.”
Jay cracked open her eyes just in time to see him grip her by her blouse
and haul her partially over the counter. She yelped, her fingers sliding for
purchase against the slippery surface as he yanked her skirt up, baring her
ass to the air.
“Nick!” she cried out, but it broke into a soft moan when his fingers
spread her open.
Nicholas ran his hand over her backside before delivering a stinging
crack that had her bucking. He pressed down on her clit, which sweetened
the sharp pressure and discomfort of him thrusting the finger of his other
hand inside her ass, causing her to clench up in surprise.
“I see why you chose this,” he said, his tone almost conversational as
she began to pant. With every thrust, the slackening release, paired with the
smooth glide of his thumb over her clit, made her knees feel watery and
weak. “I can picture it now—you, bent over and struggling to take every
inch of my cock in your disrespectful little ass just to fucking spite me.”
“Nicholas,” she gasped, clawing at the counter. “Please. I can’t hold
on.”
“Don’t worry. Daddy’s going to take good care of his pretty slut. You
might even be able to still sit down when I’m finished playing with you.”
Jay came hard, falling against the counter with the granite at her cheek,
and felt a throbbing ache of relief as he slid his finger out of her and
unzipped his jeans. There was a crinkling sound, a hoarse vocalization, and
then he was inside of her aching cunt, pushing so deeply that the intensity
of it made her cry out a little.
Pinned against the counter the way she was, the stove was in her
periphery. She could see steam coming off of it, and a smell that suggested
that some of the spices and vegetables on the bottom were starting to get
burnt.
“I think . . . you should stir that.”
“Oh, fuck.” His breath puffed against her neck. “Dinner.”
“Sounds like you should get punished,” Jay said effortfully.
“If you think you can manage to hold me down long enough, you’re
welcome to try.” His hand stilled over her hip, holding her in place as he
finished, his breathing becoming unstable. “But Daddy always wins.”
Jay groaned. “Why should I get punished for your mistake?”
“Because I didn’t make you forget your lunch.” With a final shudder,
he straightened, giving her ass another possessive slap before tossing the
condom in the trash and washing his hands. As he walked to the stove, he
shook out his arms, and gave his shoulders a little flex. “Come here, my
starving bird. I used your recipe so it should be at least as good as yours.”
“Well, aren’t you confident for someone who never started cooking
until this year,” she said, still a little short of breath.
“Why don’t you taste it first, before you light into me.”
Jay rolled her skirt down and limped over, defiantly picking up the
bowl he handed her. As she breathed in the warm aroma of the spices, she
felt an unexpected but thrilling wave of affection at the thought of him
measuring out all the herbs, stirring until the consistency was exactly right.
A little more eager now, she tasted a spoonful. “Did you add sugar to
this?”
“And cinnamon. I thought it would be better, if it was sweeter.”
“I am not going to stand here and listen to my perfectly fine soup get
slandered by a sugar fiend who eats marshmallow fluff out of the jar.”
Nicholas flicked her nose. “But it’s good, isn’t it? You like it.”
“I do like it. And I love you,” she said impulsively, looking up at him.
His mouth curled into a smile and he reached over and tucked a strand
of hair behind her ear. “I love you, too, blue jay.”

Epilogue

Apart from the usual slew of expensive presents and performative
celebrations, birthdays hadn’t carried much significance in the Beaucroft
household. There were no favorite meals or homemade cakes, at least none
that Nicholas could remember. He had written lists of the things he wanted
and his father made the housekeeper buy them for him.
Nicholas wanted to do something special for his wife’s thirty-second. It
felt like an important way of delineating their new life from the old,
creating a new tradition and clearing away the strangling vines of the past.
Putting the completed forms for the scholarship he’d created in both
their names beside the plate of vegan omelet he’d laboriously crafted out of
chickpea flour and nutritional yeast (after ruining a pan) had been a good
start. She had looked at the table and cried before kissing him, running her
hands over his face with that tenderness he craved.
But that wasn’t enough.
“Why do I need this blindfold?” Jay asked, from the passenger seat.
She was wearing a Kelly green dress and her hair was tied off with that
little avocado ribbon. He’d watched her put it up with the satisfaction of
knowing that he would be the one to take it down later.
“So you don’t spoil the surprise.”
He stopped the car. Jay was frowning when he opened her door. He
helped her out, liking the way she gripped his arm for support. “I feel
ridiculous,” she grumbled, tilting her head like she was braced for laughter
she couldn’t hear. “This had better be worth it.”
“Oh, I think you’re going to find it very satisfying.”
She bit her lip. “Are we in a public place?”
“Yes.” He didn’t bother to keep the amusement out of his voice. “Very
public.”
Smiling wider at the uneasy expression on her face, he led his pretty
victim up to the door of her surprise destination, ignoring the stares and the
whispers. “That’s so weird,” she said suspiciously. “I know this smell.
Nicholas, where did you take me?”
“Guess.”
“Niiiiick,” she whined. “You’re making me nervous. It’s not
somewhere weird, is it?”
Feeling like he’d tortured her enough, Nicholas tugged off her
blindfold, making a note to ask her what sorts of weird public places she
thought he might take her later. “Surprise.”
Her eyes widened. “You brought me to a bookstore.”
“I knew you’d love it. Happy birthday, you little nerd.”
Jay slapped at his arm, though she looked delighted.
Then wary.
Then suspicious.
“You didn’t buy the store, did you?”
“No. Having one business is enough. You’re going to have to work for
it this time, though. I’m only giving you three minutes to buy as many
books as you can carry.” He reached into his pocket for his cell phone and
hit a timer. “Starting now.”
“What?” she squawked. But she was already pivoting, causing the
green hem of her dress to flare out appealingly as she sprinted off for the
fantasy aisle, disappearing behind a shelf.
They had been married for almost two months now and he found that it
suited him the way it had never quite seemed to suit his father. He enjoyed
the way that Jay made every space feel warmer just by being in it, and it
made him feel good to anticipate her needs and give her things she never
even knew she wanted. Nobody had ever really depended on him before or
trusted him to satisfy their needs in a way that went beyond the financial.
Despite his natural inclination toward reticence, Jay’s inherent
sweetness made it far too easy to confess things to her that he would never
tell anyone else. His father had taught him that fear and compliance were all
that he needed from a woman. But Jay’s love and acceptance of him, even
after seeing him at his ugliest, made him feel more like himself and less like
his father’s shadow. And he was so grateful for that, every day.
Because, despite what his father believed, love hadn’t made him soft. It
had given him a reason to better himself, to be the person that she thought
he could be.
Jay herself had become more like the girl he remembered and had
fallen in love with that first day by the tree: the self-righteous Valkyrie who
wasn’t afraid to take up space or chastise a small group of boys for doing
wrong. At his company, she was a compassionate leader with a firm
adherence to the rules, who could manage people as well as she could data.
And then at night, she would become his little bird, sitting on his lap in
those prim little office clothes and calling him Daddy until he took her to
bed and made her scream it.
While he waited for Jay to finish, he ordered a small coffee from the
small kiosk they had in the front. “Do you want sugar?” she asked, and he
glanced at his watch.
Two minutes to go. “Yeah, two pumps of caramel, please.”
He was the only one in line, so his drink came out quickly, and he
sipped it as he headed down the path Jay had taken, only to find her
struggling to carry a stack of at least fifteen books.
“Here.” Nicholas shifted his coffee to one hand. “Let me help.”
“No,” Jay said stoutly. “You said I had to carry them. I’m not going to
be disqualified from your little game because I didn’t follow your rules.”
“It’s not a game,” he said. “It’s a gift. And if you would just let me—”
“Noooooo.” She dodged past him, moving faster than he would have
believed possible. A book went flying from the top of her pile.
Nicholas bent to pick it up and glanced at the title before setting it back
on the shelf.
Rules were rules.
He turned to see an older man staring at him. “Your girlfriend always
make you clean up after her like that?”
“What?”
“Women these days are so entitled. The pretty ones are the worst.” He
gave him a commiserating look. “Be careful. She’ll take you for everything
you have—just like my ex.”
“She’s my wife,” Nicholas said coldly. “And it’s her birthday. So why
don’t you fuck off?”
The man looked at him uneasily before shaking his head. “Whatever,
asshole. Don’t say I didn’t warn you when you end up in divorce court.”
Divorce court, Nicholas thought grimly. Yeah, right.
He found Jay by the register, studying a rack of bookmarks. There was
one in front of her shaped like the backside of a cat. She looked up as he
approached, already smiling hesitantly, though the smile got bigger when
she saw it was him. “There you are. I thought you got lost.”
“Why? You’re the one who ran off.” He held out his arms and Jay
begrudgingly handed the stack over, apparently unwilling to be separated
from her haul even for a second.
He watched the young cashier ring up the titles, studying the various
covers without recognition. It seemed to be the same colorful medley of
dragons, unicorns, and girls with swords that she’d idolized since she was
young. The only one he knew was a hardbound classic edition of Jane Eyre,
which made him smile, satisfied.
“Oh wow,” said Jay, when the cashier read out the total.
“It adds up,” the girl said, nodding sympathetically. “How will you be
paying?”
“With this.” Nicholas slid his card across the counter, and leaned over
to grab the bookmark that Jay had been admiring. “We’ll get this, too.”
“Nick, you don’t have to,” Jay protested. “It’s already so much.”
“I know I don’t have to.” Remembering that bitter old man in the
aisles, a line formed between his eyebrows. “I want to.”
“Are you two married?”
“Yes,” Nicholas said. “Two months. But I’ve known her for eighteen
years.”
Jay elbowed him beneath the counter.
“Wow, that’s so romantic,” the cashier said. “Congratulations.”
“You’re so evil,” Jay whispered, the moment they were out of earshot.
“What?” he asked innocently. “I have known you for eighteen years,
Jay.”
“I just think it’s a little twisted how you keep telling people that
without context. You know they’re thinking it’s something like The
Notebook.”
“It’s still the truth.”
“Oh my god.” But she was swinging the bags as they walked out, with
that little skip in her step that seemed to be an unconscious expression of
her joy. He was afraid to remark upon it, suspecting that if he ever did, she
might stop.
Impulsively, he pulled her face towards his and kissed her right there in
the middle of the parking lot. After a brief exclamation of surprise, she
kissed him back.
The parting of her lips beneath the sudden pressure of his mouth felt as
natural as breathing.

After her promotion, her childhood bedroom had been converted into
an office-slash-guest bedroom. She’d replaced her old desk with a sleek,
cherrywood model that had lots of pretty pull-out doors with brass handles,
and looked exactly the way she’d imagined her ideal grown-up desk to
look.
The new books Nicholas had bought her for her birthday were carefully
arranged along the back of it, sandwiched between two geode bookends that
Lily had mailed her as a gift. She had only managed to read one so far. The
pay bump and professional respect were amazing, but sometimes, like
today, it felt like there weren’t enough hours in the day to get everything
done.
Jay leaned forward on her desk, pushing her reading glasses up to her
hairline as she scrubbed her hands over her face. The numbers the
marketing VP had provided for the last quarter didn’t match with the data
they had, and she was working with Arthur, going over the latest sales
figures and trying to understand if it was a bookkeeping error or something
more sinister.
“How far back do these sales records go?” Jay muttered, briefly closing
her eyes, praying that her first big assignment from the company wasn’t
going to be an embezzlement case.
“As fun as it is watching you toil away after working hours, I can think
of something better you could be doing with your time.”
She groaned when she felt the hands on her shirt buttons, leaning back
to find Nicholas looming over her in the chair. “This is for your company.”
“Fuck my company. It’s almost ten and my wife is still working,
instead of in bed with me.” He nipped at the shell of her ear as he slid a
hand into her shirt and massaged her breast. “Leave the glasses on when
you come to bed. They’re hot.”
Jay pushed his face away, adjusting said glasses self-consciously. “I’ll
be there soon. I’m halfway done going over this spreadsheet.”
She felt him sigh and rest his chin on her head. “What is this?”
“It’s the audit for marketing. It’s been in the pipeline for weeks and
we’re behind. I’m sure Arthur’s told you about it.”
“Is it due tomorrow?”
“We’re already behind,” Jay said. “It should have been done weeks
ago.”
“So what I’m hearing is that it’s already fucked and can probably stand
to be a little more fucked. How many hours have you spent on it already?”
“Three, but—”
“Jay.” He tugged at her shirt from the inside. “To bed. Now.”
Jay pushed his hands away and opened up another email, ignoring him.
But she didn’t read it, and when she heard him exhale slowly, with a bit of
vocalization, goosebumps rippled down her arms.
She knew what that sound meant.
Suddenly, the chair was no longer beneath her. Jay yelped when she
found herself draped over Nicholas’s bare shoulder, suspended very
precariously over the now-moving floor.
“Put me down!”
“No.”
Jay kicked fruitlessly, feeling rather embarrassed as he walked down
the hallway to his bedroom as if she were a wriggling sack of flour. She
smacked his back and he retaliated with a hard spank that made her screech,
“I am the vice-president of your fucking company.”
“Yes, you are.” He dropped her on his bed. “And I own your C-suite
little ass.”
“You don’t get to punish me for working.”
“That’s where you’re wrong, little bird. If you were really that
desperate to be bent over at your desk all night, you should have come to
me.” He was wearing silk boxers and they hugged the outline of his hips so
snugly that she had no trouble assessing her effect on him when he leaned
over her menacingly. “Strip.”
“What’s stopping me from walking past you and going back to my
office?”
His mouth tilted up at one corner. “Try it and find out.”
Jay swallowed hard, scooting nervously on the bed. His posture shifted
to match hers—like he’ll chase me if I run, she thought, and a hitch entered
her breathing. Pretending to be more annoyed than she actually was, Jay
huffed and pulled her work blouse off, lifting her hips to slide down the
comfortable sleep shorts she’d changed into.
Nicholas knelt down between her thighs as she struggled out of her bra
and kissed her, tilting his head at a sharp angle to avoid the blue lightblocking reading glasses she was still wearing. One of his hands tangled in
her hair, cradling her head. “You look like a slutty librarian.”
Jay ran her hands down his bare back and felt the muscles flex as he
pressed his lips to her chest, just above her pounding heart. Show-off. “I
didn’t think librarians did it for you.”
“They do when they look like you.”
She let her hand wander around to his front, and felt him suck in a little
as she trailed light fingers over the contracted lines of muscle, before
sliding her hand into his pants. With a ragged sigh, he let her cup him,
stroking the velvety, wrinkled skin of his testicles before curling her palm
around his shaft as she slid upwards from the base.
He made an encouraging sound and Jay stroked him harder, the way
she knew he liked, smiling when he moaned against her mouth. But just
when she started to feel like she’d gotten away with escaping punishment,
his fingers closed firmly around her wrist.
“Nice try.”
With another hard kiss, he dragged her up from the bed, dislodging her
hand in the process. She stumbled, breathless, as he walked her to one of
the brocade sitting chairs. But instead of pushing her into it, he swung it
around one-handed and pointed.
“Bend over it.”
“Excuse me?”
She took a step back and he stalked closer.
“I said, bend over it. Ass in the air.”
The strangled sound that escaped her made him smile. The fluttery
feeling inside her body was closer to anticipation than fear but her heart still
gave a panicky jump when one of his hands rested on the back of the chair
he wanted to her to bend over, caging her in.
If she drew in a large enough breath, her chest would graze his.
“Don’t look at Daddy like that.” He caught her chin, thumbing her kissswollen lips. “It’s just going to make what’s going to happen that much
harder for you.”
Slowly, repressing a shiver, Jay turned her back on him. He put his
hands on her hips, just above her waistband, as he moved her into the
desired position. She grunted when he hefted her higher, nudging her
upwards until she was nearly on tiptoe.
Then he stepped closer, putting his hands just behind hers on the
armrest. “Remember how tense you used to get before I fucked you?” he
murmured, just level with her ear. “You knew it was coming, but couldn’t
admit how badly you wanted it. That’s how you look right now.”
Jay swayed in place, feeling a flicker of dread when his body heat
vanished.
His footsteps padded across the carpeted floor, and she knew, from the
deliberate heaviness of his tread, that he wanted her to hear him. Even while
listening for his approach, she nearly crawled up the chair when she felt his
breath tickling her back. With a low sound of amusement, he dropped a kiss
on her bare shoulder. “You look so worried.” More kisses trailed down her
spine. “It’s not an execution.”
Recognizing her own words being thrown back at her, her eyes
narrowed at the wall. “Just a punishment.”
“A punishment you chose.” He kissed her other shoulder, pressing his
tongue to her skin as he reached beneath her arms to cup her breasts. Jay
stood taller as he rolled her nipples in hard circles that had her squirming
indecently against the chair. “I was rooting for the slutty dress.”
“So you could humiliate me in public?” Her voice came out unsteady.
Now that she knew what he was going to do to her, a rush of adrenaline
kicked through her blood.
Nicholas breathed out a soft laugh and the fabric of the chair blurred. “I
told you I’m not an exhibitionist.” He let a hand fall, and she sucked in
when he grazed her abdomen with his fingertips. “I was only going to play
with you a little under the dinner table before I fucked you in my car on the
way home.”
He tugged down her underwear and slid his fingers between her legs
before she could react, making her arch against him at the first confident
stroke. He pushed back with his body, and she realized that he was naked.
And hard.
“Now I’m going to make you beg.”
Her fingers dug into the brocaded fabric as he pumped his fingers
faster, adding pressure. He was very good at making her come. He’d
adjusted his stance so he wasn’t pressing against her, and the only hint of
his arousal was his breathing, which grew heavier as she got closer and she
struggled to remain upright even as her knees turned to water.
“Please,” she said. An electric shiver arced down her spine when he bit
the nape of her neck, giving her breast a hard squeeze. “Oh god . . .”
“Open your legs.”
She whimpered when she felt the slick, lube-covered head of his cock
nudge her ass.
He kissed her ear. “Open. Your. Legs.”
“Nick,” she said, and his hand smoothed down her hip, gentling her
even as he slid two fingers of his other hand back inside her cunt. After a
few shallow thrusts, he rubbed her clit, working that slick nub of flesh
beneath his rough fingertips until all she could feel was pressure, and
pleasure, and—she gasped, arching back involuntarily—a hot spark of pain,
like being pulled apart.
“That’s it. Arch your back just like that.”
Jay gripped the chair tighter and felt his groan reverberate throughout
her body. “God, yes.” He kissed her hair and that was when she realized
that he was inside her. “You feel—so fucking good.”
She felt overfull and on the verge of collapse. When he abandoned her
clit to fuck her with his fingers, Jay’s hands convulsed on the slippery
fabric. “I don’t know if I can—”
“You’re doing so well.” His lips opened against her bent spine. “Say,
‘My Daddy fucks me twice as hard as anyone else and I love it when he
fills my ass with come.”
“Oh my god, Nicholas. No.”
He fingered her more aggressively, until she cried out again. She felt a
puff of warm air as he worked himself deeper that could have been laughter
or a silent moan. “Say it.”
“My Daddy—Nicholas, please—he fucks me twice as anyone and I . . .
aah . . .”
Surging forward, and making her gasp, he reached around her torso for
the citrine dangling from her necklace as the fingers of his other hand
curved to stroke her inner walls.
“Finish that sentence.”
“I—” His hand fisted and the chain attached to her collar pulled taut
around her throat. “Fuck,” Jay choked, even as her shoulder blades began to
prickle and a tingling lightness overtook her thoughts, shrouding everything
in a heady white mantle of pleasure that felt as if it might leave her blind.
“Yes, oh god, I love it—”
“And?” She felt the sharp dig of his hipbone as he bottomed out with a
low groan. He let go of her collar, letting his hands fall just behind hers on
the armrests, his hard stomach flush with her spine. “The rest.”
“I want him . . . to fill my ass with c-come.”
He pulled out with a labored grunt and entered her again, bowing her
over the chair until she could feel his chest bearing down on her. Giving up
on bracing herself, Jay let herself be flattened, hugging the back of the chair
and burying her face in the padding to stifle her moan.
“My god, Jay. You’re such a filthy little whore.”
Jay heard herself make a sound; the desperation of it embarrassed her.
“Please.” She flexed her hips, arching into him, and with a low, approving
growl, he stroked between her legs, nudging her into the rhythm of his
thrusts with his bent fingers. “Oh my god—I can’t—please—”
“You even sound slutty when you beg.” He sank his teeth into her bare
shoulder, before dragging his lip over the bite. “Who makes you scream
when you beg for it?”
“My Daddy.”
“Good girl.” And that low growl of approval made her let go, loosing a
scream that seemed to shatter his control and drive him wild.
He began fucking her in earnest—slow, heavy strokes that had her hips
rocking against the chair, causing the brocade to chafe her sensitized
nipples with every torturous graze as she struggled to maintain her nowsweaty grip on the slippery armrests. The tight, full-to-bursting pressure,
and the slackening relief cut short by the next deep thrust were punctuated
by little blazing sparks of pleasure wrought by his fingers and his mouth.
Her glasses were all fogged up and the pleasure was beginning to feel
raw, but she didn’t care, because she was thoroughly lost in the sensations
of him now—high on endorphins and adrenaline and something that
seemed to be just him.
Just Nick, she thought, and cried out softly.
“God.” His voice was hoarse. “Fuck.”
Jay rolled forward as she felt him pulse on that final staggered thrust,
followed by the searing brand of his release. The unfamiliar sensation
shocked her a little, and she sank forward against his arm until he took pity
on her and lifted her up from the chair in a tight, constricting embrace.
“That was so, so good.” He kissed her hair, her cheek, nuzzling her
face, even as his cock softened inside her. “You take me so well.” When he
pulled out, she winced at the feel of his warm come dripping down her
thighs. “Are you sore?”
She nodded, sagging a little in his arms.
“Poor little bird. Daddy’s going to take good care of you.”
When he swung her up in his arms, she didn’t struggle. It was a much
gentler carry—less potato sack, she thought wearily, and more princess. He
took her to the master bath, past the bench where she had dressed his
wounds, and sat her gingerly on the seat of the deep tub while it filled with
warm water. There was a big mirror built into the wall, which reflected
most of the room, including the shower, the tiled bench where he had sat,
and the bathtub itself.
Nicholas left to shower himself off before disappearing back into the
bedroom. Jay shifted a little at the sting of the warm water when it reached
the level of her hips. Then she closed her eyes, soothed by the steam. There
was a splash beside her, followed by the clink of glass on tile, and then his
hand was nudging her gently.
“Don’t fall asleep.”
“I wasn’t.” She lifted her head to let him unfasten her necklace. “You
just wore me out.”
“Well, I hate to compete with a spreadsheet.” She cracked open an eye
and saw him pouring what looked like port into the two glasses he’d
apparently gone to retrieve. Watching the garnet liquid made Jay remember
other alcohol-steeped nights, with kisses that burned like liquor. He pushed
the glass firmly into her hand. “You work too hard.”
She blinked confusedly at his blurry face before belatedly remembering
the glasses. With a sigh, she removed them and set them on the edge of the
tub. “I still feel like I have to prove myself.”
“You don’t.” He took a sip from his glass, dangling an arm over the
edge of the tiled lip. “Why break your back bending over for someone who
just wants to fuck you?”
“Says the man who just gave new meaning to the recovery of back pay
for unpaid overtime.”
His mouth curved sinfully. “You can work off the clock all you want if
you want to earn your wages that way.”
Jay swatted at him, and he shifted his drink to the other hand, using her
buoyancy in the water to reel her onto his lap. The tub was nearly full now
and Jay stretched to turn the faucet off with his arms still wrapped around
her waist while Nicholas tilted his head back with a satisfied sound.
The water lapped at his broad chest, puckering his nipples and making
his body hair shift in the current. She trailed a finger down his sternum and
felt his low rumble of contentment.
“I hope they appreciate you.”
“They do.” She let her hand fall away where his skin met the water,
thinking about how that body had felt against hers mere moments ago. “I’m
still sorry you had to step down for it.”
“I didn’t have to. I chose to. I’m being very well compensated.”
“You should know, it wasn’t the title I admired—it was how capable
you were standing up there in the middle of the room. Seeing you being
under that much pressure for work was awful and it wasn’t making you a
nicer person.”
“Is that going to be your new project?” He didn’t open his eyes but his
posture was relaxed and there was a faint smile on his mouth. “Being the
angel on my shoulder, whispering in my ear?”
“I sense there would be some resistance on that front.”
“My accountants keep assuring me that I’m very generous. Saintly,
even. Apparently, all these donations I’m handing out are making me quite
the levied martyr.”
“Only because I made you.” Jay put her hand on his thigh and saw him
smirk as her fingers teased the base of his cock. “You told me that you
enjoyed fucking with people. Getting inside their heads. Seeing what makes
them tick. You said it got you off.”
“That’s not the only thing.” He watched her through half-closed eyes as
she stroked him beneath the water. “Keep that up and you’ll have a sore
pussy and a sore ass.”
Jay gave him one more stroke before taking her hand away, much to his
obvious displeasure. “I mean it, though. You need to stop mining people for
weaknesses that you can exploit later when they piss you off. I know when
you’re doing it. You get this evil glint in your eye.”
“That’s going to be a hard habit to break, oh conscience mine.” He
grimaced as he took another drink of port. “As I get older, I see more of my
father in me, hear more of his voice in my head. You’re fortunate. You look
—and act—nothing like your mother. God, I used to fucking look at you
and wonder how you could have possibly come out of her.”
She trailed her fingers down his jaw. “That was a choice. Reinforced by
a series of choices, some of them tough ones.”
“Living here didn’t help with that, I’m sure,” he said darkly.
“No, it didn’t.”
“I know I added to that. When you ran away and I realized you were
running from me as much as you were my father—that was tough to
reconcile.”
“You’re not your father, Nick. Your father never apologized for
anything he did, and he didn’t suffer pangs of conscience. And he could
never—” she leaned in “—ever be as sweet as you can be to me.”
She felt him smile against her mouth when she kissed his cheek. “How
are you feeling, by the way? Are you going to be able to sit down at your
desk tomorrow? Or are you going to have to call in sick and tell them
you’re feeling about nine inches under the weather?”
“I take it back,” Jay said. “I think I hate you.”
“You always say that after I play with your ass. And then a few days
later, you’re begging for it again. You love my dick almost as much as you
love me.”
“I’m divorcing you.”
“You’re going to leave me and take half my money because I played
too rough?” Nicholas laughed against her throat, running the back of his
hand over her belly. “What a little coward.”
“It’s called a division of assets,” Jay said stiffly.
“Mmm. Try to get away from me now and see what I do to your assets.
I’ll hold you up in court for years, fucking you harder than any lawyer ever
could.” He nipped her waist with a playful pinch before bundling her more
firmly against him. “Want to hear something funny?”
“Can you behave?”
“No.” He gave her a naughty grin as his hand settled comfortably in the
dip above her hips. “Look at that wall. This is the only room in the house
that my father designed that I never destroyed or altered—mostly because
of the mirror.” He bumped his knee beneath her, making her turn to look at
their slightly steam-clouded reflections, where they were wrapped in each
other’s arms.
She didn’t think she imagined her cheeks getting a little ruddier. “Was
it valuable?” she asked, looking away from her own face to take in the gilt
edges with a puzzled frown.
“It’s actually quite the gauche moneysink unless you’re into
whorehouse chic like my father. But I told myself that one day, when this
house was mine, I’d be looking into that tasteless mirror he put in here so
he could watch himself fuck, and I’d see you sitting right here with me.”
“Wow.” Jay was startled by the sudden heat in his eyes and realized
she’d been absently running her fingers over his arm. “I don’t know
whether to be flattered or creeped out that you’ve been planning on asking
me to be your mirror mistress.”
“Not a mistress,” he corrected. “You were the only girl I ever wanted to
marry.” He picked up her left hand, bringing it to his mouth in that one
courtly gesture that always unstitched her heart at the seams. “That woman
in the mirror is my sine qua non.”
“What’s a sine qua non?”
“A condition that’s necessary for something else to be possible. That’s
what you are for me, little bird. Everything that makes up the best of me
exists because of my love for you.”
“Oh Nicholas,” Jay said. “I love you, too. Sometimes more than I can
bear.”
He gave her hand a squeeze. “Then let me bear it for both of us.”
*
THE END!! 
